Arkansas, session 2025, SB392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
21-1-107 Arkansas State Employee Student Loan Program — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "state agency" means the same as defined
in § 21-5-203.
(b) There is established the Arkansas State Employee Student Loan
Program to assist an eligible employee of a state agency with the repayment
of student loans.
(c) The program shall be administrated by participating state agencies
from existing appropriations.
(d)(1) To be eligible for the program, an employee shall:
(A) Complete a six-month probationary period that begins
with the employee's first day of employment with the state agency;
(B) Provide proof that the employee incurred student loan
debt for the purpose of obtaining a degree in a field related to the
employee's employment position, including without limitation the name and
*MBM145*
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
address of the student loan creditor;
(C) Provide proof that the student loan is unpaid at the
time the employee applies for the program; and
(D) Execute an agreement in which the employee agrees:
(i) To continue employment with the state agency for
a reasonable length of time as determined by the state agency; and
(ii) That the state agency is not obligated to issue
further payments under the program if the employee resigns or is terminated
while participating in the program.
(2) A state agency may provide for additional eligibility
requirements by rule.
(d) Payments under the program shall be made directly to the
employee's student loan creditor subject to the following limitations:
(1) Payments shall be issued in installments not to exceed two
thousand dollars ($2,000); and
(2) An employee may receive no more than:
(A) Five (5) installment payments; or
(B) A total of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in payments.
(e) Each state agency shall promulgate rules necessary to implement
the program within the state agency, including without limitation rules
regarding:
(1) Eligibility for the program;
(2) The payments an employee is eligible to receive; and
(3) The management of the program within the state agency.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-1-407 is amended to read as follows:
21-1-407. Employment by state agency.
A person whose spouse is elected to a constitutional office may be
employed by a state agency without the approval of the employment required by
§ 21-1-402(b) if the person's entry salary does not exceed the amount
prescribed by Level 4 of Grade 13 of the state compensation plan found in §
21-5-209 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 21-5-203 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-203. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(1) “Agency director” means the executive head of all agencies,
authorities, departments, boards, commissions, bureaus, councils, or other
agencies of the state head of an independent executive state agency who has
autonomous authority over the administration and operations of the state
agency;
(2)(A) "Apprenticeship" means an employee who is learning a
trade or obtaining other job skills and knowledge from a state agency;
(3) "Cabinet-level department" means the same as defined in §
25-43-103;
(2)(4) “Class” or “classification” means a group of positions
sufficiently similar as to duties performed, scope of discretion and
responsibility, minimum requirements of training and experience or skill, and
other characteristics that the same title, the same test of fitness, and the
same scale of compensation have been or may be applied to each position in
the group;
(5) "Classification realignment" means a temporary change of a
position to a classification within a different job series or job family;
(3) “Class specification” means a written document which
identifies a group of positions that have the same type of work and
responsibility and states the general components by providing a class title,
class code, distinguishing features and examples of work, knowledge, skills,
and abilities, and the necessary minimum education and experience
requirements to perform the assigned duties;
(4)(A) “Crossgrade” means a temporary reclassification of a
position during the fiscal year.
(B)(i) The Office of Personnel Management may authorize a
temporary change in the classification of a position from the classification
authorized in a state agency appropriation act between legislative sessions
to assure correct classification and for other purposes.
(ii) The Office of Personnel Management shall
establish the procedures for crossgrades with review by the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee;
(5)(6) “Demotion” means the change in duty assignment of an
employee from a position in one classification to a position in another
classification of a lower salary grade within the same pay table;
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(6)(7) “Employee” means a person regularly appointed or employed
in a position of state service by a state agency for which:
(A) He or she is compensated on a full-time basis or on a
pro rata basis; and
(B) A class title and pay grade is established in the
appropriation act for the state agency in accordance with the classification
and compensation plan enacted in this subchapter;
(7)(8) “Entry pay level” means the minimum entrance salary rate
for a grade established on a pay table;
(8)(9) “Grade” means an authorized pay range;
(10) “Job description" means a written document developed by the
Office of Personnel Management that identifies a group of positions that have
the same type of work and responsibility and states the general components by
providing a class title, class code, distinguishing features and examples of
work, knowledge, skills, and abilities, and the necessary minimum education
and experience requirements to perform the assigned duties;
(11) "Job family" means a category designation that identifies a
group of related occupations;
(12)(A) "Job series" means a subcategory within a job family
that identifies classifications with similar types of work or similar skills
and knowledge.
(B) A job series designates the classifications eligible
for career-path progression;
(9)(13) “Job sharing” means a form of employment, approved by
the Office of Personnel Management, in which the hours of work of two (2) or
more persons are arranged in such a way as to cover a single, regular full-
time position;
(10)(14) “Maximum pay level” means the highest authorized level
of pay for a pay grade for normal compensation administration purposes;
(11)(15) “Midpoint” means the rate of pay midway between the
entry pay level and the maximum pay level established for each grade;
(12)(16) “Office of Personnel Management” means the Office of
Personnel Management within the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services acting under the authority granted in this subchapter and subject to
the direction of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared
Services;
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(13)(17) “Pay table” means the grades and pay ranges assigned to
one (1) of the General Salaries, Information Technology, Medical
Professional, and Senior Executive tables State Government Services,
Information Systems and Technology, Medical, Law Enforcement and Safety,
Specialized Services, and Executive pay tables;
(14)(18) “Position” means employment that is legislatively
authorized in a state agency, occupied or vacant, requiring the services of
one (1) full-time equivalent employee;
(15)(19) “Promotion” means the change in duty assignment of an
employee from a position in one classification to a position in another
classification of a higher salary grade within the same pay table or the same
job series;
(16)(A)(20)(A) “Reclassification” means a change in the
assignment of a position from one classification title to another
classification title of either a higher or lower salary grade when material
and permanent changes in the duties and responsibilities of the position
being recommended for reclassification have occurred or when it is necessary
to establish a new classification title to meet federal standards as a
prerequisite for federal programs.
(B) The Office of Personnel Management shall establish
procedures for reclassifying positions upon approval by the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee;
(17)(21) “State agencies” means all agencies, authorities,
departments, boards, commissions, bureaus, councils, or other agencies of the
state supported by appropriation of state or federal funds, except those
agencies excluded in § 21-5-204;
(18)(22) “State Personnel Administrator” means the State
Personnel Administrator of the Office of Personnel Management; and
(19)(23) “Transfer” means a change in duty assignment of an
employee from one position to another position in the same classification or
between pay tables.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 21-5-207 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-207. Office of Personnel Management — Duties.
(a) It shall be the duty of the Office of Personnel Management to
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
perform the following administrative responsibilities, subject to this
subchapter:
(1) To determine that each position of a state agency affected
by this subchapter is allocated to a class having a written class
specification job description based on the duties and responsibilities
assigned to the position and the requirements necessary to satisfactorily
perform the duties;
(2) To assist the various state agencies in the allocation of
positions to classes established in this subchapter and in the appropriation
acts covering each of the several state agencies affected by this subchapter,
and to disallow the allocation of a position to a class that is not in
conformance with this subchapter;
(3) To cooperate with any other state agency, department, board,
commission, or institution that is not covered by this subchapter which may
wish to voluntarily establish its positions into classifications in a like
manner as provided in this subchapter for state agencies covered by it;
(4)(A) To authorize the temporary reclassification of positions
in a state agency affected by this subchapter in cases in which it has been
determined by the Office of Personnel Management that there are material
changes in the duties and responsibilities assigned to the position when
there is no available vacant position having the proper classification and
where it is impracticable to restructure the duties of the position to the
proper classification.
(B) The reclassification of positions may also be
authorized when it is necessary to establish a new classification to meet
federal standards as a prerequisite for federal programs, provided that no
position may be reclassified to a class with a higher salary grade than that
approved by the General Assembly, and the reclassified positions shall not be
placed in a class and receive pay at a salary rate in excess of the maximum
pay level authorized for the position that was reclassified as provided in
the appropriation act of the state agency establish a career path for
classifications within a job series;
(5)(A) To review all class specifications job descriptions,
including without limitation a state agency's functional job description and
functional job title, and all classes and grades and the compensation plan
affecting all state agencies covered by this subchapter and to submit to the
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
Legislative Council and the Governor in advance of the regular session and
fiscal session of the General Assembly recommendations for revisions,
modifications, or additions.
(B) When necessary, the Office of Personnel Management
shall confer with the staff of the Legislative Council on the development of
and revisions to uniform classification and compensation systems.
(C) Time periods for the development of recommendations
and time periods for the review by the Legislative Council of those
recommendations shall be as established by the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(D) The time period shall be sufficiently in advance of
budget hearings for the regular session and fiscal session to allow for the
thorough review by the Legislative Council;
(6) To develop and implement uniform personnel policies and
procedures;
(7)(A) To establish a procedure to allow for the review of the
qualifications of applicants whose education and experience do not meet or
exceed that required by the class specification job description but who have
other job-related qualifications which might be validly substituted for the
class requirements.
(B) This procedure is intended to allow state agencies to
substitute job-related education and experience for the specific requirements
stated on the class specification job description without the necessity for
the revision of the class requirements.
(C) The procedure shall require the final approval of the
State Personnel Administrator, with the review of the Legislative Council or,
if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee;
(8)(A) To monitor agency personnel transactions, including
unqualified appointments, promotions, and reductions in grade.
(B) Unqualified appointments shall be reported by the
Office of Personnel Management to the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, unless one (1) of the
following actions is taken:
(i) Questionable appointments were forwarded by the
Office of Personnel Management to the State Personnel Administrator for
further review;
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(ii) Payroll actions for questionable appointments
that are determined by the State Personnel Administrator to be unqualified
for the specific appointment are not processed until the unqualified
appointment is removed from the payroll or is placed into a position in the
state agency for which the individual meets the minimum qualifications of the
classification; or
(iii) Corrective action has been documented by the
state agency.
(C) It is the specific responsibility of the director of
each state agency each agency director and secretary of a cabinet-level
department covered by this subchapter to certify that the qualifications of
persons appointed to positions within the state agency do meet or exceed the
minimum education and experience requirements as stated on the class
specification job description;
(9)(A) To establish each year, upon the review of the
Legislative Council, new classifications at an appropriate grade level in
order to meet new or changed conditions and to report at the end of each
fiscal year all class titles contained in § 21-5-208 for which a class
specification job description has not been written.
(B) Any classification established under this subdivision
(a)(9) shall remain in effect for the remainder of the fiscal year during
which it was established unless specifically authorized to continue by the
General Assembly as an addition to this subchapter;
(10) To revise, as necessary, the class specification job
description of a classification in order to ensure the accuracy of the
description of the assigned duties and the minimum requirements necessary to
perform these duties to maintain a valid relationship between the
requirements and the duties and responsibilities of the jobs;
(11) To administer and maintain a system for the evaluation of
employee performance effectiveness;
(12) To provide assistance to state agencies in identifying,
developing, and maintaining administer state training and resource outreach
programs;
(13) To develop and implement, as needed, upon the review of the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee, rules to ensure a uniform system of personnel
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
administration within state government;
(14) To review and approve both the classification and number of
positions for each state agency on a biennial basis and provide a
recommendation to the Legislative Council; and
(15) To review and recommend changes to state agency personnel
policies, including without limitation disciplinary policies;
(16) To determine the delivery of human resources and personnel
services within cabinet-level departments to ensure efficient use of taxpayer
funds; and
(17)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, to approve a cabinet-level department's request for the
reassignment of positions to make proper adjustments to the budgets within
each cabinet-level department.
(B) A reassignment of positions under subdivision
(a)(17)(A) of this section may be approved to redirect internal resources to
meet the needs of the cabinet-level department and the services provided.
(C) The secretary of the cabinet-level department shall
submit a request for reassignment of positions under subdivision (a)(17)(A)
of this section to the office, which shall transmit the request to the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State and the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session, the
Joint Budget Committee.
(D) The office may approve a request for a reassignment of
positions under subdivision (a)(17)(A) of this section after approval by the:
(i) Chief Fiscal Officer of the State; and
(ii) Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly
is in regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session, the Joint
Budget Committee.
(E) Upon approval by the office of a reassignment of
positions that is necessary for the efficient and effective operation of the
cabinet-level department, the cabinet-level department may request from the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a transfer of positions, appropriations,
line-item appropriations, and funds within or between existing and newly
created divisions, offices, sections, or units of the requesting cabinet-
level department.
(F) Upon approval by the office, the Chief Fiscal Officer
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
of the State shall initiate the necessary documents to reflect the
reassignment upon the fiscal records of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor
of State, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and the requesting cabinet-
level department.
(G) The office may approve requests for the reassignment
of positions on an emergency basis:
(i) If the reassignment is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety; and
(ii) Upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State and the cochairs of the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session, the
cochairs of the Joint Budget Committee. The approval by the cochairs of the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee shall be reported at the next
meeting of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
(G) A reassignment of positions under this subdivision
(a)(17) shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the cabinet-level department's
total appropriation and funding authorized for the cabinet-level department.
(H) A cabinet-level department shall not be approved for
more than four (4) transfer requests for reassignment of positions during one
(1) fiscal year.
(I)(i) Determining the maximum number of employees and the
maximum amount of appropriation of general revenue funding for a state agency
each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually
accomplished by delineating the maximums in the appropriation act for a state
agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund
account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law.
(ii) In light of subdivision (a)(17)(I)(i) of this
section, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee or their cochairs as provided by this subdivision
(a)(17).
(iii) The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee or their cochairs is not a severable part
of this subdivision (a)(17). If the requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this subdivision (a)(17) is void.
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(b) In order to ensure and provide for the accuracy and efficiency of
this subchapter and to provide for an efficient and equitable system of
personnel management, the Office of Personnel Management office, with the
review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session,
the Joint Budget Committee, is directed to:
(1) Study on a continuing basis and modify and revise when
necessary the current classifications, the class specifications job
descriptions, minimum requirements, and other requirements;
(2) Create when necessary new classifications at an appropriate
grade level that will accurately describe those positions for which no
appropriate classification exists;
(3) Determine those positions that are improperly classified and
reclassify those positions to the appropriate classification subject to this
subchapter; and
(4) Develop and implement the policies, rules, and procedures
necessary for the establishment and maintenance of this subchapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 21-5-208 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-208. Classification of positions.
(a) There are established for state agencies covered by this
subchapter the following classification titles and grades.
(b) The following classification titles with grades indicated are
approved for the state classification plan, subject to the appropriation acts
for the various state agencies and various institutions affected by this
subchapter:
Job Code Job Title Job Grade
ESE01A SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE EXE04
ESE02A SECRETARY OF COMMERCE EXE04
ESE03A SECRETARY OF CORRECTIONS EXE04
ESE04A SECRETARY OF DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION EXE04
ESE05A SECRETARY OF EDUCATION EXE04
ESE06A SECRETARY OF ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT EXE04
ESE07A SECRETARY OF HEALTH EXE04
ESE08A SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES EXE04
ESE09A SECRETARY OF INSPECTOR GENERAL EXE04
ESE10A SECRETARY OF LABOR & LICENSING EXE04
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
ESE11A SECRETARY OF PARKS, HERITAGE & TOURISM EXE04
ESE12A SECRETARY OF PUBLIC SAFETY EXE04
ESE13A SECRETARY OF THE MILITARY EXE04
ESE14A SECRETARY OF TRANSFORMATION & SHARED SEVICES EXE04
ESE15A SECRETARY OF VETERANS AFFAIRS EXE04
EEX05A ASSISTANT ADJUTANT GENERAL EXE03
EEX06A BANK COMMISSIONER EXE03
EEX11A CHIEF PROGRAMS DIRECTOR EXE03
EEX13A COMMISSIONER OF HIGHER EDUCATION EXE03
EEX36A RETIREMENT SYSTEM DIRECTOR EXE03
EEX42A STATE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER EXE03
EEX01A AEDC EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX03A AR PBS DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II EXE02
EEX12A CHIEF WORKFORCE OFFICER EXE02
EEX20A FINANCE AUTHORITY DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX21A HEALTH DEPUTY DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX22A HUMAN SERVICES DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX23A INSURANCE COMMISSIONER EXE02
LLO13C OAL DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX30A PROSECUTOR COORDINATOR EXE02
EEX31A PSC CHAIRMAN EXE02
EEX32A PSC COMMISSIONER EXE02
EEX34A PUBLIC DEFENDER DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX37A REVENUE DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX38A SECURITIES COMMISSIONER EXE02
EEX40A STATE BUDGET DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX41A STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX43A STATE CONTROLLER EXE02
EEX45A STATE EMPLOYEE BENEFITS DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX47A STATE INTERNAL AUDIT DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX48A STATE PERSONNEL DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX49A STATE PROCUREMENT DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX50A TAX APPEALS COMMISSIONER EXE02
EEX52A TSS GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION OFFICER EXE02
EEX53A WORKERS COMPENSATION CHAIRMAN EXE02
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
EEX56A WORKFORCE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR EXE02
EEX02A AGRICULTURE DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX04A ASP COLONEL EXE01
EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I EXE01
SCP07C CORRECTIONS DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX15A CRIME INFORMATION DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX16A DDSSA DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX17A DFA DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR EXE01
EEX18A EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX19A ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT DIRECTOR EXE01
LLO16C OAL GAMING DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX27A PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX29A POST PRISON TRANSFER BOARD CHAIRMAN EXE01
EEX33A PSC DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX35A REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX39A STATE BROADBAND DIRECTOR EXE01
EEX44A STATE DEPUTY CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER EXE01
EEX54A WORKERS COMPENSATION COMMISSIONER EXE01
EEX08A CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL II SPC11
LAT02C APPEALS TRIBUNAL CHAIRMAN SPC10
EEX07A BANK DEPUTY COMMISSIONER SPC10
FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER II SPC10
LAT08C CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL I SPC10
LPD02C CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER II SPC10
EEX14A CORRECTIONS CHIEF DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC10
PPE06C INSURANCE DEPUTY COMMISSIONER SPC10
EEX24A MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL SPC10
EEX26A PARKS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC10
SRL04C REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATOR SPC10
PRE06C RETIREMENT SYSTEM INVESTMENT DIRECTOR SPC10
MHS03C STATE HEALTH SCIENTIST SPC10
ILP06C WORKERS COMP CEO SPC10
EEX55A WORKFORCE DIRECTOR SPC10
PPB01C AR PBS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC09
PRP01C ASSESSMENT COORDINATION DIRECTOR SPC09
LAT06C ATTORNEY IV SPC09
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
FBF01C BANK DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR SPC09
LAT07C CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SPC09
FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER I SPC09
LPD01C CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER I SPC09
SCP06C CORRECTIONS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC09
PPE03C DEPUTY SECURITIES COMMISSIONER SPC09
SSP03C DHS DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC09
EEA02C EDUCATION DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC09
PHP06C HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SPC09
EEA03C HIGHER EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER SPC09
SLA01C LABORATORY DIRECTOR SPC09
SAS02C MANAGING ARCHITECT SPC09
MHA03C NURSING HOME DIRECTOR SPC09
LLO04P OAL CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER SPC09
LLO05P OAL CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL SPC09
LLO18P OAL INTERNAL AUDITOR SPC09
PEM05C PRODUCTION AND CONSERVATION DIRECTOR SPC09
PPE10C PUBLIC EMPLOYEES CLAIMS MANAGER SPC09
FSA04C STATE BUDGET ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR SPC09
EEX46A STATE GEOLOGIST SPC09
HSP02C STATE PERSONNEL ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR SPC09
PPE12C STUDENT LOAN DIRECTOR SPC09
PSS01C TSS CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER SPC09
ILP05C WORKERS COMP ASST CEO SPC09
LAT01C ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SPC08
SCP02C ARKANSAS SENTENCING COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08
LAT05P ATTORNEY III SPC08
PBC01C CLAIMS COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08
PRP03C DFA ASSISTANT DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
PDI09C DISABILITY DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC08
PPE04C ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
EEA01C EDUCATION DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
PBC03C ELECTION COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08
PEM02C ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08
PBC05C ETHICS COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08
SEN03C HEALTH ENGINEER DIRECTOR SPC08
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
HDH03C HR ADMINISTRATOR II SPC08
FAU06C INTERNAL AUDIT DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08
PBC06C JDDC DIRECTOR SPC08
FAC12C MEDICAID FISCAL OFFICER SPC08
MHA01C NURSING HOME ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
PAV02P PILOT SPC08
SCP19C POST PRISON TRANSFER BOARD MEMBER SPC08
LPD05P PUBLIC DEFENDER III SPC08
PPU04C PUBLIC SERVICE DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC08
PRE03C RETIREMENT SYSTEM ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
PRE05C RETIREMENT SYSTEM DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08
ESA04C SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT SPC08
SSP07C SOCIAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
ELI05C STATE LIBRARIAN SPC08
EEX51A TOURISM DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
PSS02C TSS DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08
PPE14C WORKFORCE DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08
PPE01C AERONAUTICS DIRECTOR SPC07
PAG01C AGRICULTURE DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC07
RPA02C ASSISTANT PARK DIRECTOR SPC07
PAV01P AVIATION MANAGER SPC07
FBF06P BANK EXAMINER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07
CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMUNICATIONS II SPC07
FIF02C CHIEF SECURITIES EXAMINER SPC07
SSP04C DHS DIVISION MANAGER SPC07
PDI08C DISABILITY DIVISION DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC07
FAC11C DIVISION FISCAL ADMINISTRATOR SPC07
PED04P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07
EEP02C EDUCATION PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SPC07
FIF06P INSURANCE EXAMINER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07
SEN04C MANAGING ENGINEER SPC07
PHP07C MEDICAL BOARD DIRECTOR SPC07
PHP08C MINORITY HEALTH COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC07
LLO12P OAL DIR SECURITY & COMPLIANCE SPC07
LLO24P OAL MARKETING & ADVERTISING DIR SPC07
LLO33P OAL SALES DIRECTOR SPC07
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PPF02P PUBLIC FINANCE OFFICER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07
PRP07P REVENUE DIVISION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07
PRM02C RISK MANAGEMENT MANAGER SPC07
FSA02C STATE ACCOUNTING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07
PRP13C STATE ECONOMIST SPC07
PRP14P STATE INFRASTRUCTURE COORDINATOR SPC07
PSS05C TSS PROGRAM MANAGER SPC07
FAC04C ACCOUNTING MANAGER SPC06
PAG02C AGRICULTURE DIVISION MANAGER SPC06
FAU01C AUDIT MANAGER SPC06
FBF08P BANK EXAMINER VI SPC06
FIF01P CERTIFIED FINANCIAL EXAMINER SPC06
CPR01C CHIEF OF COMMUNICATIONS I SPC06
FAC10C CONTROLLER SPC06
SCP05C CORRECTIONS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR II SPC06
PED02P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT CONSULTANT SPC06
EES03P EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
EEP04C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER SPC06
SEN02P ENGINEER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
SEP02C EPIDEMIOLOGY MANAGER SPC06
SSP05C FAIR HOUSING DIRECTOR SPC06
FIN03P FINANCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
PHP04C HEALTH CENTER MANAGER SPC06
FIF05P INSURANCE EXAMINER III SPC06
FAU07P INTERNAL AUDIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
EEA04C MLK COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC06
MHA02C NURSING HOME ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR SPC06
LLO10P OAL CONTROLLER SPC06
LLO38P OAL TREASURER SPC06
SPS05C PUBLIC SAFETY DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC06
PRQ01C RESEARCH AND PLANNING DIRECTOR SPC06
FSA07P STATE BUDGET SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
HSP05P STATE PERSONNEL SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
PTA01P TAX AUDIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
PSS03C TSS DIVISION MANAGER SPC06
PWD04P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PPB02C AR PBS DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC05
FAC06C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER SPC05
LAT04P ATTORNEY II SPC05
FBF07P BANK EXAMINER V SPC05
FAC07P CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT SPC05
PCO02C COMMERCE PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05
SCP04C CORRECTIONS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR I SPC05
SSP02C DEV DISABILITY COUNCIL DIRECTOR SPC05
PEM01C E & E ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR SPC05
PEM03C ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05
SEP03P EPIDEMIOLOGY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05
SFO05P FORENSIC SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05
PAG10C FORESTER MANAGER SPC05
CPR03C GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS SPECIALIST SPC05
PHS06C HEALTH PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05
RMA05C HERITAGE DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC05
HDH02C HR ADMINISTRATOR I SPC05
FAU08P INTERNAL AUDITOR SPC05
ILP02C LABOR & LICENSING DIVISION DIRECTOR II SPC05
SLA02C LABORATORY MANAGER SPC05
PEM04C LP GAS BOARD DIRECTOR SPC05
SGE03C MANAGING GEOLOGIST SPC05
CMA02C MARKETING DIRECTOR SPC05
SGE04P PETROLEUM GEOLOGIST SPC05
SCP18C POST PRISON TRANSFER BOARD ADMINISTRATOR SPC05
ESA03C PRINCIPAL SPC05
SEN05P PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER SPC05
LPD04P PUBLIC DEFENDER II SPC05
PPF01P PUBLIC FINANCE OFFICER SPC05
SPS06C PUBLIC SAFETY PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05
SCP20I REVOCATION HEARING OFFICER SPC05
PRM03P RISK MANAGEMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05
PPE11C RURAL SERVICES DIRECTOR SPC05
FIF09P SECURITIES EXAMINER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05
FSA05P STATE BUDGET COORDINATOR SPC05
HSP03P STATE PERSONNEL COORDINATOR SPC05
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SAS03C STATE SURVEYOR SPC05
ILP07C WORKERS COMP DIVISION MANAGER SPC05
PWD02P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT CONSULTANT SPC05
FAC05P ACCOUNTING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04
FAU02P AUDIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04
FBF05P BANK EXAMINER IV SPC04
SBI03P BIOLOGIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04
SCH03P CHEMIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04
PED01P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR SPC04
EES02P EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL II SPC04
SEP01P EPIDEMIOLOGIST SPC04
SGE02P GEOLOGIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04
PHP02C HEALTH BOARD DIRECTOR II SPC04
PHP03C HEALTH BRANCH MANAGER SPC04
RMA07C HERITAGE MANAGER II SPC04
HDH06C HR MANAGER SPC04
LLO34P OAL SECURITY DEPUTY DIR SPC04
PPU03I PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04
FRC02P PUBLIC SERVICE RATE CASE ANALYST II SPC04
MHS02P RADIOLOGICAL PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04
FSA03P STATE BUDGET ANALYST SPC04
HSP01P STATE PERSONNEL ANALYST SPC04
PSP02C STATE PROCUREMENT MANAGER SPC04
PTA03P TAX AUDITOR II SPC04
PPE13C WATERWAYS COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC04
FAC03P ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR SPC03
PAG03C AGRICULTURE DIVISION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC03
SAS01I ARCHITECT SPC03
LAT03P ATTORNEY I SPC03
FAU05P AUDITOR III SPC03
FBF04P BANK EXAMINER III SPC03
PAG07C DISTRICT FORESTER SPC03
SEN01P ENGINEER SPC03
FIN02P FINANCE COORDINATOR SPC03
FSA01P FINANCIAL ACCOUNTANT SPC03
SFO03P FORENSIC SCIENTIST SPC03
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PHP05C HEALTH DISTRICT MANAGER SPC03
RMA06C HERITAGE MANAGER I SPC03
FIF04P INSURANCE EXAMINER II SPC03
FIN05P INVESTMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC03
SLA03P LABORATORY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC03
SCM03P LICENSED CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER SPC03
SCM05P LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR SPC03
SGE05P PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST SPC03
LPD03P PUBLIC DEFENDER I SPC03
PHP09C PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF SPC03
FRC01P PUBLIC SERVICE RATE CASE ANALYST I SPC03
PRP09P REVENUE PROGRAM COORDINATOR SPC03
FIF08P SECURITIES EXAMINER II SPC03
PSP01P STATE PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR SPC03
SAS04I SURVEYOR SPC03
PWD01P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR SPC03
FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II SPC02
FAU04P AUDITOR II SPC02
FBF03P BANK EXAMINER II SPC02
SBI02P BIOLOGIST II SPC02
PHS02I CERTIFIED TUMOR REGISTRAR SPC02
SCH02P CHEMIST II SPC02
SCN03P ECOLOGIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC02
PED03P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST SPC02
EES01P EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL I SPC02
SCM04P LICENSED MASTER SOCIAL WORKER SPC02
RMA10I MUSEUM COORDINATOR SPC02
LLO01P OAL ACCOUNTANT SPC02
SPH02P PHYSICIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC02
MHS01P RADIOLOGICAL PROGRAM SPECIALIST SPC02
FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I SPC01
SCN01I ARCHAEOLOGIST SPC01
FAU03P AUDITOR I SPC01
FBF02P BANK EXAMINER I SPC01
SBI01P BIOLOGIST I SPC01
SCH01P CHEMIST I SPC01
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
RMA03I CURATOR SPC01
SCN02P ECOLOGIST SPC01
FIN01P FINANCE ANALYST SPC01
SFO04P FORENSIC SPECIALIST SPC01
PAG09P FORESTER SPC01
SGE01P GEOLOGIST SPC01
FIF03P INSURANCE EXAMINER I SPC01
FIN04P INVESTMENT ANALYST SPC01
SCM02P LICENSED ASSOCIATE COUNSELOR SPC01
SCM06P LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER SPC01
SPH01P PHYSICIST SPC01
PRM01P RISK CONSULTANT SPC01
SCM07P SCHOOL COUNSELOR SPC01
FIF07P SECURITIES EXAMINER I SPC01
FSA06P STATE BUDGET SPECIALIST SPC01
HSP04P STATE PERSONNEL SPECIALIST SPC01
PSP03P STATE PROCUREMENT SPECIALIST SPC01
PTA02P TAX AUDITOR I SPC01
PWD03P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST SPC01
ISI01C STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER IST15
ISI02C STATE IT SECURITY OFFICER IST15
IIA03C CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER III IST14
IDA01C DATA ARCHITECT IST13
IIA02C CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER II IST12
IIE01C CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER IST12
IDA02C DATA ENGINEER IST12
IIA04C IT ADMINISTRATOR IST12
IIA05C IT DIVISION MANAGER IST12
IIS05C IT INFRASTRUCTURE ARCHITECT IST11
IIS08C IT INFRASTRUCTURE MANAGER IST11
IAS07C STATE APPLICATIONS ADMINISTRATOR IST11
ISI03C STATE SYSTEMS EXPERT IST11
IAS06C APPLICATIONS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST10
IIA01C CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER I IST10
IIS07C IT INFRASTRUCTURE ENGINEER IST10
IIS10C IT INFRASTRUCTURE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST10
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
IIA06C IT MANAGER IST10
IIE04C IT SECURITY EXPERT IST10
IIP03P IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER IST10
LLO11P OAL DEPUTY IT GAMING DIRECTOR IST10
IAS03P APPLICATIONS COORDINATOR IST09
IDN02P DATA ANALYST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST09
IDM01P DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR IST09
IIE05C IT SECURITY MANAGER IST09
IIS11P IT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST09
IAS02P APPLICATIONS ANALYST II IST08
IAS05P APPLICATIONS DEVELOPER II IST08
IDN03P DATA SCIENTIST IST08
IIS01P IT COORDINATOR IST08
IIS02P IT DISASTER RECOVERY ANALYST IST08
IIS06P IT INFRASTRUCTURE COORDINATOR IST08
IIP02P IT PROJECT MANAGER IST08
IIE06P IT SECURITY SUPERVISOR IST08
LLO37P OAL SR. DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR IST08
IAS01P APPLICATIONS ANALYST I IST07
IDN01P DATA ANALYST IST07
IDM02P DATABASE ANALYST IST07
IIE03P IT SECURITY ANALYST II IST07
IGI03P STATE GIS ANALYST IST07
IUS03C USER SUPPORT MANAGER IST07
IAS04P APPLICATIONS DEVELOPER I IST06
IIS04P IT INFRASTRUCTURE ANALYST IST06
IIP01P IT PROJECT COORDINATOR IST06
IIE02P IT SECURITY ANALYST I IST06
LLO19P OAL IT SECURITY ANALYST IST06
LLO30P OAL QA SYSTEMS ANALYST IST06
IGI02P SENIOR GIS ANALYST IST06
IUS05P USER SUPPORT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST06
IDM03P DATABASE SPECIALIST IST05
IGI01P GIS ANALYST IST05
IIS03P IT DISASTER RECOVERY SPECIALIST IST05
LLO02P OAL APPLICATION SUPP SPECIALIST IST05
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
IUS02P USER SUPPORT COORDINATOR IST05
IAS08I WEBSITE SPECIALIST IST05
IIS09P IT INFRASTRUCTURE SPECIALIST IST04
IUS01P USER SUPPORT ANALYST IST04
LLO21P OAL LEAD COMPUTER OPERATOR IST03
IUS04P USER SUPPORT SPECIALIST IST02
LLO09P OAL COMPUTER OPERATOR IST01
SPO04C ASP LIEUTENANT COLONEL LES12
SPO05C ASP MAJOR LES11
SPS01C CLEST DIRECTOR LES11
SCP22C WARDEN II LES11
SPO01C ASP CAPTAIN LES10
SRL05C REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT MANAGER LES10
SCP21C WARDEN I LES10
SPO03C ASP LIEUTENANT LES09
SCP13C DEPUTY WARDEN II LES09
SAL03C AGRICULTURE LAW ENFORCEMENT CHIEF LES08
SPO06C ASP SERGEANT LES08
SCP12C DEPUTY WARDEN I LES08
SPO02P ASP CORPORAL LES07
SCO04C CORRECTIONS MAJOR LES07
SPL01C PARK LIEUTENANT COLONEL LES07
SPO08P ASP TROOPER 1ST CLASS LES06
SCL01C COMMUNITY SUPERVISION MANAGER LES06
SCO01C CORRECTIONS CAPTAIN LES06
SPS04P LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES06
SPL02C PARK MAJOR LES06
SPO07P ASP TROOPER LES05
SCL05P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES05
SCO03C CORRECTIONS LIEUTENANT LES05
SRL03P ENFORCEMENT AGENT III LES05
SIA20C INTERNAL AFFAIRS MANAGER LES05
SPS07P SENIOR LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING OFFICER LES05
SAL02P AGRICULTURE ENFORCEMENT AGENT II LES04
SCL04P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION OFFICER III LES04
SCO06P CORRECTIONS SERGEANT LES04
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SRL02P ENFORCEMENT AGENT II LES04
SIA21P INTERNAL AFFAIRS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES04
SPS03P LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING OFFICER LES04
SPL04C PARK SERGEANT LES04
SAL01P AGRICULTURE ENFORCEMENT AGENT I LES03
SCL03P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION OFFICER II LES03
SCO02P CORRECTIONS CORPORAL LES03
SPS02P CORRECTIONS TRAINING OFFICER LES03
SRL01P ENFORCEMENT AGENT I LES03
SIA19P INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR LES03
SPL03P PARK RANGER LES03
SLE01C POLICE CHIEF LES03
SCL02P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION OFFICER I LES02
SCO05P CORRECTIONS OFFICER LES02
SLE03P POLICE OFFICER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES02
SLE02P POLICE OFFICER LES01
SFO01C CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER MED16
MHA04C STATE HEALTH DIRECTOR MED16
MPH01C DEPUTY MEDICAL EXAMINER MED15
SFO02C CRIME LAB MEDICAL EXAMINER MED14
MDM01C DISABILITY CHIEF PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MED14
MPH04P PHYSICIAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED14
MDM05P DISABILITY SENIOR PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MED12
EEX28A PHARMACY BOARD DIRECTOR MED12
MPH02P PHYSICAN SPECIALIST MED12
MLM08C STATE HOSPITAL ADMINISTRATOR MED12
MDM03P DISABILITY PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MED11
MPA02C PHARMACY BOARD ADMINISTRATOR MED11
MDM02P DISABILITY PHYSICIAN CONSULTANT MED10
EEX25A NURSING BOARD DIRECTOR MED10
MPA04C PHARMACY MANAGER MED10
MPH03P PHYSICIAN MED10
MVE01C STATE VETERINARIAN MED10
MDE01I DENTIST MED09
MDM04P DISABILITY PSYCHOLOGIST MED09
MPA01P PHARMACIST MED09
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
MPA03P PHARMACY INSPECTOR MED09
MPS04P PSYCHOLOGIST II MED09
MVE03P VETERINARY SPECIALIST MED09
MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER MED08
MNU05C NURSING ADMINISTRATOR MED08
MPS03P PSYCHOLOGIST I MED08
MVE02P VETERINARIAN MED08
MLM01C AUDIOLOGIST MED07
MLM03C OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST MED07
MLM05C PHYSICAL THERAPIST MED07
MNU07C REGISTERED NURSE MANAGER MED07
MLM07C SPEECH PATHOLOGIST MED07
MDI02P DIETICIAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED06
MNU03P NURSE INSTRUCTOR MED06
MNU08P REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED06
MRE01C REHABILITATION ADMINISTRATOR MED06
MDI03P REGISTERED DIETICIAN MED05
MNU06P REGISTERED NURSE MED05
MRE04C REHABILITATION MANAGER MED05
MLM02C MEDICAL TECHNOLOGIST MED04
MRE05P REHABILITATION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED04
MLM06C RESPIRATORY THERAPIST MED04
MRE06P VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION COUNSELOR MED04
MDI01P DIETICIAN MED03
MNU02P LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED03
MPS02P PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAMINER MED03
PHS01P CERTIFIED HEALTH EDUCATOR MED02
MNU01P LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE MED02
MRE02P REHABILITATION COORDINATOR MED02
MRE03P REHABILITATION INSTRUCTOR MED02
SSP01C ADULT PUBLIC GUARDIAN ADMINISTRATOR SGS12
PVC02C CEMETERY SERVICE ADMINISTRATOR SGS12
RPA07C OUTDOOR RECREATION DIRECTOR SGS12
RPA08C PARK ADMINISTRATOR SGS12
PVS01C VETERANS SERVICE ADMINISTRATOR SGS12
PDI11C DISABILITY PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS MANAGER SGS11
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PDI13C DISABILITY UNIT MANAGER SGS11
RPA09C PARK AREA MANAGER SGS11
RPA13C PARK MANAGER SGS11
SSP09C SOCIAL SERVICES AREA MANAGER SGS11
SCP09C CORRECTIONS PROGRAM MANAGER SGS10
PDI05C DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR V SGS10
PDI10C DISABILITY HEARING OFFICER SGS10
PDI12C DISABILITY QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR SGS10
PDI14C DISABILITY UNIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10
EEC01C EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SGS10
EEP06P EDUCATION PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10
TAG02C FARM MANAGER SGS10
FFS01C FISCAL SUPPORT ADMINISTRATOR SGS10
ELI02C LIBRARY MANAGER SGS10
LLO20P OAL KEY CHAIN ACCOUNT MANAGER SGS10
LLO28P OAL PRODUCT MANAGER SGS10
LLO32P OAL REGIONAL SALES MANAGER SGS10
RPA20C PARK SUPERINTENDENT IV SGS10
PPU02P PIPELINE SAFETY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10
PPR03C PROCUREMENT MANAGER SGS10
SSP14C SOCIAL SERVICES COUNTY MANAGER III SGS10
HSB04P STATE BENEFITS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10
CTR03C TRAINING MANAGER SGS10
PSS06P TSS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10
SIA07C CHILD ABUSE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SGS09
PBC02A CLAIMS COMMISSIONER SGS09
PCA02C CLAIMS MANAGER SGS09
SIA09P CRIMINAL DETENTION FACILITIES COORDINATOR SGS09
EEC03C EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM MANAGER SGS09
SEM02C EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT MANAGER SGS09
PEP03P ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS09
IEH03P ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS09
FFS03C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER SGS09
TAT04P FLEET COORDINATOR SGS09
TFS03C FOOD SERVICES MANAGER SGS09
PHS09C HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR SGS09
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
TIS02P INDUSTRIAL SAFETY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS09
IIV01C INVESTIGATIONS MANAGER SGS09
RPA04C LODGE MANAGER SGS09
TIW05C MARKETING & REDISTRIBUTION MANAGER SGS09
IMP02C MILITARY PROGRAM MANAGER SGS09
LLO14P OAL FINANCIAL ANALYST SGS09
LLO26P OAL OFFICE CAMPAIGN COORDINATOR SGS09
RPA19C PARK SUPERINTENDENT III SGS09
CPR06C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER SGS09
PQA02C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER SGS09
FIN06P RETIREMENT SYSTEM INVESTMENT COORDINATOR SGS09
PRP10C REVENUE REGIONAL MANAGER SGS09
SSP13C SOCIAL SERVICES COUNTY MANAGER II SGS09
SSP15C SOCIAL SERVICES MANAGER SGS09
SFI05C STATE FIRE MARSHALL SGS09
HBE03P BENEFITS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
FBU02C BUDGET MANAGER SGS08
PPE02C BURIAL ASSOCIATION BOARD COORDINATOR SGS08
CTR01P CHANGE MANAGEMENT ANALYST SGS08
PCA03P CLAIMS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PCO04P COMMERCE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
TCO03P CONSTRUCTION PROJECT MANAGER SGS08
TCO04P CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
SCP11P CORRECTIONS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
ILS01I COURT REPORTER SGS08
PDI04P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR IV SGS08
EEC05P EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PBC04A ELECTION COORDINATOR SGS08
SEM04P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
IEH02P ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSPECTOR II SGS08
TAG03P FARM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PHS08P HEALTH PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PHS10P HEALTH UNIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
HDH08P HR SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
IIN04C INSPECTOR MANAGER SGS08
IMS01P ITAM COORDINATOR SGS08
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SLA06P LABORATORY TECHNICIAN III SGS08
ELI04P LIBRARY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
TST03P LICENSED TRADESMAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
SSP06I OMBUDSMAN SGS08
RPA18C PARK SUPERINTENDENT II SGS08
RPA25P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PPU01P PIPELINE SAFETY COORDINATOR SGS08
PPR05P PROCUREMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
CPR08P PUBLIC INFORMATION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
SIA23P PUBLIC SAFETY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PQA04P QUALITY ASSURANCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PRE07P RETIREMENT SYSTEM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PRP08C REVENUE MANAGER SGS08
ILS04I RULES & REGULATIONS COORDINATOR SGS08
SSP12C SOCIAL SERVICES COUNTY MANAGER I SGS08
SSP17P SOCIAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
SCM10P SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
CTR04P TRAINING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
PVS03P VETERANS SERVICE OFFICER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08
ETF07P VOCATIONAL INSTRUCTOR SGS08
PAG05P AGRICULTURE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
RPA01C ASSISTANT LODGE MANAGER SGS07
CME01P BROADCAST EDITOR SGS07
FBU01P BUDGET ANALYST SGS07
PVC01C CEMETERY MANAGER SGS07
SIA03P CERTIFIED DOG HANDLER COORDINATOR SGS07
SIA05P CHILD ABUSE INVESTIGATIVE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
PCA01P CLAIMS COORDINATOR SGS07
PCO01P COMMERCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07
TCO01P CONSTRUCTION COORDINATOR SGS07
SCP08P CORRECTIONS PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07
SIA11P CRIMINAL INTELLIGENCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANALYST SGS07
SFI01C DEPUTY FIRE CHIEF SGS07
PDI03P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR III SGS07
CME02P EDITOR SGS07
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
EEP03P EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07
IEH01P ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSPECTOR I SGS07
PAS08I EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT SGS07
TFM02C FACILITY MANAGER SGS07
PAG08P FARM SCHOOL COORDINATOR SGS07
PPE01P FIELD OFFICE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
SFI04P FIREFIGHTER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
FFS05P FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
SAL06P FOREST RANGER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
FGM03C GRANTS MANAGER SGS07
CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST SGS07
PHS05P HEALTH PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07
HDH05P HR COORDINATOR SGS07
TIS01P INDUSTRIAL SAFETY COORDINATOR SGS07
IIN05P INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
SCP17P INTAKE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
CPR04I INTERPRETER SGS07
IIV05P INVESTIGATOR SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
ILP01C LABOR & LICENSING DIVISION DIRECTOR I SGS07
ILP03P LABOR MEDIATOR SGS07
SLA05P LABORATORY TECHNICIAN II SGS07
TST02P LICENSED TRADESMAN SGS07
TMA02C MAINTENANCE MANAGER SGS07
TAT07P MECHANIC SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
IMP04P MILITARY PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
IIV06P MITIGATION INVESTIGATOR SGS07
LLO03P OAL AUDITOR SGS07
LLO17P OAL GRAPHIC SPECIALIST SGS07
RPA15P PARK PLANNER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
PPR02P PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR SGS07
CME06P PRODUCER SGS07
PPE04P PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
PRP05P PROPERTY ASSESSMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
CPR05P PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR SGS07
PQA01P QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR SGS07
PRC07C RESIDENTIAL CARE MANAGER SGS07
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PRC02C RESIDENTIAL SERVICES MANAGER SGS07
PRE04P RETIREMENT SYSTEM COORDINATOR SGS07
SSE02C SECURITY MANAGER SGS07
TST05P SKILLED TRADESMAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
SSP11P SOCIAL SERVICES COORDINATOR SGS07
HSB02P STATE BENEFITS COORDINATOR SGS07
SCM08P SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER COORDINATOR SGS07
SCM12P SUICIDE PREVENTION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07
ETF06P TEACHER II SGS07
CTR02P TRAINER SGS07
PSS04P TSS PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07
PVS02P VETERANS SERVICE OFFICER SGS07
PAS04C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPERVISOR SGS06
PAG04P AGRICULTURE PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06
RMA02P ARCHIVIST SGS06
HBE02P BENEFITS COORDINATOR SGS06
SIA01P CDL EXAMINER SGS06
SIA02P CERTIFIED DOG HANDLER SGS06
SCM01I CHAPLAIN SGS06
SIA06P CHILD ABUSE INVESTIGATOR SGS06
PCR03P CLAIMS REVIEW SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
PCO03P COMMERCE PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06
TCO02P CONSTRUCTION PROJECT COORDINATOR SGS06
PHS03P CONSUMER SCIENCE SPECIALIST SGS06
SCP10P CORRECTIONS PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06
SIA10P CRIMINAL INTELLIGENCE ANALYST SGS06
PDI02P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR II SGS06
SIA13P DISPATCHER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
SIA14P DRIVER LICENSE COORDINATOR SGS06
EEC02P EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06
EEP05P EDUCATION PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06
SEM01P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT COORDINATOR SGS06
PEP02P ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06
TAG01P FARM COORDINATOR SGS06
SFI03P FIREFIGHTER II SGS06
FFS02P FISCAL SUPPORT COORDINATOR SGS06
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
RRE01C FOOD & BEVERAGE MANAGER SGS06
SAL05P FOREST RANGER II SGS06
FGM04P GRANTS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIRECTOR I SGS06
PHS07P HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06
ILS02I HEARING OFFICER SGS06
HDH04P HR ANALYST SGS06
SCP16P INMATE HEARING OFFICER SGS06
IIN03P INSPECTOR III SGS06
PIC01I INSURANCE COMPLIANCE OFFICER SGS06
TIW02P INVENTORY MANAGER SGS06
IIV04P INVESTIGATOR III SGS06
SLA04P LABORATORY TECHNICIAN I SGS06
ILS03I LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST SGS06
ELI01P LIBRARIAN SGS06
IMS02P LRAM COORDINATOR SGS06
TMA04P MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
CMA04P MARKETING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
TAT06P MECHANIC SGS06
IMP01P MILITARY PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06
RMA12P MUSEUM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
LLO07P OAL CLAIMS CENTER MANAGER SGS06
LLO08P OAL COLLECTIONS SPECIALIST SGS06
LLO36P OAL SENIOR SECURITY SPECIALIST SGS06
RPA14P PARK PLANNER SGS06
RPA17C PARK SUPERINTENDENT I SGS06
RPA24P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06
PPR01P PROCUREMENT ANALYST SGS06
PPE03P PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST II SGS06
PRP04P PROPERTY ASSESSMENT SPECIALIST SGS06
CPR07P PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST SGS06
SIA22P PUBLIC SAFETY COORDINATOR SGS06
PQA03P QUALITY ASSURANCE SPECIALIST SGS06
ILP04I REAL ESTATE ANALYST SGS06
PAS15P RECORDS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
PRE02P RETIREMENT COUNSELOR II SGS06
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PRP12P REVENUE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
SSE03P SECURITY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
TST04P SKILLED TRADESMAN SGS06
SSP16P SOCIAL SERVICES SPECIALIST SGS06
HSB01P STATE BENEFITS ANALYST SGS06
SCM09P SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SPECIALIST SGS06
SCM11P SUICIDE PREVENTION SPECIALIST SGS06
TIW07P SURPLUS PROPERTY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06
ETF05P TEACHER I SGS06
TAT11I TRUCK DRIVER SGS06
RTO02C WELCOME CENTER MANAGER SGS06
PAS01P ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST SGS05
FBU03P BUDGET SPECIALIST SGS05
SIA08P CHILD ABUSE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
PCS02P CHILD SUPPORT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
PCR01P CLAIMS REVIEW ANALYST SGS05
PDA02P DATA/RESEARCH SPECIALIST SGS05
PDI01P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR I SGS05
SIA12P DISPATCHER SGS05
SIA16P DRIVER LICENSE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
HDH01P EEO/GRIEVANCE SPECIALIST SGS05
SEM03P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST SGS05
TAT03I ENGINEERING SPECIALIST SGS05
RMA04P EXHIBIT COORDINATOR SGS05
TFM03P FACILITY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
SFI02P FIREFIGHTER I SGS05
IFR02P FIRING RANGE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
TFS04C FOOD SERVICES SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
SFO06P FORENSIC TECHNICIAN SGS05
SAL04P FOREST RANGER I SGS05
RPA03P GIFT SHOP SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
FGM02P GRANTS COORDINATOR SGS05
PHS04P HEALTH EDUCATOR SGS05
RMA08P HISTORIAN SGS05
RMA09P HISTORIC PROPERTY COORDINATOR SGS05
SCP15P INMATE GRIEVANCE COORDINATOR SGS05
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
IIN02P INSPECTOR II SGS05
TIW04P INVENTORY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
IIV03P INVESTIGATOR II SGS05
RPA05P LODGE SALES COORDINATOR SGS05
TMA01P MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR SGS05
CMA01P MARKETING COORDINATOR SGS05
CME04P MEDIA SPECIALIST SGS05
FFS06P MEDICAL BILLING SPECIALIST SGS05
IMP03P MILITARY PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS05
LLO22P OAL LICENSING MANAGER SGS05
LLO25P OAL MARKETING SALES REP SGS05
LLO27P OAL OFFICE COORDINATOR SGS05
RPA10P PARK COORDINATOR SGS05
RPA21P PARK SUPERINTENDENT TRAINEE SGS05
RPA23P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM INTERPRETER II SGS05
PAS13C POLICY COORDINATOR SGS05
TAT09P PRINTER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
PPR04P PROCUREMENT SPECIALIST SGS05
TGC01I PROFESSIONAL APPRENTICE SGS05
PPE02P PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST I SGS05
PAS14P RECORDS COORDINATOR SGS05
PRC06C RESIDENTIAL CARE TEAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05
PRE01P RETIREMENT COUNSELOR I SGS05
PRP06P REVENUE COORDINATOR SGS05
TAT10I SCHOOL BUS TRAINER SGS05
SSP08P SOCIAL SERVICES ADVISOR SGS05
HSB03P STATE BENEFITS SPECIALIST SGS05
TIW06P SURPLUS PROPERTY AGENT SGS05
TST06P TRADES APPRENTICE SGS05
PCA04P WORKERS COMP COORDINATOR SGS05
PAS02P ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR SGS04
PAG06P AGRICULTURE UNIT COORDINATOR SGS04
HBE01P BENEFITS ANALYST SGS04
TAT02I CALIBRATION TECHNICIAN SGS04
PAS06I CAREER PLACEMENT SPECIALIST SGS04
SIA04P CHILD ABUSE HOTLINE REPRESENTATIVE SGS04
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PCS01P CHILD SUPPORT SPECIALIST SGS04
SCP03I COMMISSARY COORDINATOR SGS04
PEP01P CONSERVATION SPECIALIST SGS04
PAS07I COUNTY ADMINISTRATIVE SUPERVISOR SGS04
THT02I DENTAL ASSISTANT SGS04
PDI07P DISABILITY CLAIMS SPECIALIST SGS04
SIA15P DRIVER LICENSE EXAMINER SGS04
EEC04P EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS04
TFM01P FACILITY COORDINATOR SGS04
SIA17P FINGERPRINT TECHNICIAN SGS04
FFS04P FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST SGS04
FGM01P GRANTS ANALYST SGS04
TAT05I HEAVY EQUIPMENT OPERATOR SGS04
HDH07P HR SPECIALIST SGS04
SIA18P INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER SGS04
IIN01P INSPECTOR I SGS04
TIW01P INVENTORY COORDINATOR SGS04
IIV02P INVESTIGATOR I SGS04
THT03I LACTATION SPECIALIST SGS04
TMA03P MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST SGS04
CMA03P MARKETING SPECIALIST SGS04
CME05P MEDIA TECHNICIAN SGS04
LLO15P OAL FISCAL SPECIALIST SGS04
LLO23P OAL LICENSING SPECIALIST SGS04
LLO29P OAL PUBLICATION SPECIALIST SGS04
LLO35P OAL SECURITY SPECIALIST SGS04
RPA22P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM INTERPRETER I SGS04
MLM04P PHLEBOTOMIST SGS04
TAT08P PRINTER SGS04
PPU05I PUBLIC SERVICE VALUATION SPECIALIST SGS04
PRC05P RESIDENTIAL CARE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS04
RRE02P RESTAURANT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS04
PRP11P REVENUE SPECIALIST SGS04
PCO05P TAX SPECIALIST SGS04
TST07P TRADES SPECIALIST SGS04
RTO03P WELCOME CENTER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS04
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SCP01I ACCREDITATION SPECIALIST SGS03
RMA01P ARCHIVAL ASSISTANT SGS03
THT01I CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT SGS03
PCR02P CLAIMS REVIEW SPECIALIST SGS03
TGT02I COMMERCIAL VEHICLE DRIVER SGS03
PRP02P CUSTOMER SERVICE SPECIALIST SGS03
PDI06P DISABILITY CLAIMS ASSISTANT SGS03
EEP01P EDUCATION PARAPROFESSIONAL SGS03
SEM05P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT WATCH OFFICER SGS03
IFR01P FIRING RANGE SPECIALIST SGS03
SCP14P INMATE CLASSIFICATION ANALYST SGS03
TIW03P INVENTORY SPECIALIST SGS03
TFS05P KITCHEN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03
TGR02P LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03
PAS09P LICENSING COORDINATOR SGS03
RPA06P LODGE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03
TMA05P MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN SGS03
LLO06P OAL CLAIMS ASSISTANT SGS03
LLO31P OAL RECEPTIONIST SGS03
RPA12P PARK HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03
MPS01P PSYCHOLOGICAL EVALUATOR SGS03
IMS03P RTLA COORDINATOR SGS03
SSE01P SECURITY GUARD SGS03
PAS03P ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST SGS02
PAS05I CALL CENTER SPECIALIST SGS02
TFS02P FOOD PREPARATION AND SERVICE WORKER SGS02
PAG11P FORESTRY TECHNICIAN SGS02
THO02P HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS02
TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORDINATOR SGS02
ELI03P LIBRARY SPECIALIST SGS02
PAS10P LICENSING SPECIALIST SGS02
PAS12P MAILROOM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS02
RMA11P MUSEUM SPECIALIST SGS02
RPA11P PARK HOUSEKEEPER SGS02
RPA16P PARK SPECIALIST SGS02
THT04I PHARMACY TECHNICIAN SGS02
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PRC03P RESIDENTIAL CARE COORDINATOR SGS02
SSP10P SOCIAL SERVICES ASSISTANT SGS02
RTO01P TRAVEL CONSULTANT SGS02
TAT01I BEAUTICIAN SGS01
TGT01I CASHIER SGS01
TFS01P COOK SGS01
TST01P GENERAL LABORER SGS01
PRC01P HEALTH AIDE SGS01
THO01P HOUSEKEEPER SGS01
PAS11P MAILROOM SPECIALIST SGS01
TGC02I PUBLIC SERVICE INTERN SGS01
PRC04P RESIDENTIAL CARE SPECIALIST SGS01
RRE03P SERVER SGS01
TGT03I VETERINARY AIDE SGS01

(c)(1) There are established the following job series:

Family/Series Job Code Job Title Grade Car. Prog. Design
COMMUNICATION
MARKETING
CMA02C MARKETING DIRECTOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
CMA04P MARKETING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
CMA01P MARKETING COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
CMA03P MARKETING SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
MEDIA
CME01P BROADCAST EDITOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
CME02P EDITOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST SGS07 CAREER-PATH
CME06P PRODUCER SGS07 CAREER-PATH
CME04P MEDIA SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
CME05P MEDIA TECHNICIAN SGS04 CAREER-PATH
PUBLIC RELATIONS
CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMUNICATIONS II SPC07 COMPETITIVE
CPR01C CHIEF OF COMMUNICATIONS I SPC06 COMPETITIVE
CPR03C GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS SPECIALIST SPC05 COMPETITIVE
CPR06C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
CPR08P PUBLIC INFORMATION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
CPR05P PUBLIC INFORMATION COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
CPR07P PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
CPR04I INTERPRETER SGS07 INDEPENDENT
TRAINING
CTR03C TRAINING MANAGER SGS10 COMPETITIVE
CTR01P CHANGE MANAGEMENT ANALYST SGS08 CAREER-PATH
CTR04P TRAINING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
CTR02P TRAINER SGS07 CAREER-PATH
EDUCATION
EARLY CHILDHOOD
EEC01C EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SGS10 COMPETITIVE
EEC03C EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
EEC05P EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
EEC02P EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
EEC04P EARLY CHILDHOOD PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION
EEA02C EDUCATION DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
EEA03C HIGHER EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER SPC09 COMPETITIVE
EEA01C EDUCATION DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
EEA04C MLK COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC06 COMPETITIVE
EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL SERVICES
EES03P EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
EES02P EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL II SPC04 CAREER-PATH
EES01P EDUCATION PROFESSIONAL I SPC02 CAREER-PATH
EDUCATION PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION
EEP02C EDUCATION PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
EEP04C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
EEP06P EDUCATION PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10 CAREER-PATH
EEP03P EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
EEP05P EDUCATION PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
EEP01P EDUCATION PARAPROFESSIONAL SGS03 CAREER-PATH
LIBRARIANS
ELI05C STATE LIBRARIAN SPC08 COMPETITIVE
ELI02C LIBRARY MANAGER SGS10 COMPETITIVE
ELI04P LIBRARY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
ELI01P LIBRARIAN SGS06 CAREER-PATH
ELI03P LIBRARY SPECIALIST SGS02 CAREER-PATH
SCHOOL ADMINISTRATION
ESA04C SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT SPC08 COMPETITIVE
ESA03C PRINCIPAL SPC05 COMPETITIVE
TEACHERS & FACULTY
ETF07P VOCATIONAL INSTRUCTOR SGS08 CAREER-PATH
ETF06P TEACHER II SGS07 CAREER-PATH
ETF05P TEACHER I SGS06 CAREER-PATH
EXECUTIVE
EXECUTIVES
EEX05A ASSISTANT ADJUTANT GENERAL EXE03 APPOINTED
EEX06A BANK COMMISSIONER EXE03 APPOINTED
EEX11A CHIEF PROGRAMS DIRECTOR EXE03 APPOINTED
EEX13A COMMISSIONER OF HIGHER EDUCATION EXE03 APPOINTED
EEX36A RETIREMENT SYSTEM DIRECTOR EXE03 APPOINTED
EEX42A STATE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER EXE03 APPOINTED
EEX01A AEDC EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX03A AR PBS DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX08A CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL II SPC11 APPOINTED
EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX12A CHIEF WORKFORCE OFFICER EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX20A FINANCE AUTHORITY DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX21A HEALTH DEPUTY DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX22A HUMAN SERVICES DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX23A INSURANCE COMMISSIONER EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX30A PROSECUTOR COORDINATOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX31A PSC CHAIRMAN EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX32A PSC COMMISSIONER EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX34A PUBLIC DEFENDER DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX37A REVENUE DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX38A SECURITIES COMMISSIONER EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX40A STATE BUDGET DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX41A STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX43A STATE CONTROLLER EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX45A STATE EMPLOYEE BENEFITS DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
EEX47A STATE INTERNAL AUDIT DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX48A STATE PERSONNEL DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX49A STATE PROCUREMENT DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX50A TAX APPEALS COMMISSIONER EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX53A WORKERS COMPENSATION CHAIRMAN EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX56A WORKFORCE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX52A TSS GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION OFFICER EXE02 APPOINTED
EEX02A AGRICULTURE DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX04A ASP COLONEL EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX15A CRIME INFORMATION DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX16A DDSSA DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX17A DFA DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX18A EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX19A ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX27A PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX29A POST PRISON TRANSFER BOARD CHAIRMAN EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX33A PSC DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX35A REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX39A STATE BROADBAND DIRECTOR EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX54A WORKERS COMPENSATION COMMISSIONER EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX44A STATE DEPUTY CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER EXE01 APPOINTED
EEX07A BANK DEPUTY COMMISSIONER SPC10 APPOINTED
EEX14A CORRECTIONS CHIEF DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC10 APPOINTED
EEX24A MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL SPC10 APPOINTED
EEX26A PARKS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC10 APPOINTED
EEX55A WORKFORCE DIRECTOR SPC10 APPOINTED
EEX46A STATE GEOLOGIST SPC09 APPOINTED
EEX51A TOURISM DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 APPOINTED
EEX28A PHARMACY BOARD DIRECTOR MED12 APPOINTED
EEX25A NURSING BOARD DIRECTOR MED10 APPOINTED
SECRETARIES
ESE01A SECRETARY OF AGRICULTURE EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE02A SECRETARY OF COMMERCE EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE03A SECRETARY OF CORRECTIONS EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE04A SECRETARY OF DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINI EXE04 APPOINTED
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
ESE05A SECRETARY OF EDUCATION EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE06A SECRETARY OF ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE07A SECRETARY OF HEALTH EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE08A SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE09A SECRETARY OF INSPECTOR GENERAL EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE10A SECRETARY OF LABOR & LICENSING EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE11A SECRETARY OF PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE12A SECRETARY OF PUBLIC SAFETY EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE13A SECRETARY OF THE MILITARY EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE14A SECRETARY OF TRANSFORMATION & SHARED SEVICES EXE04 APPOINTED
ESE15A SECRETARY OF VETERANS AFFAIRS EXE04 APPOINTED
FINANCIAL
ACCOUNTANTS
FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER II SPC10 COMPETITIVE
FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER I SPC09 COMPETITIVE
FAC12C MEDICAID FISCAL OFFICER SPC08 COMPETITIVE
FAC11C DIVISION FISCAL ADMINISTRATOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
FAC10C CONTROLLER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
FAC06C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
FAC04C ACCOUNTING MANAGER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
FAC07P CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT SPC05 CAREER-PATH
FAC05P ACCOUNTING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04 CAREER-PATH
FAC03P ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR SPC03 CAREER-PATH
FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II SPC02 CAREER-PATH
FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
AUDITORS
FAU06C INTERNAL AUDIT DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
FAU01C AUDIT MANAGER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
FAU07P INTERNAL AUDIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
FAU08P INTERNAL AUDITOR SPC05 CAREER-PATH
FAU05P AUDITOR III SPC03 CAREER-PATH
FAU02P AUDIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04 CAREER-PATH
FAU04P AUDITOR II SPC02 CAREER-PATH
FAU03P AUDITOR I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
BUDGET
FBU02C BUDGET MANAGER SGS08 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
FBU01P BUDGET ANALYST SGS07 CAREER-PATH
FBU03P BUDGET SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
BANK FINANCIAL EXAMINERS
FBF01C BANK DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
FBF06P BANK EXAMINER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07 CAREER-PATH
FBF08P BANK EXAMINER VI SPC06 CAREER-PATH
FBF07P BANK EXAMINER V SPC05 CAREER-PATH
FBF05P BANK EXAMINER IV SPC04 CAREER-PATH
FBF04P BANK EXAMINER III SPC03 CAREER-PATH
FBF03P BANK EXAMINER II SPC02 CAREER-PATH
FBF02P BANK EXAMINER I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
FISCAL SUPPORT
FFS01C FISCAL SUPPORT ADMINISTRATOR SGS10 COMPETITIVE
FFS03C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
FFS05P FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
FFS02P FISCAL SUPPORT COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
FFS06P MEDICAL BILLING SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
FFS04P FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
GRANT MANAGEMENT
FGM03C GRANTS MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
FGM04P GRANTS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
FGM02P GRANTS COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
FGM01P GRANTS ANALYST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
INSURANCE FINANCIAL EXAMINERS
FIF06P INSURANCE EXAMINER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07 CAREER-PATH
FIF01P CERTIFIED FINANCIAL EXAMINER SPC06 CAREER-PATH
FIF05P INSURANCE EXAMINER III SPC06 CAREER-PATH
FIF04P INSURANCE EXAMINER II SPC03 CAREER-PATH
FIF03P INSURANCE EXAMINER I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
FIF02C CHIEF SECURITIES EXAMINER SPC07 COMPETITIVE
FIF09P SECURITIES EXAMINER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05 CAREER-PATH
FIF08P SECURITIES EXAMINER II SPC03 CAREER-PATH
FIF07P SECURITIES EXAMINER I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
INVESTMENT
FIN03P FINANCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
FIN02P FINANCE COORDINATOR SPC03 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
FIN01P FINANCE ANALYST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
FIN06P RETIREMENT SYSTEM INVESTMENT COORDINATOR SGS09 CAREER-PATH
FIN05P INVESTMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC03 CAREER-PATH
FIN04P INVESTMENT ANALYST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
RATE CASE ANALYSIS
FRC01P PUBLIC SERVICE RATE CASE ANALYST I SPC03 CAREER-PATH
FRC02P PUBLIC SERVICE RATE CASE ANALYST II SPC04 CAREER-PATH
STATE ACCOUNTANTS
FSA02C STATE ACCOUNTING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07
FSA01P FINANCIAL ACCOUNTANT SPC03 CAREER-PATH
STATE BUDGET
FSA04C STATE BUDGET ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
FSA07P STATE BUDGET SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
FSA05P STATE BUDGET COORDINATOR SPC05 CAREER-PATH
FSA03P STATE BUDGET ANALYST SPC04 CAREER-PATH
FSA06P STATE BUDGET SPECIALIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
HUMAN RESOURCES
BENEFITS
HBE03P BENEFITS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
HBE02P BENEFITS COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
HBE01P BENEFITS ANALYST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
DEPARTMENT HR
HDH03C HR ADMINISTRATOR II SPC08 COMPETITIVE
HDH02C HR ADMINISTRATOR I SPC05 COMPETITIVE
HDH06C HR MANAGER SPC04 COMPETITIVE
HDH08P HR SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
HDH05P HR COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
HDH04P HR ANALYST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
HDH01P EEO/GRIEVANCE SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
HDH07P HR SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
STATE BENEFITS
HSB04P STATE BENEFITS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10 CAREER-PATH
HSB02P STATE BENEFITS COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
HSB01P STATE BENEFITS ANALYST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
HSB03P STATE BENEFITS SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
STATE PERSONNEL
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
HSP02C STATE PERSONNEL ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
HSP05P STATE PERSONNEL SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
HSP03P STATE PERSONNEL COORDINATOR SPC05 CAREER-PATH
HSP01P STATE PERSONNEL ANALYST SPC04 CAREER-PATH
HSP04P STATE PERSONNEL SPECIALIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
APPLICATION SUPPORT
IAS07C STATE APPLICATIONS ADMINISTRATOR IST11 COMPETITIVE
IAS06C APPLICATIONS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST10 COMPETITIVE
IAS03P APPLICATIONS COORDINATOR IST09 CAREER-PATH
IAS02P APPLICATIONS ANALYST II IST08 CAREER-PATH
IAS01P APPLICATIONS ANALYST I IST07 CAREER-PATH
IAS05P APPLICATIONS DEVELOPER II IST08 CAREER-PATH
IAS04P APPLICATIONS DEVELOPER I IST06 CAREER-PATH
IAS08I WEBSITE SPECIALIST IST05 INDEPENDENT
DATA ADMINISTRATION
IDA01C DATA ARCHITECT IST13 COMPETITIVE
IDA02C DATA ENGINEER IST12 COMPETITIVE
DATA ANALYTICS
IDN02P DATA ANALYST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST09 CAREER-PATH
IDN03P DATA SCIENTIST IST08 CAREER-PATH
IDN01P DATA ANALYST IST07 CAREER-PATH
DATABASE MANAGEMENT
IDM01P DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR IST09 CAREER-PATH
IDM02P DATABASE ANALYST IST07 CAREER-PATH
IDM03P DATABASE SPECIALIST IST05 CAREER-PATH
GIS
IGI03P STATE GIS ANALYST IST07 CAREER-PATH
IGI02P SENIOR GIS ANALYST IST06 CAREER-PATH
IGI01P GIS ANALYST IST05 CAREER-PATH
IT ADMINISTRATION
IIA03C CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER III IST14 COMPETITIVE
IIA02C CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER II IST12 COMPETITIVE
IIA04C IT ADMINISTRATOR IST12 COMPETITIVE
IIA05C IT DIVISION MANAGER IST12 COMPETITIVE
IIA01C CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER I IST10 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
IIA06C IT MANAGER IST10 COMPETITIVE
IT PROJECT MANAGEMENT
IIP03P IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER IST10 CAREER-PATH
IIP02P IT PROJECT MANAGER IST08 CAREER-PATH
IIP01P IT PROJECT COORDINATOR IST06 CAREER-PATH
IT SECURITY
IIE01C CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER IST12 COMPETITIVE
IIE04C IT SECURITY EXPERT IST10 COMPETITIVE
IIE05C IT SECURITY MANAGER IST09 COMPETITIVE
IIE06P IT SECURITY SUPERVISOR IST08 CAREER-PATH
IIE03P IT SECURITY ANALYST II IST07 CAREER-PATH
IIE02P IT SECURITY ANALYST I IST06 CAREER-PATH
INFRASTRUCTURE SUPPORT
IIS05C IT INFRASTRUCTURE ARCHITECT IST11 COMPETITIVE
IIS07C IT INFRASTRUCTURE ENGINEER IST10 COMPETITIVE
IIS11P IT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST09 CAREER-PATH
IIS01P IT COORDINATOR IST08 CAREER-PATH
IIS02P IT DISASTER RECOVERY ANALYST IST08 CAREER-PATH
IIS03P IT DISASTER RECOVERY SPECIALIST IST05 CAREER-PATH
IIS08C IT INFRASTRUCTURE MANAGER IST11 COMPETITIVE
IIS10C IT INFRASTRUCTURE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST10 COMPETITIVE
IIS06P IT INFRASTRUCTURE COORDINATOR IST08 CAREER-PATH
IIS04P IT INFRASTRUCTURE ANALYST IST06 CAREER-PATH
IIS09P IT INFRASTRUCTURE SPECIALIST IST04 CAREER-PATH
STATE IT
ISI01C STATE CHIEF DATA OFFICER IST15 COMPETITIVE
ISI02C STATE IT SECURITY OFFICER IST15 COMPETITIVE
ISI03C STATE SYSTEMS EXPERT IST11 COMPETITIVE
USER SUPPORT
IUS03C USER SUPPORT MANAGER IST07 COMPETITIVE
IUS05P USER SUPPORT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT IST06 CAREER-PATH
IUS02P USER SUPPORT COORDINATOR IST05 CAREER-PATH
IUS01P USER SUPPORT ANALYST IST04 CAREER-PATH
IUS04P USER SUPPORT SPECIALIST IST02 CAREER-PATH
INSPECTORS & INVESTIGATORS
ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH IEH03P ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR/EXP
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SGS09 CAREER-PATH
IEH02P ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSPECTOR II SGS08 CAREER-PATH
IEH01P ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH INSPECTOR I SGS07 CAREER-PATH
FIRING RANGE
IFR02P FIRING RANGE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
IFR01P FIRING RANGE SPECIALIST SGS03 CAREER-PATH
INSPECTORS
IIN04C INSPECTOR MANAGER SGS08 COMPETITIVE
IIN05P INSPECTOR SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
IIN03P INSPECTOR III SGS06 CAREER-PATH
IIN02P INSPECTOR II SGS05 CAREER-PATH
IIN01P INSPECTOR I SGS04 CAREER-PATH
INVESTIGATORS
IIV01C INVESTIGATIONS MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
IIV06P MITIGATION INVESTIGATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
IIV05P INVESTIGATOR SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
IIV04P INVESTIGATOR III SGS06 CAREER-PATH
IIV03P INVESTIGATOR II SGS05 CAREER-PATH
IIV02P INVESTIGATOR I SGS04 CAREER-PATH
LABOR PROGRAMS MANAGEMENT
ILP06C WORKERS COMP CEO SPC10 COMPETITIVE
ILP05C WORKERS COMP ASST CEO SPC09 COMPETITIVE
ILP02C LABOR & LICENSING DIVISION DIRECTOR II SPC05 COMPETITIVE
ILP07C WORKERS COMP DIVISION MANAGER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
ILP01C LABOR & LICENSING DIVISION DIRECTOR I SGS07 COMPETITIVE
ILP03P LABOR MEDIATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
ILP04I REAL ESTATE ANALYST SGS06 INDEPENDENT
LEGAL SUPPORT
ILS01I COURT REPORTER SGS08 INDEPENDENT
ILS03I LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST SGS06 INDEPENDENT
ILS04I RULES & REGULATIONS COORDINATOR SGS08 INDEPENDENT
ILS02I HEARING OFFICER SGS06 INDEPENDENT
MILITARY PROGRAMS MANAGEMENT
IMP02C MILITARY PROGRAM MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
IMP04P MILITARY PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
IMP01P MILITARY PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
IMP03P MILITARY PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
MILITARY SPECIAL PROGRAMS
IMS01P ITAM COORDINATOR SGS08 CAREER-PATH
IMS02P LRAM COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
IMS03P RTLA COORDINATOR SGS03 CAREER-PATH
LEGAL
ATTORNEYS
LAT02C APPEALS TRIBUNAL CHAIRMAN SPC10 COMPETITIVE
LAT06C ATTORNEY IV SPC09 COMPETITIVE
LAT07C CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SPC09 COMPETITIVE
LAT08C CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL I SPC10 COMPETITIVE
LAT01C ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SPC08 COMPETITIVE
LAT05P ATTORNEY III SPC08 CAREER-PATH
LAT04P ATTORNEY II SPC05 CAREER-PATH
LAT03P ATTORNEY I SPC03 CAREER-PATH
PUBLIC DEFENDERS
LPD02C CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER II SPC10 COMPETITIVE
LPD01C CHIEF PUBLIC DEFENDER I SPC09 COMPETITIVE
LPD05P PUBLIC DEFENDER III SPC08 CAREER-PATH
LPD04P PUBLIC DEFENDER II SPC05 CAREER-PATH
LPD03P PUBLIC DEFENDER I SPC03 CAREER-PATH
LOTTERY
LOTTERY
LLO13C OAL DIRECTOR EXE02 COMPETITIVE
LLO16C OAL GAMING DIRECTOR EXE01 COMPETITIVE
LLO05P OAL CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL SPC09 CAREER-PATH
LLO18P OAL INTERNAL AUDITOR SPC09 CAREER-PATH
LLO04P OAL CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER SPC09 CAREER-PATH
LLO12P OAL DIR SECURITY & COMPLIANCE SPC07 CAREER-PATH
LLO10P OAL CONTROLLER SPC06 CAREER-PATH
LLO38P OAL TREASURER SPC06 CAREER-PATH
LLO24P OAL MARKETING & ADVERTISING DIR SPC07 CAREER-PATH
LLO34P OAL SECURITY DEPUTY DIR SPC04 CAREER-PATH
LLO01P OAL ACCOUNTANT SPC02 CAREER-PATH
LLO11P OAL DEPUTY IT GAMING DIRECTOR IST10 CAREER-PATH
LLO37P OAL SR. DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR IST08 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
LLO30P OAL QA SYSTEMS ANALYST IST06 CAREER-PATH
LLO19P OAL IT SECURITY ANALYST IST06 CAREER-PATH
LLO02P OAL APPLICATION SUPP SPECIALIST IST05 CAREER-PATH
LLO21P OAL LEAD COMPUTER OPERATOR IST03 CAREER-PATH
LLO09P OAL COMPUTER OPERATOR IST01 CAREER-PATH
LLO33P OAL SALES DIRECTOR SPC07 CAREER-PATH
LLO20P OAL KEY CHAIN ACCOUNT MANAGER SGS10 CAREER-PATH
LLO28P OAL PRODUCT MANAGER SGS10 CAREER-PATH
LLO32P OAL REGIONAL SALES MANAGER SGS10 CAREER-PATH
LLO14P OAL FINANCIAL ANALYST SGS09 CAREER-PATH
LLO26P OAL OFFICE CAMPAIGN COORDINATOR SGS09 CAREER-PATH
LLO08P OAL COLLECTIONS SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
LLO03P OAL AUDITOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
LLO17P OAL GRAPHIC SPECIALIST SGS07 CAREER-PATH
LLO07P OAL CLAIMS CENTER MANAGER SGS06 CAREER-PATH
LLO36P OAL SENIOR SECURITY SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
LLO22P OAL LICENSING MANAGER SGS05 CAREER-PATH
LLO25P OAL MARKETING SALES REP SGS05 CAREER-PATH
LLO27P OAL OFFICE COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
LLO15P OAL FISCAL SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
LLO23P OAL LICENSING SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
LLO29P OAL PUBLICATION SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
LLO35P OAL SECURITY SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
LLO06P OAL CLAIMS ASSISTANT SGS03 CAREER-PATH
LLO31P OAL RECEPTIONIST SGS03 CAREER-PATH
MEDICAL
DENTAL
MDE01I DENTIST MED09 INDEPENDENT
DIETETICS
MDI02P DIETICIAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED06 CAREER-PATH
MDI03P REGISTERED DIETICIAN MED05 CAREER-PATH
MDI01P DIETICIAN MED03 CAREER-PATH
DISABILITY MEDICAL
MDM01C DISABILITY CHIEF PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MED14 COMPETITIVE
MDM05P DISABILITY SENIOR PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MED12 CAREER-PATH
MDM03P DISABILITY PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MED11 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
MDM02P DISABILITY PHYSICIAN CONSULTANT MED10 CAREER-PATH
MDM04P DISABILITY PSYCHOLOGIST MED09 CAREER-PATH
HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
MHA04C STATE HEALTH DIRECTOR MED16 COMPETITIVE
MHA03C NURSING HOME DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
MHA01C NURSING HOME ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
MHA02C NURSING HOME ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR SPC06 COMPETITIVE
HEALTH SCIENTIST
MHS03C STATE HEALTH SCIENTIST SPC10 COMPETITIVE
MHS02P RADIOLOGICAL PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04 CAREER-PATH
MHS01P RADIOLOGICAL PROGRAM SPECIALIST SPC02 CAREER-PATH
LICENSED MEDICAL PROFESSIONALS
MLM08C STATE HOSPITAL ADMINISTRATOR MED12 COMPETITIVE
MLM01C AUDIOLOGIST MED07 COMPETITIVE
MLM03C OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST MED07 COMPETITIVE
MLM05C PHYSICAL THERAPIST MED07 COMPETITIVE
MLM07C SPEECH PATHOLOGIST MED07 COMPETITIVE
MLM06C RESPIRATORY THERAPIST MED04 COMPETITIVE
MLM02C MEDICAL TECHNOLOGIST MED04 COMPETITIVE
MLM04P PHLEBOTOMIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
NURSES
MNU05C NURSING ADMINISTRATOR MED08 COMPETITIVE
MNU07C REGISTERED NURSE MANAGER MED07 COMPETITIVE
MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER MED08 CAREER-PATH
MNU03P NURSE INSTRUCTOR MED06 CAREER-PATH
MNU08P REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED06 CAREER-PATH
MNU06P REGISTERED NURSE MED05 CAREER-PATH
MNU02P LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED03 CAREER-PATH
MNU01P LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE MED02 CAREER-PATH
PHARMACISTS
MPA02C PHARMACY BOARD ADMINISTRATOR MED11 COMPETITIVE
MPA04C PHARMACY MANAGER MED10 COMPETITIVE
MPA03P PHARMACY INSPECTOR MED09 CAREER-PATH
MPA01P PHARMACIST MED09 CAREER-PATH
PHYSICIANS
SFO01C CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER MED16 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
MPH01C DEPUTY MEDICAL EXAMINER MED15 COMPETITIVE
SFO02C CRIME LAB MEDICAL EXAMINER MED14 COMPETITIVE
MPH04P PHYSICIAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED14 CAREER-PATH
MPH02P PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST MED12 CAREER-PATH
MPH03P PHYSICIAN MED10 CAREER-PATH
PSYCHOLOGISTS
MPS04P PSYCHOLOGIST II MED09 CAREER-PATH
MPS03P PSYCHOLOGIST I MED08 CAREER-PATH
MPS02P PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAMINER MED03 CAREER-PATH
MPS01P PSYCHOLOGICAL EVALUATOR SGS03 CAREER-PATH
REHABILITATION
MRE01C REHABILITATION ADMINISTRATOR MED06 COMPETITIVE
MRE04C REHABILITATION MANAGER MED05 COMPETITIVE
MRE05P REHABILITATION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT MED04 CAREER-PATH
MRE06P VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION COUNSELOR MED04 CAREER-PATH
MRE02P REHABILITATION COORDINATOR MED02 CAREER-PATH
MRE03P REHABILITATION INSTRUCTOR MED02 CAREER-PATH
VETERINARY
MVE01C STATE VETERINARIAN MED10 COMPETITIVE
MVE03P VETERINARY SPECIALIST MED09 CAREER-PATH
MVE02P VETERINARIAN MED08 CAREER-PATH
PROCUREMENT
PROCUREMENT
PPR03C PROCUREMENT MANAGER SGS10 COMPETITIVE
PPR05P PROCUREMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PPR02P PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PPR01P PROCUREMENT ANALYST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PPR04P PROCUREMENT SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
STATE PROCUREMENT
PSP02C STATE PROCUREMENT MANAGER SPC04 COMPETITIVE
PSP01P STATE PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR SPC03 CAREER-PATH
PSP03P STATE PROCUREMENT SPECIALIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
PROGRAM OPERATIONS
ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT
PAS13C POLICY COORDINATOR SGS05 COMPETITIVE
PAS06I CAREER PLACEMENT SPECIALIST SGS04 INDEPENDENT
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PAS05I CALL CENTER SPECIALIST SGS02 INDEPENDENT
PAS09P LICENSING COORDINATOR SGS03 CAREER-PATH
PAS10P LICENSING SPECIALIST SGS02 CAREER-PATH
PAS08I EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT SGS07 INDEPENDENT
PAS07I COUNTY ADMINISTRATIVE SUPERVISOR SGS04 INDEPENDENT
PAS04C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPERVISOR SGS06 COMPETITIVE
PAS01P ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
PAS02P ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR SGS04 CAREER-PATH
PAS03P ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST SGS02 CAREER-PATH
PAS12P MAILROOM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS02 CAREER-PATH
PAS11P MAILROOM SPECIALIST SGS01 CAREER-PATH
PAS15P RECORDS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PAS14P RECORDS COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
AGRICULTURE PROGRAMS
PAG01C AGRICULTURE DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PAG02C AGRICULTURE DIVISION MANAGER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
PAG03C AGRICULTURE DIVISION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC03 COMPETITIVE
PAG10C FORESTER MANAGER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
PAG07C DISTRICT FORESTER SPC03 COMPETITIVE
PAG09P FORESTER SPC01 CAREER-PATH
PAG08P FARM SCHOOL COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PAG05P AGRICULTURE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PAG04P AGRICULTURE PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PAG06P AGRICULTURE UNIT COORDINATOR SGS04 CAREER-PATH
PAG11P FORESTRY TECHNICIAN SGS02 CAREER-PATH
AVIATION
PAV02P PILOT SPC08 CAREER-PATH
PAV01P AVIATION MANAGER SPC07 CAREER-PATH
BOARDS & COMMISSIONS DIRECTOR
PBC01C CLAIMS COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PBC03C ELECTION COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PBC05C ETHICS COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PBC06C JDDC DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PBC02A CLAIMS COMMISSIONER SGS09 APPOINTED
PBC04A ELECTION COORDINATOR SGS08 APPOINTED
CLAIMS ADMINISTRATION
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PCA02C CLAIMS MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
PCA03P CLAIMS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PCA01P CLAIMS COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PCA04P WORKERS COMP COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
CLAIMS REVIEW
PCR03P CLAIMS REVIEW SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PCR01P CLAIMS REVIEW ANALYST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
PCR02P CLAIMS REVIEW SPECIALIST SGS03 CAREER-PATH
COMMERCE PROGRAM MANAGEMENT
PPE06C INSURANCE DEPUTY COMMISSIONER SPC10 COMPETITIVE
PPE03C DEPUTY SECURITIES COMMISSIONER SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PPE10C PUBLIC EMPLOYEES CLAIMS MANAGER SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PPE12C STUDENT LOAN DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PPE14C WORKFORCE DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PPE04C ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PPE01C AERONAUTICS DIRECTOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PPE11C RURAL SERVICES DIRECTOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
PPE13C WATERWAYS COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC04 COMPETITIVE
PPE02C BURIAL ASSOCIATION BOARD COORDINATOR SGS08 COMPETITIVE
COMMERCE PROGRAMS
PCO02C COMMERCE PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
PCO04P COMMERCE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PCO01P COMMERCE PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PCO03P COMMERCE PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PCO05P TAX SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
CHILD SUPPORT
PCS02P CHILD SUPPORT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
PCS01P CHILD SUPPORT SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
DATA/RESEARCH
PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANALYST SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PDA02P DATA/RESEARCH SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
DISABILITY
PDI09C DISABILITY DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PDI08C DISABILITY DIVISION DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PDI11C DISABILITY PROFESSIONAL RELATIONS MANAGER SGS11 COMPETITIVE
PDI13C DISABILITY UNIT MANAGER SGS11 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PDI10C DISABILITY HEARING OFFICER SGS10 COMPETITIVE
PDI12C DISABILITY QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR SGS10 COMPETITIVE
PDI14C DISABILITY UNIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10 COMPETITIVE
PDI05C DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR V SGS10 COMPETITIVE
PDI04P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR IV SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PDI03P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR III SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PDI02P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR II SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PDI01P DISABILITY ADJUDICATOR I SGS05 CAREER-PATH
PDI07P DISABILITY CLAIMS SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
PDI06P DISABILITY CLAIMS ASSISTANT SGS03 CAREER-PATH
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
PED04P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07 CAREER-PATH
PED02P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECT CONSULTANT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
PED01P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR SPC04 CAREER-PATH
PED03P ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST SPC02 CAREER-PATH
ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM MANAGEMENT
PEM05C PRODUCTION AND CONSERVATION DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PEM02C ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PEM01C E & E ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
PEM03C ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
PEM04C LP GAS BOARD DIRECTOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAMS
PEP03P ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS09 CAREER-PATH
PEP02P ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PEP01P CONSERVATION SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
HEALTH PROGRAMS MANAGEMENT
PHP06C HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PHP07C MEDICAL BOARD DIRECTOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PHP08C MINORITY HEALTH COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PHP04C HEALTH CENTER MANAGER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
PHP02C HEALTH BOARD DIRECTOR II SPC04 COMPETITIVE
PHP03C HEALTH BRANCH MANAGER SPC04 COMPETITIVE
PHP05C HEALTH DISTRICT MANAGER SPC03 COMPETITIVE
PHP09C PUBLIC HEALTH SECTION CHIEF SPC03 COMPETITIVE
PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIRECTOR I SGS06 COMPETITIVE
HEALTH SPECIALTIES
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PHS02I CERTIFIED TUMOR REGISTRAR SPC02 INDEPENDENT
PHS09C HEALTH UNIT ADMINISTRATOR SGS09 COMPETITIVE
PHS10P HEALTH UNIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PHS03P CONSUMER SCIENCE SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PHS06C HEALTH PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
PHS08P HEALTH PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PHS05P HEALTH PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PHS07P HEALTH PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PHS01P CERTIFIED HEALTH EDUCATOR MED02 CAREER-PATH
PHS04P HEALTH EDUCATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
INSURANCE COMPLIANCE
PIC01I INSURANCE COMPLIANCE OFFICER SGS06 INDEPENDENT
PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY
PPE04P PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PPE01P FIELD OFFICE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PPE02P PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST I SGS05 CAREER-PATH
PPE03P PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST II SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PUBLIC BROADCASTING MANAGEMENT
PPB01C AR PBS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PPB02C AR PBS DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
PUBLIC FINANCE
PPF02P PUBLIC FINANCE OFFICER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07 CAREER-PATH
PPF01P PUBLIC FINANCE OFFICER SPC05 CAREER-PATH
PUBLIC SERVICE UTILITY REGULATION
PPU04C PUBLIC SERVICE DIVISION DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PPU03I PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04 INDEPENDENT
PPU05I PUBLIC SERVICE VALUATION SPECIALIST SGS04 INDEPENDENT
PPU02P PIPELINE SAFETY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10 CAREER-PATH
PPU01P PIPELINE SAFETY COORDINATOR SGS08 CAREER-PATH
QUALITY ASSURANCE
PQA02C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
PQA04P QUALITY ASSURANCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PQA01P QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PQA03P QUALITY ASSURANCE SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
RESEARCH & QUALITY ASSURANCE
PRQ01C RESEARCH AND PLANNING DIRECTOR SPC06 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
RESIDENTIAL CARE
PRC02C RESIDENTIAL SERVICES MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
PRC07C RESIDENTIAL CARE MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
PRC06C RESIDENTIAL CARE TEAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 COMPETITIVE
PRC05P RESIDENTIAL CARE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS04 CAREER-PATH
PRC03P RESIDENTIAL CARE COORDINATOR SGS02 CAREER-PATH
PRC04P RESIDENTIAL CARE SPECIALIST SGS01 CAREER-PATH
PRC01P HEALTH AIDE SGS01 CAREER-PATH
RETIREMENT
PRE06C RETIREMENT SYSTEM INVESTMENT DIRECTOR SPC10 COMPETITIVE
PRE03C RETIREMENT SYSTEM ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PRE05C RETIREMENT SYSTEM DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PRE07P RETIREMENT SYSTEM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PRE04P RETIREMENT SYSTEM COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PRE02P RETIREMENT COUNSELOR II SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PRE01P RETIREMENT COUNSELOR I SGS05 CAREER-PATH
REVENUE PROGRAMS
PRP01C ASSESSMENT COORDINATION DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PRP03C DFA ASSISTANT DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PRP07P REVENUE DIVISION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC07 CAREER-PATH
PRP14P STATE INFRASTRUCTURE COORDINATOR SPC07 CAREER-PATH
PRP13C STATE ECONOMIST SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PRP09P REVENUE PROGRAM COORDINATOR SPC03 CAREER-PATH
PRP10C REVENUE REGIONAL MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
PRP08C REVENUE MANAGER SGS08 COMPETITIVE
PRP05P PROPERTY ASSESSMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
PRP04P PROPERTY ASSESSMENT SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PRP12P REVENUE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PRP06P REVENUE COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
PRP11P REVENUE SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
PRP02P CUSTOMER SERVICE SPECIALIST SGS03 CAREER-PATH
RISK MANAGEMENT
PRM02C RISK MANAGEMENT MANAGER SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PRM03P RISK MANAGEMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05 CAREER-PATH
PRM01P RISK CONSULTANT SPC01 CAREER-PATH
SHARED SERVICES PROGRAMS
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PSS01C TSS CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER SPC09 COMPETITIVE
PSS02C TSS DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
PSS05C TSS PROGRAM MANAGER SPC07 COMPETITIVE
PSS03C TSS DIVISION MANAGER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
PSS06P TSS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS10 CAREER-PATH
PSS04P TSS PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
TAX AUDITORS
PTA01P TAX AUDIT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
PTA03P TAX AUDITOR II SPC04 CAREER-PATH
PTA02P TAX AUDITOR I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
VETERANS CEMETERY
PVC02C CEMETERY SERVICE ADMINISTRATOR SGS12 COMPETITIVE
PVC01C CEMETERY MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
VETERANS SERVICES
PVS01C VETERANS SERVICE ADMINISTRATOR SGS12 COMPETITIVE
PVS03P VETERANS SERVICE OFFICER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
PVS02P VETERANS SERVICE OFFICER SGS07 CAREER-PATH
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
PWD04P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
PWD02P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROJECT CONSULTANT SPC05 CAREER-PATH
PWD01P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR SPC03 CAREER-PATH
PWD03P WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
RECREATION & HOSPITALITY
MUSEUMS & ARCHIVES
RMA05C HERITAGE DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
RMA07C HERITAGE MANAGER II SPC04 COMPETITIVE
RMA06C HERITAGE MANAGER I SPC03 COMPETITIVE
RMA10I MUSEUM COORDINATOR SPC02 INDEPENDENT
RMA03I CURATOR SPC01 INDEPENDENT
RMA12P MUSEUM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
RMA02P ARCHIVIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
RMA04P EXHIBIT COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RMA08P HISTORIAN SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RMA09P HISTORIC PROPERTY COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RMA01P ARCHIVAL ASSISTANT SGS03 CAREER-PATH
RMA11P MUSEUM SPECIALIST SGS02 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
PARKS
RPA02C ASSISTANT PARK DIRECTOR SPC07 COMPETITIVE
RPA08C PARK ADMINISTRATOR SGS12 COMPETITIVE
RPA09C PARK AREA MANAGER SGS11 COMPETITIVE
RPA13C PARK MANAGER SGS11 COMPETITIVE
RPA20C PARK SUPERINTENDENT IV SGS10 COMPETITIVE
RPA19C PARK SUPERINTENDENT III SGS09 COMPETITIVE
RPA18C PARK SUPERINTENDENT II SGS08 COMPETITIVE
RPA17C PARK SUPERINTENDENT I SGS06 COMPETITIVE
RPA21P PARK SUPERINTENDENT TRAINEE SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RPA25P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM PROGRAM SUPV/EXP SGS08 CAREER-PATH
RPA24P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
RPA03P GIFT SHOP SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RPA07C OUTDOOR RECREATION DIRECTOR SGS12 COMPETITIVE
RPA14P PARK PLANNER SGS06 CAREER-PATH
RPA15P PARK PLANNER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
RPA10P PARK COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RPA16P PARK SPECIALIST SGS02 CAREER-PATH
RPA04C LODGE MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
RPA01C ASSISTANT LODGE MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
RPA05P LODGE SALES COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RPA06P LODGE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03 CAREER-PATH
RPA23P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM INTERPRETER II SGS05 CAREER-PATH
RPA22P PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM INTERPRETER I SGS04 CAREER-PATH
RPA12P PARK HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03 CAREER-PATH
RPA11P PARK HOUSEKEEPER SGS02 CAREER-PATH
RESTAURANT
RRE01C FOOD & BEVERAGE MANAGER SGS06 COMPETITIVE
RRE02P RESTAURANT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS04 CAREER-PATH
RRE03P SERVER SGS01 CAREER-PATH
TOURISM
RTO02C WELCOME CENTER MANAGER SGS06 COMPETITIVE
RTO03P WELCOME CENTER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS04 CAREER-PATH
RTO01P TRAVEL CONSULTANT SGS02 CAREER-PATH
SAFETY & SECURITY
AGRICULTURE LAW ENFORCEMENT
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SAL03C AGRICULTURE LAW ENFORCEMENT CHIEF LES08 COMPETITIVE
SAL02P AGRICULTURE ENFORCEMENT AGENT II LES04 CAREER-PATH
SAL01P AGRICULTURE ENFORCEMENT AGENT I LES03 CAREER-PATH
SAL06P FOREST RANGER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SAL05P FOREST RANGER II SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SAL04P FOREST RANGER I SGS05 CAREER-PATH
COMMUNITY LAW ENFORCEMENT
SCL01C COMMUNITY SUPERVISION MANAGER LES06 COMPETITIVE
SCL05P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES05 CAREER-PATH
SCL04P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION OFFICER III LES04 CAREER-PATH
SCL03P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION OFFICER II LES03 CAREER-PATH
SCL02P COMMUNITY SUPERVISION OFFICER I LES02 CAREER-PATH
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS
SCO04C CORRECTIONS MAJOR LES07 COMPETITIVE
SCO01C CORRECTIONS CAPTAIN LES06 COMPETITIVE
SCO03C CORRECTIONS LIEUTENANT LES05 COMPETITIVE
SCO06P CORRECTIONS SERGEANT LES04 CAREER-PATH
SCO02P CORRECTIONS CORPORAL LES03 CAREER-PATH
SCO05P CORRECTIONS OFFICER LES02 CAREER-PATH
CORRECTIONS PROGRAMS
SCP07C CORRECTIONS DIVISION DIRECTOR EXE01 COMPETITIVE
SCP06C CORRECTIONS DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
SCP05C CORRECTIONS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR II SPC06 COMPETITIVE
SCP04C CORRECTIONS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR I SPC05 COMPETITIVE
SCP19C POST PRISON TRANSFER BOARD MEMBER SPC08 COMPETITIVE
SCP18C POST PRISON TRANSFER BOARD ADMINISTRATOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
SCP02C ARKANSAS SENTENCING COMMISSION DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
SCP20I REVOCATION HEARING OFFICER SPC05 INDEPENDENT
SCP22C WARDEN II LES11 COMPETITIVE
SCP21C WARDEN I LES10 COMPETITIVE
SCP13C DEPUTY WARDEN II LES09 COMPETITIVE
SCP12C DEPUTY WARDEN I LES08 COMPETITIVE
SCP01I ACCREDITATION SPECIALIST SGS03 INDEPENDENT
SCP09C CORRECTIONS PROGRAM MANAGER SGS10 COMPETITIVE
SCP11P CORRECTIONS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
SCP08P CORRECTIONS PROGRAM COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SCP10P CORRECTIONS PROGRAM SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SCP17P INTAKE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SCP16P INMATE HEARING OFFICER SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SCP15P INMATE GRIEVANCE COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
SCP14P INMATE CLASSIFICATION ANALYST SGS03 CAREER-PATH
SCP03I COMMISSARY COORDINATOR SGS04 INDEPENDENT
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
SEM02C EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
SEM04P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
SEM01P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SEM03P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT SPECIALIST SGS05 CAREER-PATH
SEM05P EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT WATCH OFFICER SGS03 CAREER-PATH
FIREFIGHTERS
SFI05C STATE FIRE MARSHALL SGS09 COMPETITIVE
SFI01C DEPUTY FIRE CHIEF SGS07 COMPETITIVE
SFI04P FIREFIGHTER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SFI03P FIREFIGHTER II SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SFI02P FIREFIGHTER I SGS05 CAREER-PATH
FORENSICS
SFO05P FORENSIC SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05 CAREER-PATH
SFO03P FORENSIC SCIENTIST SPC03 CAREER-PATH
SFO04P FORENSIC SPECIALIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
SFO06P FORENSIC TECHNICIAN SGS05 CAREER-PATH
LAW ENFORCEMENT
SLE01C POLICE CHIEF LES03 COMPETITIVE
SLE03P POLICE OFFICER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES02 CAREER-PATH
SLE02P POLICE OFFICER LES01 CAREER-PATH
INTERNAL AFFAIRS
SIA20C INTERNAL AFFAIRS MANAGER LES05 COMPETITIVE
SIA21P INTERNAL AFFAIRS SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES04 CAREER-PATH
SIA19P INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR LES03 CAREER-PATH
SIA07C CHILD ABUSE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR SGS09 COMPETITIVE
SIA05P CHILD ABUSE INVESTIGATIVE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SIA06P CHILD ABUSE INVESTIGATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SIA08P CHILD ABUSE PROGRAM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
SIA04P CHILD ABUSE HOTLINE REPRESENTATIVE SGS04 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SIA03P CERTIFIED DOG HANDLER COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SIA02P CERTIFIED DOG HANDLER SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SIA09P CRIMINAL DETENTION FACILITIES COORDINATOR SGS09 CAREER-PATH
SIA18P INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER SGS04 CAREER-PATH
SIA11P CRIMINAL INTELLIGENCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SIA10P CRIMINAL INTELLIGENCE ANALYST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SIA01P CDL EXAMINER SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SIA14P DRIVER LICENSE COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SIA16P DRIVER LICENSE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
SIA15P DRIVER LICENSE EXAMINER SGS04 CAREER-PATH
SIA13P DISPATCHER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SIA12P DISPATCHER SGS05 CAREER-PATH
SIA23P PUBLIC SAFETY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
SIA22P PUBLIC SAFETY COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SIA17P FINGERPRINT TECHNICIAN SGS04 CAREER-PATH
PARK LAW ENFORCEMENT
SPL01C PARK LIEUTENANT COLONEL LES07 COMPETITIVE
SPL02C PARK MAJOR LES06 COMPETITIVE
SPL04C PARK SERGEANT LES04 COMPETITIVE
SPL03P PARK RANGER LES03 CAREER-PATH
PUBLIC SAFETY SUPPORT
SPS05C PUBLIC SAFETY DEPUTY DIRECTOR SPC06 COMPETITIVE
SPS06C PUBLIC SAFETY PROGRAM MANAGER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
SPS01C CLEST DIRECTOR LES11 COMPETITIVE
SPS04P LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING SUPERVISOR/EXPERT LES06 CAREER-PATH
SPS07P SENIOR LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING OFFICER LES05 CAREER-PATH
SPS03P LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING OFFICER LES04 CAREER-PATH
SPS02P CORRECTIONS TRAINING OFFICER LES03 CAREER-PATH
REGULATORY LAW ENFORCEMENT
SRL04C REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT ADMINISTRATOR SPC10 COMPETITIVE
SRL05C REGULATORY ENFORCEMENT MANAGER LES10 COMPETITIVE
SRL03P ENFORCEMENT AGENT III LES05 CAREER-PATH
SRL02P ENFORCEMENT AGENT II LES04 CAREER-PATH
SRL01P ENFORCEMENT AGENT I LES03 CAREER-PATH
SECURITY
SSE02C SECURITY MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SSE03P SECURITY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SSE01P SECURITY GUARD SGS03 CAREER-PATH
STATE POLICE
SPO04C ASP LIEUTENANT COLONEL LES12 COMPETITIVE
SPO05C ASP MAJOR LES11 COMPETITIVE
SPO01C ASP CAPTAIN LES10 COMPETITIVE
SPO03C ASP LIEUTENANT LES09 COMPETITIVE
SPO06C ASP SERGEANT LES08 COMPETITIVE
SPO02P ASP CORPORAL LES07 CAREER-PATH
SPO08P ASP TROOPER 1ST CLASS LES06 CAREER-PATH
SPO07P ASP TROOPER LES05 CAREER-PATH
SCIENCES
ARCHITECTS & SURVEYORS
SAS02C MANAGING ARCHITECT SPC09 COMPETITIVE
SAS01I ARCHITECT SPC03 INDEPENDENT
SAS03C STATE SURVEYOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
SAS04I SURVEYOR SPC03 INDEPENDENT
BIOLOGISTS
SBI03P BIOLOGIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04 CAREER-PATH
SBI02P BIOLOGIST II SPC02 CAREER-PATH
SBI01P BIOLOGIST I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
CHEMISTS
SCH03P CHEMIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04 CAREER-PATH
SCH02P CHEMIST II SPC02 CAREER-PATH
SCH01P CHEMIST I SPC01 CAREER-PATH
CONSERVATIONISTS
SCN03P ECOLOGIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC02 CAREER-PATH
SCN02P ECOLOGIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
SCN01I ARCHAEOLOGIST SPC01 INDEPENDENT
ENGINEERS
SEN03C HEALTH ENGINEER DIRECTOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
SEN04C MANAGING ENGINEER SPC07 COMPETITIVE
SEN02P ENGINEER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC06 CAREER-PATH
SEN05P PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER SPC05 CAREER-PATH
SEN01P ENGINEER SPC03 CAREER-PATH
EPIDEMIOLOGY
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SEP02C EPIDEMIOLOGY MANAGER SPC06 COMPETITIVE
SEP03P EPIDEMIOLOGY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC05 CAREER-PATH
SEP01P EPIDEMIOLOGIST SPC04 CAREER-PATH
GEOLOGISTS
SGE04P PETROLEUM GEOLOGIST SPC05 CAREER-PATH
SGE03C MANAGING GEOLOGIST SPC05 COMPETITIVE
SGE02P GEOLOGIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC04 CAREER-PATH
SGE05P PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGIST SPC03 CAREER-PATH
SGE01P GEOLOGIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
LABORATORY
SLA01C LABORATORY DIRECTOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
SLA02C LABORATORY MANAGER SPC05 COMPETITIVE
SLA03P LABORATORY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC03 CAREER-PATH
SLA06P LABORATORY TECHNICIAN III SGS08 CAREER-PATH
SLA05P LABORATORY TECHNICIAN II SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SLA04P LABORATORY TECHNICIAN I SGS06 CAREER-PATH
PHYSICISTS
SPH02P PHYSICIST SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SPC02 CAREER-PATH
SPH01P PHYSICIST SPC01 CAREER-PATH
SOCIAL SERVICES
COUNSELING & MENTAL HEALTH
SCM03P LICENSED CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER SPC03 CAREER-PATH
SCM04P LICENSED MASTER SOCIAL WORKER SPC02 CAREER-PATH
SCM06P LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER SPC01 CAREER-PATH
SCM05P LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR SPC03 CAREER-PATH
SCM02P LICENSED ASSOCIATE COUNSELOR SPC01 CAREER-PATH
SCM07P SCHOOL COUNSELOR SPC01 CAREER-PATH
SCM10P SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
SCM08P SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SCM09P SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SCM01I CHAPLAIN SGS06 INDEPENDENT
SCM12P SUICIDE PREVENTION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SCM11P SUICIDE PREVENTION SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SOCIAL SERVICES PROGRAMS
SSP03C DHS DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR SPC09 COMPETITIVE
SSP07C SOCIAL SERVICES ADMINISTRATOR SPC08 COMPETITIVE
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SSP04C DHS DIVISION MANAGER SPC07 COMPETITIVE
SSP05C FAIR HOUSING DIRECTOR SPC06 COMPETITIVE
SSP02C DEV DISABILITY COUNCIL DIRECTOR SPC05 COMPETITIVE
SSP01C ADULT PUBLIC GUARDIAN ADMINISTRATOR SGS12 COMPETITIVE
SSP09C SOCIAL SERVICES AREA MANAGER SGS11 COMPETITIVE
SSP14C SOCIAL SERVICES COUNTY MANAGER III SGS10 COMPETITIVE
SSP13C SOCIAL SERVICES COUNTY MANAGER II SGS09 COMPETITIVE
SSP12C SOCIAL SERVICES COUNTY MANAGER I SGS08 COMPETITIVE
SSP06I OMBUDSMAN SGS08 INDEPENDENT
SSP15C SOCIAL SERVICES MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
SSP17P SOCIAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
SSP11P SOCIAL SERVICES COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
SSP16P SOCIAL SERVICES SPECIALIST SGS06 CAREER-PATH
SSP08P SOCIAL SERVICES ADVISOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
SSP10P SOCIAL SERVICES ASSISTANT SGS02 CAREER-PATH
TRADES
AGRICULTURAL TRADES
TAG02C FARM MANAGER SGS10 COMPETITIVE
TAG03P FARM SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
TAG01P FARM COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
APPLIED TRADES
TAT07P MECHANIC SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
TAT06P MECHANIC SGS06 CAREER-PATH
TAT04P FLEET COORDINATOR SGS09 CAREER-PATH
TAT11I TRUCK DRIVER SGS06 INDEPENDENT
TAT03I ENGINEERING SPECIALIST SGS05 INDEPENDENT
TAT10I SCHOOL BUS TRAINER SGS05 INDEPENDENT
TAT02I CALIBRATION TECHNICIAN SGS04 INDEPENDENT
TAT05I HEAVY EQUIPMENT OPERATOR SGS04 INDEPENDENT
TAT09P PRINTER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
TAT08P PRINTER SGS04 CAREER-PATH
TAT01I BEAUTICIAN SGS01 INDEPENDENT
CONSTRUCTION
TCO03P CONSTRUCTION PROJECT MANAGER SGS08 CAREER-PATH
TCO04P CONSTRUCTION SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
TCO01P CONSTRUCTION COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
TCO02P CONSTRUCTION PROJECT COORDINATOR SGS06 CAREER-PATH
FACILITY MANAGEMENT
TFM02C FACILITY MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
TFM03P FACILITY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
TFM01P FACILITY COORDINATOR SGS04 CAREER-PATH
FOOD SERVICE
TFS03C FOOD SERVICES MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
TFS04C FOOD SERVICES SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 COMPETITIVE
TFS05P KITCHEN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03 CAREER-PATH
TFS02P FOOD PREPARATION AND SERVICE WORKER SGS02 CAREER-PATH
TFS01P COOK SGS01 CAREER-PATH
GENERAL TRADES
TGT02I COMMERCIAL VEHICLE DRIVER SGS03 INDEPENDENT
TGT01I CASHIER SGS01 INDEPENDENT
TGT03I VETERINARY AIDE SGS01 INDEPENDENT
GOVERNMENT CAREER DEVELOPMENT
TGC01I PROFESSIONAL APPRENTICE SGS05 INDEPENDENT
TGC02I PUBLIC SERVICE INTERN SGS01 INDEPENDENT
GROUNDSKEEPING
TGR02P LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS03 CAREER-PATH
TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORDINATOR SGS02 CAREER-PATH
HEALTH TRADES
THT02I DENTAL ASSISTANT SGS04 INDEPENDENT
THT03I LACTATION SPECIALIST SGS04 INDEPENDENT
THT01I CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT SGS03 INDEPENDENT
THT04I PHARMACY TECHNICIAN SGS02 INDEPENDENT
HOUSEKEEPING
THO02P HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS02 CAREER-PATH
THO01P HOUSEKEEPER SGS01 CAREER-PATH
INDUSTRIAL SAFETY
TIS02P INDUSTRIAL SAFETY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS09 CAREER-PATH
TIS01P INDUSTRIAL SAFETY COORDINATOR SGS07 CAREER-PATH
INVENTORY & WAREHOUSE
TIW05C MARKETING & REDISTRIBUTION MANAGER SGS09 COMPETITIVE
TIW02P INVENTORY MANAGER SGS06 CAREER-PATH
TIW04P INVENTORY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
TIW01P INVENTORY COORDINATOR SGS04 CAREER-PATH
TIW03P INVENTORY SPECIALIST SGS03 CAREER-PATH

TIW07P SURPLUS PROPERTY SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
TIW06P SURPLUS PROPERTY AGENT SGS05 CAREER-PATH
MAINTENANCE
TMA02C MAINTENANCE MANAGER SGS07 COMPETITIVE
TMA04P MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS06 CAREER-PATH
TMA01P MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR SGS05 CAREER-PATH
TMA03P MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
TMA05P MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN SGS03 CAREER-PATH
SKILLED TRADES
TST03P LICENSED TRADESMAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS08 CAREER-PATH
TST02P LICENSED TRADESMAN SGS07 CAREER-PATH
TST05P SKILLED TRADESMAN SUPERVISOR/EXPERT SGS07 CAREER-PATH
TST04P SKILLED TRADESMAN SGS06 CAREER-PATH
TST06P TRADES APPRENTICE SGS05 CAREER-PATH
TST07P TRADES SPECIALIST SGS04 CAREER-PATH
TST01P GENERAL LABORER SGS01 CAREER-PATH
(2) The Office of Personnel Management may approve an adjustment
in the classification of a position within the same job series after the
secretary of the requesting cabinet-level department or the requesting agency
director has demonstrated that the:
(A)(i) Employee has satisfied the eligibility criteria as
established by the office.
(ii) The office shall submit the eligibility
criteria under subdivision (c)(2)(A)(i) of this section for review by the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal
session, or extraordinary session, the Joint Budget Committee; and
(B) Employee's satisfactory performance justifies the
change in classification.
(3) An adjustment approved under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section shall not exceed the highest graded classification designated as
career-path within the job series.
(4) The office shall file a report of job series adjustments
approved under this subsection (c) with the Legislative Council or, if the
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary
session, the Joint Budget Committee, for review at the next regularly
scheduled meeting following the approval.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 21-5-209 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-209. Compensation plan.
(a) There is established for state agencies covered by this subchapter
a compensation plan for the setting of salaries and salary increases, when
deserved, of all employees serving in positions covered by this subchapter.
(b) An employee whose salary falls below the entry pay level for the
grade assigned to his or her classification may be adjusted to the entry pay
level if approved by the Office of Personnel Management.
(b)(1)(c)(1) No employee shall be paid at a rate of pay higher than
the maximum pay level in the grade assigned to his or her class unless
otherwise provided for in this subchapter.
(2) However, an employee presently employed in a position who is
being paid at a rate in excess of the maximum for his or her assigned grade
may continue to receive his or her rate of pay.
(c)(d) It is the specific intent of the General Assembly to authorize,
in the enactment of the compensation plans, rates of pay for each of the
appropriate grades assigned to a class, but it is not the intent that any pay
increases shall be automatic or that any employee shall have a claim or a
right to pay increases unless the department head of the state agency
determines that the employee, by experience, ability, and work performance,
is eligible for the increase in pay authorized for the appropriate rate.
(d)(e) Pay levels established in this subchapter are for compensation
management purposes and are not to be construed as a contract, right, or
other expectation of actual employee salary determination.
(e)(1)(f)(1) The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized
for the General Salaries State Government Services pay table effective July
1, 2024 2025, and thereafter, for the state service for all positions of
state agencies covered by this subchapter to which a classification title and
General Salaries State Government Services salary grade have been assigned in
accordance with this subchapter and the appropriation act of the state
agency:
GRADE MINIMUM MIDPOINT MAXIMUM
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SGS01 $33,280 $41,267 $49,254
SGS02 $35,610 $44,157 $52,703
SGS03 $39,171 $48,572 $57,973
SGS04 $43,088 $53,429 $63,770
SGS05 $47,397 $58,773 $70,148
SGS06 $52,137 $64,650 $77,163
SGS07 $57,351 $71,115 $84,879
SGS08 $63,086 $78,227 $93,367
SGS09 $69,395 $86,050 $102,705
SGS10 $76,335 $94,656 $112,976
SGS11 $83,969 $104,122 $124,274
SGS12 $92,336 $114,534 $136,702

(2) The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized for
the Information Technology Salaries Information Systems and Technology pay
table, effective July 1, 2024 2025, and thereafter, for the state service for
all positions of state agencies covered by this subchapter to which a
classification title and Information Technology Salaries Information Systems
and Technology salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this
subchapter and the appropriation act of the state agency:
GRADE MINIMUM MIDPOINT MAXIMUM
IST01 $41,265 $54,296 $67,327
IST02 $45,392 $59,726 $74,060
IST03 $49,931 $65.699 $81,466
IST04 $54,924 $72,269 $89,613
IST05 $60,416 $79,496 $98,574
IST06 $66,458 $87,446 $108,431
IST07 $73,104 $96,191 $119,274
IST08 $80,414 $105,810 $131,201
IST09 $88,455 $116,391 $144,321
IST10 $97,301 $128,030 $158,753
IST11 $107,031 $140,833 $174,628
IST12 $117,734 $154,916 $192,091
IST13 $129,507 $170,408 $211,300
IST14 $142,458 $187,449 $232,430
IST15 $156,704 $206,194 $255,673
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392

(3) The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized for
the Medical Professional Salaries pay table, effective July 1, 2024 2025, and
thereafter, for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered
by this subchapter to which a classification title and Medical Professional
Salaries salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter
and the appropriation act of the state agency:
GRADE MINIMUM MIDPOINT MAXIMUM
MED01 $47,820 $59,297 $70,774
MED02 $53,558 $66,412 $79,266
MED03 $59,985 $74,381 $88,778
MED04 $67,183 $83,307 $99,431
MED05 $75,245 $93,304 $111,363
MED06 $84,274 $104,500 $124,726
MED07 $94,387 $117,040 $139,693
MED08 $105,713 $131,084 $156,455
MED09 $118,399 $146,815 $175,231
MED10 $132,607 $164,433 $196,258
MED11 $148,520 $184,165 $219,810
MED12 $166,342 $206,264 $246,186
MED13 $186,303 $231,016 $275,728
MED14 $208,659 $258,737 $308,815
MED15 $233,698 $289,786 $345,873
MED16 $261,742 $324,560 $387,378

(4)(A) The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized
for the Law Enforcement and Safety pay table, effective July 1, 2025, and
thereafter, for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered
by this subchapter to which a classification title and Law Enforcement and
Safety salary grade has been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and
the appropriation act of the state agency:
GRADE MINIMUM MIDPOINT MAXIMUM
LES01 $46,223 $57,317 $68,410
LES02 $50,845 $63,049 $75,251
LES03 $55,930 $69,354 $82,776
LES04 $61,523 $76,289 $91,054
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
LES05 $67,675 $83,918 $100,159
LES06 $74,443 $92,310 $110,175
LES07 $81,887 $101,541 $121,193
LES08 $90,076 $111,695 $133,312
LES09 $99,084 $122,865 $146,643
LES10 $108,992 $135,152 $161,307
LES11 $119,891 $148,667 $177,438
LES12 $131,880 $163,534 $195,182
(B)(i) The office may establish a step plan for the Law
Enforcement and Safety pay table under this subdivision (f)(4)(A) after
approval of the step plan by the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session, the
Joint Budget Committee.
(ii) A step plan under subdivision (f)(4)(B)(i) of
this section shall include without limitation:
(a) The percentage increase for each step
advancement; and
(b) The procedures for the administration of
step advancements, including without limitation the requirements necessary
for advancement.
(iii)(a) Determining the maximum number of
employees, the maximum compensation of employees, and the maximum amount of
appropriation of general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by
delineating the maximums in the appropriation act for a state agency and the
general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law.
(b) In light of subdivision (f)(4)(B)(iii)(a)
of this section, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this subdivision (f)(4)(B).
(iii) The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this subdivision
(f)(4)(B). If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this subdivision (f)(4)(B) is void.
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(5) The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized for
the Specialized Services pay table, effective July 1, 2025, and thereafter,
for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered by this
subchapter to which a classification title and Specialized Services salary
grade has been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and the
appropriation act of the state agency:
GRADE MINIMUM MIDPOINT MAXIMUM
SPC01 $58,700 $72,788 $86,876
SPC02 $64,570 $80,067 $95,564
SPC03 $71,027 $88,074 $105,120
SPC04 $78,130 $96,881 $115,632
SPC05 $85,943 $106,569 $127,195
SPC06 $94,537 $117,226 $139,915
SPC07 $103,991 $128,949 $153,907
SPC08 $114,390 $141,844 $169,298
SPC09 $125,829 $156,028 $186,228
SPC10 $138,412 $171,631 $204,851
SPC11 $152,253 $179,659 $207,064

(4)(6) The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized
for the Senior Executive Salaries pay table, effective July 1, 2024 2025, and
thereafter, for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered
by this subchapter to which a classification title and Senior Executive
Salaries salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter
and the appropriation act of the state agency:
GRADE MINIMUM MAXIMUM
EXE01 $141,125 $191,930
EXE02 $155,238 $211,123
EXE03 $170,762 $232,235
EXE04 $187,838 $255,459

(f)(g) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the compensation
plans in this section shall be implemented and function in compliance with
other provisions in this subchapter, the Regular Salary Procedures and
Restrictions Act, §§ 19-4-1601 and 21-5-101, and other fiscal control laws of
this state, when applicable.
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(g)(1)(h)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2)(h)(2) of this
section, a payment of salaries shall not be made except in conformity with
the maximum pay level assigned to these grades for each year as provided in
the appropriation act of the state agency or in this subchapter.
(2)(A) With approval of the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee:
(i) The Governor may establish the salary of an
agency director or a secretary of a cabinet-level department that is up to
fifty percent (50%) above the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the
classification;
(ii) The Office of Personnel Management may
establish the salary of a specialized physician position or classification
that is up to fifty percent (50%) above the maximum pay level for the grade
assigned to the classification; and
(iii) Salaries established by this section may
exceed the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification by
no more than twenty-five percent (25%) for no more than ten percent (10%) of
the positions authorized in the state agency's appropriation act.
(B) It is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee, as provided by this subsection.
(C) The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council
or the Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the
requirement of approval is found unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the entire section is void.
(h)(i) The compensation plan and pay tables shall be reviewed by the
Office of Personnel Management before each regular session of the General
Assembly.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 21-5-210 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-210. Implementation of plan — Changes in class specifications job
descriptions.
(a) For the purposes of implementing the uniform employee
classification and compensation plan for the respective agencies covered by
this subchapter, the General Assembly determines that the class
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
specifications job descriptions prepared by the Office of Personnel
Management in classifying the various positions authorized in the respective
appropriation acts shall be the class specifications job descriptions to be
followed in implementing the respective appropriations for all part-time and
full-time employees of the respective agencies covered by this subchapter.
(b) Changes in class specifications job descriptions may be made in
whole or in part by the Office of Personnel Management.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 21-5-214 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-214. New appointments and other compensation plan provisions.
(a) A new appointment to a position in a state agency covered by this
subchapter shall be paid at the entry pay level for the grade assigned to the
classification unless otherwise authorized by law.
(b) Special rates of pay may be established for either classifications
or positions for the following reasons:
(1) Prevailing labor market conditions Compensation rate
adjustments;
(2) An extraordinarily well-qualified candidate;
(3) The need to retain trained, competent employees;
(4)(3) An employee assigned additional duties as a result of the
elimination of a position by a state agency; or
(5)(4) To meet the requirements of state or federal laws.
(c)(1) A state agency may request a special rate of pay for a specific
classification or position due to prevailing market rates of pay up to the
midpoint pay level of the appropriate grade of a classification on the
appropriate pay table for the assigned grade with the written approval of the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.
(2) A state agency may request a special rate of pay for a
specific classification or position due to prevailing market rates of pay up
to the maximum pay level for the assigned grade only with the approval of the
secretary after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly
is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(3) The Office of Personnel Management shall maintain a register
of classifications or positions for which special rates of pay have been
established due to prevailing market rates of pay.
(4) The office shall file a report of special rates of pay
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
established due to prevailing market rates of pay with the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee, at the next regularly scheduled meeting following the approval.
(d)(1) A special rate of pay may be established for an exceptionally
well-qualified applicant whose educational background or experience qualifies
the applicant to perform the job with little or substantially less
orientation and training than would be required for another qualified
applicant.
(2)(A) An agency director may approve a special rate of pay
under subdivision (d)(1) of this section up to fifteen percent (15%) above
the entry pay level for the grade assigned to the classification and shall
report all actions under the office's procedures.
(B) The office may approve a special rate of pay under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section above fifteen percent (15%) up to forty
percent (40%) above the entry pay level for the grade assigned to the
classification.
(C) The office may approve a special rate of pay pursuant
to subdivision (d)(1) of this section above forty percent (40%) up to the
maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification after review
by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the
Joint Budget Committee.
(3) The office shall file a report of special rates of pay
established under this subsection with the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next
regularly scheduled meeting following the approval.
(c)(1) The Office of Personnel Management may approve a special rate
of pay for a specific classification or position as a compensation rate
adjustment up to forty percent (40%) above the entry pay level for the grade
assigned to the classification.
(2)(A) Following approval by the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary
session, the Joint Budget Committee, the office may approve a special rate of
pay under subdivision (c)(1) of this section exceeding forty percent (40%)
above the entry pay level for the grade assigned to the classification.
(B) A special rate of pay under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of
this section shall not exceed the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
the classification.
(C)(i) Determining the maximum number of employees, the
maximum compensation of employees, and the maximum amount of appropriation of
general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the
prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by
delineating the maximums in the appropriation act for a state agency and the
general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law.
(ii) In light of subdivision (c)(2)(C)(i) of this
section, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this subdivision (c)(2).
(iii) The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this subdivision
(c)(2). If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this subdivision (c)(2) is void.
(3) The office shall:
(A) Maintain a list of classifications or positions for
which a compensation rate adjustment has been established under this
subsection; and
(B) File a report of special rates of pay established due
to compensation rate adjustments with the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary
session, the Joint Budget Committee, for review at the next regularly
scheduled meeting following the approval.
(e)(1)(d)(1)(A) An agency director may approve special rates of pay A
special rate of pay may be established to retain a trained, competent
employee or due to the assignment of additional duties as a result of the
elimination of positions by the state agency, subject to the following:.
(B) Except as provided in subdivision (d)(1)(C) of this
section, a special rate of pay for the assignment of additional duties shall
result in the blocking or freezing of a position by the state agency.
(C) The office may approve a state agency's request not to
block or freeze a position in connection with the approval of a special rate
of pay for the assignment of additional duties if:
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(i) The assignment of additional duties is due to a
newly established federal or state program or new requirements for an
existing federal or state program; and
(ii) The state agency agrees to not hire additional
employees for the additional duties.
(A)(D) The assignment of additional duties shall be
permanent and beyond the scope of work currently being performed by the
employee;.
(B)(E) The same employee may not shall not receive a
special rate of pay pursuant to under this subdivision (e)(1)(d)(1) more than
one (1) time during a biennium every two (2) years;.
(C)(F) An increase for an agency director or a secretary
of a cabinet-level department pursuant to under this subdivision (e)(1)(d)(1)
shall be initiated and approved by the Governor; and.
(D) All increases up to ten percent (10%) approved under
this subdivision (e)(1) shall be reported by the state agency to the office,
and increases above ten percent (10%) shall be approved by the office.
(2) The office shall file a report of all salary increases
established under this subsection with the Legislative Council or, if the
General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next
regularly scheduled meeting following the approval for review.
(f)(1)(A)(e)(1)(A) An employee who is promoted shall is eligible to
receive a salary increase up to ten percent (10%).
(B) However, an employee's rate of pay upon promotion
shall not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the
classification.
(C) The office may establish policies for the
implementation of salary increases due to a promotion after review of the
policies by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in regular
session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
(2) An employee who upon promotion is receiving a rate of pay
below the entry pay level established for the new grade shall be adjusted to
the entry pay level for that grade.
(3) An employee who returns to a position in a classification
the employee formerly occupied within a twelve-month period after promotion
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
from the classification is eligible for a rate of pay no greater than that
for which the employee would have been eligible had the employee remained in
the lower-graded classification.
(g)(1)(A)(i)(f)(1)(A)(i) Upon demotion, an employee's pay shall be
decreased by ten percent (10%).
(ii) A state agency shall submit a request and
receive prior approval from the office to decrease an employee's pay less
than ten percent (10%).
(iii) An employee may voluntarily accept a lower rate
of pay that exceeds a decrease of ten percent (10%).
(B) However, an employee's rate of pay upon demotion shall
not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the classification.
(2) If the employee's salary falls below the lowest entry pay
level of the new grade upon demotion, his or her salary shall be adjusted to
the entry pay level for the grade.
(3) If an employee's position is reclassified to a lower-graded
position or to a position on a different pay table, the state agency may
continue the employee's current rate of pay with the approval of the office.
(h)(1)(g)(1) If an employee accepts a new position that is a transfer,
the employee may receive a change in pay, as follows:
(A) If the employee's salary falls below the entry pay
level of the new grade, then his or her salary shall be adjusted to the entry
pay level for the grade; or
(B) If a special rate of pay has been established pursuant
to this section.
(2) A transferring employee's rate of pay shall not exceed the
maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the new position, unless otherwise
authorized.
(i)(h) An employee whose salary would be above the maximum salary
level of the new grade after being placed in a lower-graded position on the
same pay table because the original position has expired due to lack of
funding, program changes, reorganization, or withdrawal of federal grant
funds may continue to be paid at the same rate as the employee was being paid
in the higher-graded position upon approval of the office after seeking the
review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session,
the Joint Budget Committee.
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(j)(i) If an employee who has been terminated for more than thirty
(30) working days returns to state service, the state agency may offer up to
the employee's last rate of pay not to exceed the maximum pay level
established for the grade.
(k)(j) Upon transfer of employment between state agencies, an employee
is to receive a lump-sum payment from the original state agency for any
overtime that has been accrued and not been paid and for any compensatory
time accrued that has not been used at the higher rate of either the:
(1) Average regular rate of pay received by the employee during
the last three (3) years of his or her employment; or
(2) Final regular rate of pay received by the employee.
(l)(k) Any special rate of pay established under this section shall
not affect the salary level or salary eligibility of any existing employee
within the state agency.
(m)(1)(l)(1) A special rate of pay is subject to the state agency's
ability to certify funding for a special rate of pay established under this
section.
(2) A state agency shall not use merit adjustment funds for a
special rate of pay established under this section.
(n)(m) The secretary of a cabinet-level department, or the Governor,
or the agency director may suspend discretionary special salary actions.
(n)(1) The office may authorize a classification realignment between
legislative sessions to ensure proper classification of a position and
address operation needs not previously anticipated.
(2) A position that receives a classification realignment during
the interim between legislative sessions shall remain at the realigned
classification.
(3) The office shall adopt policies establishing the procedures
for classification realignments.
(o) A state agency may establish an apprenticeship program upon
approval of the office.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 21-5-220(a), concerning shift
differentials, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Upon the approval of the Office of Personnel Management, an
employee whose working hours do not conform to normal state business hours
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
shall be eligible for additional compensation up to twelve percent (12%) of
the hourly rate for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter as a
shift differential if:
(A) The state agency routinely schedules more than one (1)
work shift per day;
(B) The shift to which the employee is assigned is a full
work shift; and
(C) The employee is regularly assigned to the late shift
or is assigned to the shift on a regularly scheduled rotating basis.
(2) An employee assigned to an evening shift shall not receive
additional compensation that exceeds six percent (6%) above that for which he
or she is eligible under this subchapter.
(3) An employee assigned to a night shift shall not receive
additional compensation that exceeds twelve percent (12%) above that for
which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.
(4)(A) An employee at or near the maximum authorized salary
level for the grade assigned to his or her classification may be compensated
at an additional rate not to exceed twelve percent (12%) of his or her
eligible salary under this subchapter.
(B) In those instances in which the granting of the
additional compensation has the effect of temporarily exceeding the maximum
annual rate for the grade assigned to the employee's classification, the
additional compensation shall not be considered as exceeding the maximum
allowable rate for that grade.
(5) The office may adopt policies establishing the differential
percentage increments that are available for each shift.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 21-5-221 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-221. Compensation differentials.
(a) To address specific employee compensation needs not otherwise
provided for in this subchapter, a state agency may pay additional
compensation for current employees in specific positions or for
classifications of positions assigned to a compensation plan authorized by
the General Assembly for one (1) or more compensation differentials.
(b)(1) Authorization for one (1) or more compensation differentials
may be approved if the:
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(A) State agency has documented the need for a
compensation differential for specified positions or classifications;
(B) State agency submits to the Office of Personnel
Management a plan of the terms and conditions for eligibility that must
directly address the needs of the targeted positions or classifications for
any requested compensation differential;
(C) Cost of implementing and maintaining a compensation
differential is within the state agency's existing appropriation and shall
not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs
within the state agency; and
(D) Compensation differential plan has been approved by
the Office of Personnel Management office after review by the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
(2) Any compensation differential authorized under this section
shall be renewed each fiscal year.
(3) The cumulative total of any compensation differentials paid
to an employee shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the employee's
base salary.
(c)(1) Hazardous duty differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be
authorized for the increased risk of personal physical injury for an employee
occupying a certain identified high-risk position if the:
(A) Position classification is determined to be physically
hazardous or dangerous due to location, facility, services provided, or other
factors directly related to the duty assignment of the positions; and
(B) Employee's regularly assigned work schedule exposes
him or her to clear, direct, and unavoidable hazards during at least fifty
percent (50%) of the work time and the employee is not compensated for the
hazardous exposure.
(2)(A) The director of the requesting state agency shall
identify the facility or unit, location, and eligible positions and
classifications within the facility or unit that are identified as high-risk.
(B) The positions shall be certified by the state agency
director as having been assigned to a work environment that poses an
increased risk of personal injury and shall be submitted as part of the plan
for payment of hazardous duty differential to the Office of Personnel
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
Management for approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation
and Shared Services in consultation with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State after review and approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(C) Subsequent changes to the facility or unit, location,
and eligible positions or classifications within the facility or unit on file
with the Office of Personnel Management shall receive prior approval by the
Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services after
review and approval by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is
in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(d) It is the intent of this subsection that hazardous duty
compensation shall be at the discretion of the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services and the director of the state agency and
shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other
programs within the state agency.
(e) An additional ten percent (10%), but not to exceed a total of
twelve percent (12%), hazardous duty differential may be authorized for
employees occupying positions assigned to a maximum security unit or facility
if the work schedules expose employees to clear, direct, and unavoidable
hazards from clients, inmates, or patients who are in units or facilities
that are classified as maximum security.
(f) An employee who is receiving additional compensation for hazardous
duty and then is reassigned to normal duty shall revert on the day of the
reassignment to the rate of pay for which he or she is eligible under this
subchapter.
(g)(1)(c)(1) A An education differential or professional certification
differential of up to ten percent (10%) for job-related education
certifications or professional certifications for individual positions or for
specific classifications within a state agency may be authorized if:
(A) the The education certification or professional
certification is not included as a minimum qualification established for the
classification by the official job description; and
(B) Either:
(i) Attainment of additional education is from an
accredited institution of higher education, documented by official
transcript, certificate, or degree award, and directly related to the
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
predominant purpose and use of the position or classification; or
(A)(ii) From The certification is from a recognized
professional certifying organization and is determined to be directly related
to the predominant purpose and use of the position or classification; and
(B) Not included as a minimum qualification established or
as a special requirement for the classification by the official class
specification.
(2)(A) A professional certification differential may be paid
only while the certification is current and maintained by the employee and
while employed in a position or classification covered by the plan.
(B) Documentation of continuation or renewal of the
certification of the employee is required for continuation of the
certification differential.
(h) An education differential of up to ten percent (10%) for job-
related education for individual positions or for specific classifications
within a state agency may be authorized if:
(1) Attainment of additional education is from an accredited
institution of higher education, documented by official transcript,
certificate, or degree award, and directly related to the predominant purpose
and use of the position or classification; and
(2) The education to be compensated is not included as a special
requirement or minimum qualification established for the classification by
the official class specification.
(i) A geographic area differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be
authorized to address the documented inability to recruit and retain certain
employees in a specific geographic area of the state if the additional
geographic area differential is based on documented recruitment, turnover, or
other competitive pay issue in a specific geographic area but that does not
justify a statewide labor market special entry rate.
(j)(1)(d)(1) A second-language differential of up to ten percent (10%)
may be authorized for an employee who has the demonstrated ability and skill
to communicate in a language other than English, including American Sign
Language, and that skill is determined by the state agency to be directly
related to the effective performance of the job duties for the position
occupied by the employee.
(2) An employee who receives additional compensation under this
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
section and who moves into a position that does not need the skill to
communicate in a language other than English shall revert on the effective
date of the change to the rate of pay that the employee would otherwise
receive.
(k)(1)(e)(1) On-call duty or standby-duty differential may be
authorized for an employee whose job requires him or her to provide services
on nights, weekends, or holidays or other situations when the state agency
does not have regularly scheduled staff coverage.
(2) On-call duty or standby-duty differential is to be used for
officially scheduled duty outside regular work hours during which an employee
is required to be accessible by telephone, pager, or other means and must
return to the designated work site upon notification of need within a
specified response time.
(3)(A) An employee who is required to be available for duty on
nights, weekends, and holidays will be eligible to receive on-call or
standby-duty pay equivalent of an hourly rate not to exceed twenty percent
(20%) of his or her base hourly pay rate for each on-call or standby hour for
not more than forty-eight (48) hours during any seven-day work period.
(B)(i) Compensation shall not be paid to any employee
required to be on-call and standby who fails to respond after the second
notification that his or her services are needed.
(ii) If the equipment or paging device malfunctions,
the penalty shall not apply.
(C)(i) An employee on on-call or standby duty who is
called in to work shall be compensated for the actual hours worked at the
appropriate rate of pay with a minimum of two (2) hours for each call back.
(ii) The employee shall not be paid on-call or
standby pay for hours actually worked during a call back.
(l) If granting additional compensation would have the effect of
exceeding the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the employee's
classification, the additional compensation shall not be considered as
exceeding the maximum allowable rate for that grade.
(f) A hard-to-fill or retain differential up to ten percent (10%) may
be authorized for a position or classification if:
(1) The state agency has certified the inability to recruit and
retain certain employees in a specific geographic area of the state based on
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
documented recruitment, turnover, or other competitive pay issues; or
(2)(A) There is an increased risk of personal physical injury
for an employee occupying a certain identified high-risk position that is
physically hazardous or dangerous.
(B) A position is determined to be physically hazardous or
dangerous:
(i) Due to location, facility, services provided, or
other factors directly related to the duty assignment of the positions; and
(ii) If the employee's regularly assigned work
schedule exposes the employee to clear, direct, and unavoidable hazards
during at least fifty percent (50%) of the work time and the employee is not
otherwise compensated for the hazardous exposure.
(C)(i) The requesting agency director or secretary of a
cabinet-level department shall identify the facility or unit, location, and
eligible positions and classifications within the facility or unit that are
identified as high-risk positions that are physically hazardous or dangerous.
(ii) The positions shall be certified by the agency
director or secretary of a cabinet-level department as having been assigned
to a work environment that poses an increased risk of personal injury and
shall be submitted as part of the plan for payment of a hard-to-fill or
retain differential to the office for approval by the Secretary of the
Department and Transformation and Shared Services in consultation with the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and following approval by the Legislative
Council or, if the General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal session, or
extraordinary session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(iii) Subsequent changes to the facility or unit,
location, and eligible positions or classifications within the facility or
unit on file with the office shall receive prior approval by the Secretary of
the Department of Transformation and Shared Services after approval by the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in regular session, fiscal
session, or extraordinary session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(D) It is the intent of this subsection that hard-to-fill
or retain differentials shall be at the discretion of the Secretary of the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services and shall not be implemented
using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the state
agency.
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(g) An additional hard-to-fill or retain differential may be
authorized for employees occupying positions assigned to a maximum security
unit or facility if the work schedules expose employees to clear, direct, and
unavoidable hazards for clients, inmates, or patients who are in facilities
or units that are classified as maximum security.
(h) An employee who is receiving additional compensation for a high-
risk position that is physically hazardous or dangerous and then is
reassigned to normal duty shall revert on the day of the reassignment to the
rate of pay for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.
(m)(i) Other compensation differentials may be administered by the
Office of Personnel Management office after:
(1) Approval by the State Personnel Administrator; and
(2) Review by the Legislative Council or, if the General
Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.
(j) If granting additional compensation under this section would have
the effect of exceeding the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the
employee's classification, the additional compensation shall not be
considered as exceeding the maximum allowable rate for that grade.
(k) The office may adopt policies establishing the percentage
increments that are available for each compensation differential.
(l)(1) Determining the maximum number of employees, the maximum
compensation of employees, and the maximum amount of appropriation of general
revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the
General Assembly and is usually accomplished by delineating the maximums in
the appropriation act for a state agency and the general revenue allocations
authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue
Stabilization Law.
(2) In light of subdivision (l)(1) of this section, it is both
necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by
requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
as provided by subsection (f) of this section.
(3)(A) The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of subsection (f) of this
section.
(B) If the requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
competent jurisdiction, subsection (f) of this section is void.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 21-5-223(a), concerning severance pay, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) If the agency director or the secretary of a cabinet-level
department determines that it is necessary to implement the state workforce
reduction policy due to state agency organization structure change, budgetary
reductions, abolishment of positions or duties, loss of functional
responsibility by the state agency, or the loss of federal funding, grants,
or other special funds, the agency director or the secretary of a cabinet-
level department, upon approval by the Secretary of the Department of
Transformation and Shared Services, may authorize the payment of funds on a
regular payroll schedule as severance pay to full-time, part-time, and job
sharing classified and nonclassified employees in regular positions affected
by the workforce reduction on the basis of the following pro rata lump sum
for completed years of service, including any formally implemented
probationary period:
Over one (1) year up to five (5) Eight hundred dollars ($800)
years
Over five (5) years up to fifteen One thousand two hundred dollars
(15) years ($1,200)
Over fifteen (15) years One thousand six hundred dollars
($1,600)
(2) The severance payments under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall be in addition to the lump-sum payments allowed under the
Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, § 21-4-201 et seq.
(3) The severance payments under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum salary.
(4) The agency director or the secretary of a cabinet-level
department shall file a notice of the anticipated implementation of the
workforce reduction policy and of the lump-sum severance payments to be made
under the state workforce reduction policy with the Legislative Council or,
if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 21-5-224 is amended to read as follows:
21-5-224. Extra help positions.
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
(a)(1) A position authorized as extra help in a state agency shall be
assigned an authorized classification by the agency, and any person hired in
an extra help position shall meet the minimum qualifications and any other
requirements set by the official class specification job description of the
classification assigned to the position.
(2) The rates of pay for extra help employees shall be set in
accordance with and shall not exceed those provided in this subchapter, or
its successor, for the appropriate classification.
(3) Extra help employees of state agencies shall not exceed one
thousand five hundred (1,500) hours per fiscal year as set out in § 19-4-521
unless otherwise provided for by law, including without limitation a state
agency's appropriation act.
(b) The salary eligibility for an employee transferring or returning
from an extra help position to a regular position shall be determined in the
same manner as established for newly hired employees.
(c) A former An employee from a state agency, board, or commission who
is rehired in hired into or transfers to an extra-help position is ineligible
for benefits except holiday pay and as authorized by the Office of Personnel
Management.
(d) A Department of the Military employee hired in an extra help
position located at Robinson Maneuver Training Center or Fort Chaffee Joint
Maneuver Training Center shall not:
(1) Receive pay in an amount to exceed eighty-five percent (85%)
of the maximum annual salary for a comparable position under this subchapter;
and
(2) Be employed for a period of time to exceed one thousand
eight hundred (1,800) hours per fiscal year.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 21-5-225(a)(1), concerning position pools,
is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) There is established a pool of one thousand five hundred
(1,500) five hundred (500) positions assigned to the Office of Personnel
Management to be used to reclassify positions in state agencies to the proper
classification and grade if the state agency does not have a vacant position
available with the appropriate classification and grade.

03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 21-5-225(b)(1), concerning position pools,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Office of Personnel Management shall establish and maintain
a central growth pool of five hundred (500) two hundred fifty (250) positions
to be used to establish additional positions in state agencies of the proper
classification and grade when the state agency does not have sufficient
positions available with the appropriate classification and grade to meet a
state agency's mandated responsibilities.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 23-115-305 is amended to read as follows:
23-115-305. Regular salaries.
There are established for the Office of the Arkansas Lottery the
following titles and grades for each position. The salary for the positions
assigned to grades shall be determined in accordance with the pay level for
the grade assigned in this section, as established in § 21-5-209.

Class No. of
Code Title Employees Grade
U128U OAL DIRECTOR 1 SE-4
G056N OAL GAMING DIRECTOR 1 SE-4
A024N OAL INTERNAL AUDITOR 1 SE-1
D029N OAL DEPUTY IT GAMING DIRECTOR 1 IT08
D113C OAL SR. DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR 1 IT07
D112C OAL NETWORK ENGINEER 1 IT07
D110C OAL QA SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 IT07
D111C OAL IT SECURITY ANALYST 1 IT06
D119C OAL LEAD COMPUTER OPERATOR 1 IT04
D108C OAL APPLICATION SUPP SPECIALIST 1 IT02
D107C OAL COMPUTER OPERATOR 2 IT01
G051N OAL SALES DIRECTOR 1 GS15
G050N OAL CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GS15
A016N OAL CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 GS15
G057N OAL DIR SECURITY & COMPLIANCE 1 GS14
G047N OAL MARKETING & ADVERTISING DIR 1 GS14
G046N OAL SALES TRNG & RETAIL COORD 1 GS13
G059N OAL SECURITY DEPUTY DIR 1 GS12
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A015N OAL TREASURER 1 GS12
A014N OAL CONTROLLER 1 GS12
G058N OAL KEY CHAIN ACCOUNT MANAGER 1 GS11
G044N OAL REGIONAL SALES MANAGER 2 GS11
A025N OAL FINANCIAL ANALYST 1 GS10
G060N OAL PRODUCT MANAGER 2 GS10
C106C OAL OFFICE COORDINATOR 1 GS08
A026N OAL AUDITOR 2 GS08
A120C OAL ACCOUNTANT 4 GS08
A123C OAL COLLECTIONS SPECIALIST 1 GS08
X211C OAL SENIOR SECURITY SPECIALIST 1 GS08
X208C OAL CLAIMS CENTER MANAGER 1 GS07
P069C OAL GRAPHIC SPECIALIST 1 GS07
G260C OAL MARKETING SALES REP 20 GS07
P072C OAL PUBLICATION SPECIALIST 1 GS07
P070C OAL OFFICE CAMPAIGN COORDINATOR 1 GS07
X210C OAL LICENSING MANAGER 1 GS07
A122C OAL FISCAL SPECIALIST 1 GS06
G261C OAL DRAW MANAGER 2 GS06
X209C OAL SECURITY SPECIALIST 1 GS06
X213C OAL LICENSING SPECIALIST 3 GS05
X212C OAL SECURITY SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GS04
X214C OAL CLAIMS ASSISTANT 2 GS04
C105C OAL RECEPTIONIST 1 GS03

TOTAL NO. OF POSITIONS: 72

LLO13C OAL DIRECTOR 1 EXE02
LLO16C OAL GAMING DIRECTOR 1 EXE01
LLO04P OAL CHIEF FISCAL OFFICER 1 SPC09
LLO05P OAL CHIEF LEGAL COUNSEL 1 SPC09
LLO18P OAL INTERNAL AUDITOR 1 SPC09
LLO12P OAL DIR SECURITY & COMPLIANCE 1 SPC07
LLO24P OAL MARKETING & ADVERTISING DIR 1 SPC07
LLO33P OAL SALES DIRECTOR 1 SPC07
LLO10P OAL CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
LLO38P OAL TREASURER 1 SPC06
LLO34P OAL SECURITY DEPUTY DIR 1 SPC04
LLO01P OAL ACCOUNTANT 1 SPC02
LLO11P OAL DEPUTY IT GAMING DIRECTOR 1 IST10
IIS11P IT SUPERVISOR/EXPERT 1 IST09
LLO37P OAL SR. DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR 1 IST08
IIE02P IT SECURITY ANALYST I 1 IST06
LLO30P OAL QA SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 IST06
LLO02P OAL APPLICATION SUPP SPECIALIST 1 IST05
IUS01P USER SUPPORT ANALYST 1 IST04
LLO09P OAL COMPUTER OPERATOR 2 IST01
LLO20P OAL KEY CHAIN ACCOUNT MANAGER 1 SGS10
LLO28P OAL PRODUCT MANAGER 3 SGS10
LLO32P OAL REGIONAL SALES MANAGER 2 SGS10
LLO14P OAL FINANCIAL ANALYST 1 SGS09
LLO26P OAL OFFICE CAMPAIGN COORDINATOR 2 SGS09
PAS08I EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT 1 SGS07
LLO03P OAL AUDITOR 1 SGS07
LLO17P OAL GRAPHIC SPECIALIST 1 SGS07
PPR02P PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 1 SGS07
LLO07P OAL CLAIMS CENTER MANAGER 1 SGS06
LLO08P OAL COLLECTIONS SPECIALIST 1 SGS06
LLO36P OAL SENIOR SECURITY SPECIALIST 1 SGS06
CPR07P PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 SGS06
PAS01P ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 SGS05
LLO22P OAL LICENSING MANAGER 1 SGS05
LLO25P OAL MARKETING SALES REP 20 SGS05
PAS02P ADMINISTRATIVE COORDINATOR 1 SGS04
LLO15P OAL FISCAL SPECIALIST 1 SGS04
LLO23P OAL LICENSING SPECIALIST 3 SGS04
LLO35P OAL SECURITY SPECIALIST 3 SGS04
LLO06P OAL CLAIMS ASSISTANT 3 SGS03
LLO31P OAL RECEPTIONIST 1 SGS03

SECTION 16. DO NOT CODIFY. (a) Upon approval by the Office of
Personnel Management, an employee of the Department of Corrections who is
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
receiving a compensation differential under § 21-5-221 on the last day of
fiscal year 2025 shall have the compensation differential added to the
employee's base salary before the implementation of the Fiscal Year 2026 pay
plan.
(b) An employee who has a compensation differential added to the
employee's base salary under subsection (a) of this section shall no longer
be eligible for compensation differentials that have been removed.

SECTION 17. DO NOT CODIFY. CROSSWALK.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) This act creates widespread revisions to the system used for
the classification and compensation of state agency employees that are
necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state;
(2) It is impossible to implement revisions of the scope
contained within this act that coincide with the process for drafting and
enacting appropriation acts of the General Assembly;
(3) As a result of this impossibility, the appropriation acts
for state agencies enacted during the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly will not
reflect the changes under this act; and
(4) It is the intent of this section to provide for the
appropriation acts of state agencies enacted during the Ninety-Fifth General
Assembly to be superseded with information from this act as necessary to
fully implement this act and provide for the continued services and
operations of state agencies.
(b) The classification titles and grades established in § 21-5-208
under this act shall supersede the classification titles and grades
established in a state agency appropriation act enacted by the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly that uses classification titles and grades other than those
established by this act, regardless of the date that the state agency
appropriation act becomes law.
(c) The classification titles and grades for state agencies
established in a state agency appropriation act enacted by the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be modified as follows during the fiscal year 2026,
regardless of the date that the state agency appropriation act becomes law:

Curr Curr No. Curr New New No. New
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
Auth Auth of Auth Auth Auth of Auth
Job Title Pos Grd Job Title Pos Grade
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
9901 DEPT OF AGRICULTURE
SC001 SEC OF AGRI 1 SE05 ESE01A SEC OF AGRI 1 EXE04
U072U DEP SEC OF AGRI 1 SE02 EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I 1 EXE01
U057U AGRI LAB DIR 1 SE01 SLA01C LAB DIR 1 SPC09
L104C AGRI LAB COORD 1 MP04 MVE03P VETERINARY SPEC 1 MED09
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIA01C CIO I 1 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IDM01P DB ADMIN 1 IST09
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IAS05P APP DEVELOPER II 1 IST08
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D057C INFO TECH MGR 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
G345C AGRI GEN COUNSEL 1 GS15 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
A151C CFO OF AGRI 1 GS14 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
B006C AGRI CONSERV DIV MGR 1 GS13 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
A010N AGRI CFO 1 GS13 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
N001C DEP CFO 1 GS13 CPR01C CHIEF OF COMMS I 1 SPC06
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 3 GS13 LAT04P ATTY II 3 SPC05
B002C AGRI DIR OF MRKTNG 1 GS12 CMA02C MRKTNG DIR 1 SPC05
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH02C HR ADMIN I 1 SPC05
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
B010C AGRI DIV MGR 1 GS11 SLA02C LAB MNGR 1 SPC05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 2 GS10 FFS01C FISC SPPRT ADMIN 2 SGS10
T110C AG LAW ENFORCE CHIEF 1 GS10 SAL03C AGRI LAW ENFORCE CHIE 1 LES08
B144C FRM SCHOOL COORD 1 GS10 PAG08P FARM SCHOOL COORD 1 SGS07
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 2 GS09 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 2 SGS09
T130C AG LAW ENFORCE DEP CH 1 GS09 SAL02P AGRI ENFORCE AGENT II 1 LES04
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 2 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 2 SGS05
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 CMA03P MRKTNG SPEC 1 SGS04
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
T121C AG LE ASST CHIEF 1 GS08 SAL02P AGRI ENFORCE AGENT II 1 LES04
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 1 GS08 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 1 GS08 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 1 GS08 CMA03P MRKTNG SPEC 1 SGS04
G126C FINAN PRGM COORD 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
X109C AGRI INVSTIGTR 3 GS07 SAL01P AGRI ENFRCMNT AGENT I 3 LES03
B072C AGRI PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAG05P AGRI PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 2 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 2 SGS07
V008C BUYER SUPV 1 GS07 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
A073C PRGM/FLD AUD SUPV 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GS06 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
V014C BUYER 2 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 2 SGS05
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
0400 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
U048U LVSTCK & PLT DIV DIR 1 SE01 EEX02A AGRI DIV DIR 1 EXE01
U043U NAT RES DIV DIR 1 SE01 EEX02A AGRI DIV DIR 1 EXE01
U044U PLANT INDST DIV DIR 1 SE01 EEX02A AGRI DIV DIR 1 EXE01
U003U STATE FORESTER 1 SE01 EEX02A AGRI DIV DIR 1 EXE01
B004N STATE VET 1 MP05 MVE01C STATE VETERINARIAN 1 MED10
L106C VETERINARY SPEC 5 MP04 MVE03P VETERINARY SPEC 5 MED09
D040C GIS ANLST 1 IT06 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
G052N NAT RES DEP DIR 1 GS15 PAG01C AGRI DIV ADMIN 1 SPC07
B005C AGRI WAT DEV DIV MGR 1 GS13 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
G344C AGRI WAT RES DIV MGR 1 GS13 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
B004C AGRI WAT RES DIV MGR 1 GS13 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
B001C DEP STATE FORESTER 1 GS13 PAG01C AGRI DIV ADMIN 1 SPC07
N058N LVSTCK & PLT DIV DEP 1 GS13 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B015C ENG SUPV 3 GS12 SEN02P ENGINEER SUPV/EXP 3 SPC06
G036N PLANT INDST DIV DEP D 1 GS12 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
B010C AGRI DIV MGR 5 GS11 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 5 SPC06
B010C AGRI DIV MGR 1 GS11 PAG03C AGRI DIV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC03
B014C ASST STATE FORESTER 1 GS11 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
B014C ASST STATE FORESTER 2 GS11 PAG10C FORESTER MNGR 2 SPC05
B023C ENG, P.E. 1 GS11 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
B023C ENG, P.E. 5 GS11 SEN01P ENGINEER 5 SPC03
B023C ENG, P.E. 1 GS11 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
B023C ENG, P.E. 1 GS11 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
B149C SR LAB SCIENTIST 2 GS11 SLA02C LAB MNGR 2 SPC05
B022C DIST FORESTER 7 GS10 PAG07C DISTRICT FORESTER 7 SPC03
E013C ED PRGM MGR 1 GS10 PAG02C AGRI DIV MNGR 1 SPC06
X217C NAT PLT IMPRV PLAN CO 1 GS10 PAG03C AGRI DIV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC03
B136C AGRI LAB QUALITY MGR 1 GS09 SLA03P LAB SUPV/EXP 1 SPC03
S005C AVIATION MGR 1 GS09 PAV01P AVIATION MNGR 1 SPC07
B037C CHEMIST SUPV 2 GS09 SLA03P LAB SUPV/EXP 2 SPC03
B035C GEOLOGY SUPV 1 GS09 SGE02P GEOLOGIST SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
B034C MICROBIOLOGIST SUPV 5 GS09 SLA03P LAB SUPV/EXP 5 SPC03
B038C STATE FOREST MGR 1 GS09 PAG09P FORESTER 1 SPC01
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 1 GS08 SLA03P LAB SUPV/EXP 1 SPC03
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 2 GS08 PAG09P FORESTER 2 SPC01
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 1 GS08 SLA06P LAB TECH III 1 SGS08
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 16 GS08 PAG05P AGRI PRGM SUPV/EXP 16 SGS07
B049C AGRI PRGM MGR 2 GS08 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
X148C AIRCRAFT PILOT 2 GS08 PAV02P PILOT 2 SPC08
B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST 8 GS08 SCN01I ARCHAEOLOGIST 8 SPC01
B055C ECOLOGIST COORD 1 GS08 SCN02P ECOLOGIST 1 SPC01
G126C FINAN PRGM COORD 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
B043C PROF GEO 1 GS08 SGE05P PROF GEOLOGIST 1 SPC03
B043C PROF GEO 1 GS08 SGE01P GEOLOGIST 1 SPC01
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 2 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
B127C SEN MICROBIOLOGIST 1 GS08 SBI02P BIOLOGIST II 1 SPC02
B058C STAFF FORESTER 3 GS08 PAG09P FORESTER 3 SPC01
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B058C STAFF FORESTER 2 GS08 PAG05P AGRI PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
C015C AGRI ADMINST COORD 2 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
X058C AGRI COMDTY AREA SUPV 2 GS07 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
X111C AGRI INSPCT SUPV 1 GS07 PAG05P AGRI PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X111C AGRI INSPCT SUPV 3 GS07 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 3 SGS07
B072C AGRI PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAG09P FORESTER 1 SPC01
B072C AGRI PRGM COORD 1 GS07 SLA06P LAB TECH III 1 SGS08
B072C AGRI PRGM COORD 5 GS07 PAG05P AGRI PRGM SUPV/EXP 5 SGS07
B072C AGRI PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
B072C AGRI PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
B081C CHEMIST 5 GS07 SBI02P BIOLOGIST II 5 SPC02
B081C CHEMIST 11 GS07 SCH02P CHEMIST II 11 SPC02
B065C ECOLOGIST 1 GS07 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
X054C ENVIRO PRGM COORD 6 GS07 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 6 SGS06
X054C ENVIRO PRGM COORD 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
B080C FORESTER 37 GS07 PAG09P FORESTER 37 SPC01
B080C FORESTER 2 GS07 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
G147C GRANTS COORD 3 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 3 SGS05
B060C LAND RES SPEC SUPV 1 GS07 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
B077C MICROBIOLOGIST 12 GS07 SBI02P BIOLOGIST II 12 SPC02
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
G145C RURAL CONST GRANT/FIN 6 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 6 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 7 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 7 SGS05
X146C AGRI INSPCT III 2 GS06 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
X146C AGRI INSPCT III 31 GS06 IIN03P INSP III 31 SGS06
X146C AGRI INSPCT III 1 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 1 SGS05
B147C AGRI PRGM SPEC 14 GS06 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 14 SGS06
D076C COMMS SYST SUPV 1 GS06 SIA13P DISPATCHER SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
B088C CO FOREST RANGER 59 GS06 SAL06P FOREST RNGR SUPV/EXP 59 SGS07
B088C CO FOREST RANGER 1 GS06 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
B078C METROLOGIST 2 GS06 SLA05P LAB TECH II 2 SGS07
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 2 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 2 SGS05
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 2 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X157C AGRI INSPCT II 51 GS05 IIN02P INSP II 51 SGS05
X157C AGRI INSPCT II 45 GS05 IIN01P INSP I 45 SGS04
X097C AGRI SPEC 1 GS05 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
S036C AUTO/DIESEL MECH SUPV 2 GS05 PAG04P AGRI PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
X129C CNSTRCT INSPCT 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
B098C FOREST RANGER II 64 GS05 SAL05P FOREST RNGR II 64 SGS06
B098C FOREST RANGER II 44 GS05 SAL04P FOREST RNGR I 44 SGS05
S034C INTERSTATE TRUCK DRIV 2 GS05 TAT11I TRUCK DRIVER 2 SGS06
B093C LAND RES SPEC 3 GS05 PEP01P CONS SPEC 3 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 10 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 10 SGS05
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
D081C TELECOMMS SPEC 7 GS05 SIA12P DISPATCHER 7 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 11 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 11 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
X165C AGRI INSPCT I 2 GS04 IIN01P INSP I 2 SGS04
B096C AGRI SEED ANLST 4 GS04 SLA05P LAB TECH II 4 SGS07
B096C AGRI SEED ANLST 1 GS04 SLA04P LAB TECH I 1 SGS06
S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECH 4 GS04 TAT06P MECHANIC 4 SGS06
S040C CALIBRATION TECH 2 GS04 TAT02I CALIBRATION TECH 2 SGS04
B101C NAT RES PRGM TECH 5 GS04 PAG11P FORESTRY TECH 5 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 11 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 11 SGS02
S060C HEAVY EQUIP OP 3 GS02 TST07P TRADES SPEC 3 SGS04
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
9902 DEPT OF COMMERCE
SC002 ACOM SEC OF COMM 1 SE05 ESE02A SEC OF COMM 1 EXE04
G329C CHIEF WRKFRCE OFF 1 SE04 EEX12A CHIEF WRKFRC OFF 1 EXE02
N263N COMM COS 1 SE03 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
A152C ACOM CFO 1 SE01 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
U065U ACOM DEP DIR 1 SE01 PPE14C WRKFRC DEP DIR 1 SPC08
D150C ACOM CIO 1 IT12 IIA03C CIO III 1 IST14
D128C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 IT11 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IAS03P APP COORD 1 IST09
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
N084N AEDC MRKT & COMMS DIR 1 GS15 CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMS II 1 SPC07
N066N ACOM CHIEF COMM & LEG 1 GS14 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
R001N ADH CHIEF HR OFF 1 GS13 HDH03C HR ADMIN II 1 SPC08
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G010C ACOM DIV MGR 1 GS12 PWD02P WRKFRC DEV PROJ CONS 1 SPC05
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 PPR03C PROC MNGR 1 SGS10
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
A040C ACOM ADFA FISC PRGM M 1 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
E074C ACOM PRGM COORD 3 GS10 PWD01P WRKFRC DEV COORD 3 SPC03
E074C ACOM PRGM COORD 1 GS10 PWD03P WRKFRC DEV SPEC 1 SPC01
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 2 GS10 FAC03P ACCT COORD 2 SPC03
E073C APPRENT EXPANSION COO 1 GS10 PWD03P WRKFRC DEV SPEC 1 SPC01
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
E075C ACOM PRGM ADVSR 3 GS09 PWD03P WRKFRC DEV SPEC 3 SPC01
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0810 DEPT OF WORKFORCE SERVICES
G323C DIR OF AR WRKFRCE CON 1 SE04 EEX56A WRKFRC EXEC DIR 1 EXE02
U037U ACOM DWS DIR 1 SE03 EEX55A WRKFRC DIR 1 SPC10
U065U ACOM DEP DIR 1 SE01 PPE14C WRKFRC DEP DIR 1 SPC08
U070U ACOM DWS DEP DIR 1 SE01 PPE14C WRKFRC DEP DIR 1 SPC08
U070U ACOM DWS DEP DIR 1 SE01 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
U036U AR APP TRIBUNAL CHAIR 1 SE01 LAT02C APPEALS TRIB CHAIR 1 SPC10
U076U DWS WRKFRCE INVEST DI 1 SE01 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
D002N STATE DB ADMIN LEAD 1 IT11 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D002N STATE DB ADMIN LEAD 1 IT11 IIA05C IT DIV MNGR 1 IST12
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IAS03P APP COORD 1 IST09
D001C STATE DB ADMIN 1 IT09 IDM01P DB ADMIN 1 IST09
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D001C STATE DB ADMIN 2 IT09 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 2 IST09
D007C INFO SYST MGR 3 IT08 IAS05P APP DEVELOPER II 3 IST08
D017C INFO SYST SEC SPEC 1 IT07 IIE04C IT SEC EXP 1 IST10
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 FIN03P FINAN SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT06 IAS01P APP ANLST I 2 IST07
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 6 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 6 IST06
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT06 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 2 IST06
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D022C SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IAS05P APP DEVELOPER II 1 IST08
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 6 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 6 IST02
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 2 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
G324C ASST DIR, REEMPLOYMEN 1 GS15 EEX55A WRKFRC DIR 1 SPC10
A139C CFO 1 GS15 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
G349C DWS CHIEF OF LEGAL SV 1 GS15 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
G007N ACOM DWS GEN COUNSEL 1 GS14 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
N051N ACOM DWS ASST DIR, EM 1 GS13 PWD04P WRKFRC DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
N050N ACOM DWS ASST DIR, FI 1 GS13 FAC04C ACCT MNGR 1 SPC06
N049N ACOM DWS ASST DIR, IN 1 GS13 IIS01P IT COORD 1 IST08
N074N ACOM DWS ASST DIR, UN 1 GS13 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G010C ACOM DIV MGR 1 GS12 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
G010C ACOM DIV MGR 1 GS12 PWD04P WRKFRC DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
G016N ACOM DWS ASST DIR GRA 1 GS12 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
P007N ACOM DWS DIR OF COMMS 1 GS12 CPR08P PUB INFO SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G020C ACOM DWS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS12 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
G020C ACOM DWS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS12 PWD02P WRKFRC DEV PROJ CONS 1 SPC05
G020C ACOM DWS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS12 PWD01P WRKFRC DEV COORD 1 SPC03
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 FAC04C ACCT MNGR 1 SPC06
A031C ASST CONT 2 GS11 FAC06C ASST CONTROLLER 2 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 4 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 4 SPC05
G068C ACOM DWS AREA OP CHIE 2 GS10 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 2 SPC05
G068C ACOM DWS AREA OP CHIE 1 GS10 PQA02C QA MNGR 1 SGS09
G068C ACOM DWS AREA OP CHIE 3 GS10 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 3 SGS08
E074C ACOM PRGM COORD 1 GS10 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
E074C ACOM PRGM COORD 1 GS10 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G073C ATRNY 6 GS10 LAT04P ATTY II 6 SPC05
G073C ATRNY 2 GS10 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 2 SPC05
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
G288C ACOM DWS DIV MGR 2 GS09 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
R015C ACOM DWS EQUAL OPPORT 1 GS09 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
G243C ACOM DWS FLD MGR III 2 GS09 PPE01P FIELD OFF SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 1 GS09 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 1 GS09 PWD01P WRKFRC DEV COORD 1 SPC03
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 1 GS09 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 6 GS09 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 6 SGS08
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 1 GS09 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 1 GS09 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
E075C ACOM PRGM ADVSR 1 GS09 PWD01P WRKFRC DEV COORD 1 SPC03
E075C ACOM PRGM ADVSR 3 GS09 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 3 SGS10
E075C ACOM PRGM ADVSR 5 GS09 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 5 SGS07
R019C BUDGET MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
G128C ACOM DWS FLD MGR II 1 GS08 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G128C ACOM DWS FLD MGR II 1 GS08 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G128C ACOM DWS FLD MGR II 10 GS08 PPE01P FIELD OFF SUPV/EXP 10 SGS07
G128C ACOM DWS FLD MGR II 2 GS08 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 2 SGS06
G127C ACOM DWS PRGM OP MGR 13 GS08 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 13 SGS08
G127C ACOM DWS PRGM OP MGR 1 GS08 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G127C ACOM DWS PRGM OP MGR 13 GS08 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 13 SGS07
G127C ACOM DWS PRGM OP MGR 2 GS08 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 2 SGS06
G114C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE INVE 2 GS08 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A066C INT AUD 4 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 4 SPC02
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A060C SEN AUD 4 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 4 SPC02
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 2 SPC01
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 1 SPC01
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 2 GS07 PPE01P FIELD OFF SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 1 GS07 PCR03P CLAIMS REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 3 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 3 SGS06
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 1 GS07 ILS02I HEARING OFF 1 SGS06
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 3 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 3 SGS05
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 7 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 7 SPC01
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 2 GS07 PCR03P CLAIMS REV SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 34 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 34 SGS06
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 2 GS07 ILS02I HEARING OFF 2 SGS06
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 PPE03P PROG ELIG SPEC II 1 SGS06
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 3 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 3 SGS05
G209C ACOM DWS PRGM SUPV 1 GS07 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G209C ACOM DWS PRGM SUPV 1 GS07 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G209C ACOM DWS PRGM SUPV 4 GS07 PCR03P CLAIMS REV SUPV/EXP 4 SGS06
G209C ACOM DWS PRGM SUPV 8 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 8 SGS06
G209C ACOM DWS PRGM SUPV 6 GS07 PCR01P CLAIMS REV ANLST 6 SGS05
G209C ACOM DWS PRGM SUPV 2 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 2 SGS05
G196C ACOM DWS SAT OFF SUPV 5 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 5 SGS06
G196C ACOM DWS SAT OFF SUPV 1 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
A085C ACOM DWS SR FLD TAX R 2 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 2 SPC01
G138C AGENCY ADMINST REV OF 1 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
G138C AGENCY ADMINST REV OF 7 GS07 ILS02I HEARING OFF 7 SGS06
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A081C AUD 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
A081C AUD 2 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 2 SPC01
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 2 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 2 SGS07
A075C FINAN ANLST I 2 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
S017C MAINT COORD 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
A065C PYRLL SVCS COORD 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
A073C PRGM/FLD AUD SUPV 1 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 1 SPC01
A073C PRGM/FLD AUD SUPV 1 GS07 PCA03P CLAIMS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
X047C REAL ESTATE MGR 1 GS07 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
A092C ACOM DWS FLD TAX REP 2 GS06 FAU04P AUDITOR II 2 SPC02
A092C ACOM DWS FLD TAX REP 12 GS06 PCO05P TAX SPEC 12 SGS04
C032C ACOM DWS UI CLAIM TEC 1 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
C032C ACOM DWS UI CLAIM TEC 1 GS06 PCO05P TAX SPEC 1 SGS04
C032C ACOM DWS UI CLAIM TEC 7 GS06 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 7 SGS02
X139C ACOM DWS UI INVSTIGTR 8 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 8 SGS05
X139C ACOM DWS UI INVSTIGTR 1 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
X139C ACOM DWS UI INVSTIGTR 1 GS06 PCO05P TAX SPEC 1 SGS04
G217C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE SPEC 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G217C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE SPEC 9 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 9 SGS05
G217C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE SPEC 3 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 3 SGS05
G217C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE SPEC 160 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 160 SGS05
G217C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE SPEC 15 GS06 PCO05P TAX SPEC 15 SGS04
G217C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE SPEC 3 GS06 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
C037C ADMINST ANLST 10 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 10 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
R027C BUDGET SPEC 2 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 2 SGS05
R027C BUDGET SPEC 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 2 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
S033C MAINT SUPV 3 GS06 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 3 SGS04
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 1 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 1 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 8 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 8 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PCR01P CLAIMS REV ANLST 1 SGS05
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 11 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 11 SGS05
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
G220C DWS UNIT SUPV 1 GS05 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 8 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 8 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
S032C PRINT SHOP SUPV 1 GS05 TST07P TRADES SPEC 1 SGS04
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 1 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 9 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 9 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 11 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 11 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
R036C HR SPEC 2 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 8 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 8 SGS05
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
X183C ACOM DWS CLAIMS ADJ 3 GS03 PCR02P CLAIMS REV SPEC 3 SGS03
X183C ACOM DWS CLAIMS ADJ 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 8 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 8 SGS02
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 2 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
0790 AR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COMM
U055U ACOM AEDC DIR 1 SE04 EEX01A AEDC EXEC DIR 1 EXE02
N214N AEDC EXEC VP GLOBAL B 1 SE01 FAC04C ACCT MNGR 1 SPC06
U063U ACOM CIO 1 SE01 PPE04C ECON DEV ADMIN 1 SPC08
D029C SEN GIS ANLST 1 IT07 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
N062N AEDC BUS DEV DIV DIR 1 GS15 PPE04C ECON DEV ADMIN 1 SPC08
N061N AEDC BUS FINAN DIR 1 GS15 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
N225N AEDC EXEC VP& GC 1 GS15 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
N085N AEDC DIR TECH & ENTRE 1 GS14 PPE04C ECON DEV ADMIN 1 SPC08
G294C ACOM AEDC SEN COUNSEL 1 GS14 PED02P ECON DEV PROJ CONS 1 SPC06
N059N AEDC TRNG DIV DIR 1 GS14 PPE14C WRKFRC DEP DIR 1 SPC08
03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B139C AEDC DIR OF EPSCOR 1 GS13 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
B139C AEDC DIR OF EPSCOR 1 GS13 PED02P ECON DEV PROJ CONS 1 SPC06
B140C AEDC MANU SOLUTIONS D 1 GS13 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
N196N MIL AFFRS DIR 1 GS13 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
G034N AEDC ASST DIR SALES A 1 GS12 PWD02P WRKFRC DEV PROJ CONS 1 SPC05
G245C AEDC DIR COMM DEV & I 1 GS12 PED02P ECON DEV PROJ CONS 1 SPC06
G014C AEDC DIR OF COMM DEV 1 GS12 PED02P ECON DEV PROJ CONS 1 SPC06
B018N ACOM AEDC FLD ENG 3 GS12 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 3 SPC07
G035N AEDC SALES AND MRKTNG 1 GS12 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
G273C AEDC SEN PROJ CONS 1 GS12 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
G273C AEDC SEN PROJ CONS 3 GS12 PED02P ECON DEV PROJ CONS 3 SPC06
G015C AEDC SMALL/MIN BUS DI 1 GS12 PED04P ECON DEV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
U099U ACOM DIR OF RURAL SVC 1 GS12 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
B016C AEDC ASST DIR EPSCOR 1 GS11 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
P076C AEDC DIG MRKTNG DIR 1 GS11 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
G062C ACOM AEDC PROJ CONS 5 GS11 PED02P ECON DEV PROJ CONS 5 SPC06
G062C ACOM AEDC PROJ CONS 21 GS11 PED03P ECON DEV SPEC 21 SPC02
G062C ACOM AEDC PROJ CONS 2 GS11 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
G062C ACOM AEDC PROJ CONS 2 GS11 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
G048C AEDC STRAT PLNNG ASST 1 GS11 CPR08P PUB INFO SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G126C FINAN PRGM COORD 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 2 GS08 PED03P ECON DEV SPEC 2 SPC02
G159C DEPT BUS COORD 1 GS07 PED03P ECON DEV SPEC 1 SPC02
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
R022C BENE COORD 1 GS06 HBE02P BENE COORD 1 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR08P PUB INFO SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
100 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 6 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 6 SGS04
0520 ADWS - REHABILITATION SERVICES
U012U REHAB SVCS COMM 1 SE01 PPE14C WRKFRC DEP DIR 1 SPC08
L013N GEN PHYS 1 MP06 MPH03P PHYSC 1 MED10
L013N GEN PHYS 1 MP06 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MED08
L021N PHYSICAL THERAPIST 1 MP03 MLM03C OCCUPATIONAL THER 1 MED07
L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 2 MP03 MPS03P PSYCHOLOGIST I 2 MED08
L022N OCCU THERAPIST 2 MP02 MLM03C OCCUPATIONAL THER 2 MED07
L022N OCCU THERAPIST 1 MP02 MRE01C REHAB ADMIN 1 MED06
L032C RN - HOSP 2 MP01 MRE01C REHAB ADMIN 2 MED06
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 2 IT09 IIP03P IT SR PROJ MNGR 2 IST10
D012C DB SPEC 1 IT08 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 1 IST06
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 2 IT07 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 2 IST05
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT06 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 2 IST04
D022C SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
N125N ACOM DSB DEP DIR SVCS 1 GS15 PPE14C WRKFRC DEP DIR 1 SPC08
N172N ACOM REHAB OP DIR 3 GS13 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 3 SPC05
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 FFS01C FISC SPPRT ADMIN 1 SGS10
P078C ACOM ARS DIR OF COMMS 1 GS12 CPR08P PUB INFO SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
G021C ACOM DSB ASST DIR 1 GS11 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
E005C ACOM REHAB DIR OF VOC 1 GS10 MRE01C REHAB ADMIN 1 MED06
G040C ACOM REHAB DIR - SPCL 1 GS10 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G040C ACOM REHAB DIR - SPCL 3 GS10 MRE01C REHAB ADMIN 3 MED06
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G070C ACOM DIR OF FLD OP 1 GS09 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G303C ACOM DSB PRGM ADMIN 2 GS09 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
L037C ACOM REHAB AREA MGR 16 GS09 MRE04C REHAB MNGR 16 MED05
101 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
E011C ACOM VOC ED COORD 4 GS09 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 4 SGS08
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 SCM03P LIC CLIN SOC WORKER 1 SPC03
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 2 GS09 PQA04P QA SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAM 1 GS09 SCM03P LIC CLIN SOC WORKER 1 SPC03
L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAM 7 GS09 MPS02P PSYCH EXAM 7 MED03
X038C QA MGR 4 GS09 PQA04P QA SUPV/EXP 4 SGS08
L098C CERT VOC REHAB CNSLR 1 GS08 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
L098C CERT VOC REHAB CNSLR 61 GS08 MRE06P VOC REHAB COUNSELOR 61 MED04
L098C CERT VOC REHAB CNSLR 56 GS08 MRE02P REHAB COORD 56 MED02
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 1 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
S004C MAINT MGR 1 GS08 TFM01P FACILITY COORD 1 SGS04
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 5 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 5 SGS07
G121C REHAB PRGM MGR 12 GS08 MRE04C REHAB MNGR 12 MED05
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 2 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
G163C ACOM REHAB PRGM COORD 11 GS07 MRE02P REHAB COORD 11 MED02
L057C ACOM REHAB SVS FCLTY 2 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 2 SGS06
M032C ACOM VOC REHAB PLCMNT 15 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 15 SGS05
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
G147C GRANTS COORD 2 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 2 SGS05
S017C MAINT COORD 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
A065C PYRLL SVCS COORD 1 GS07 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 2 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 11 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 11 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
G172C CREER PLNNG & PLAC CO 1 GS06 MRE02P REHAB COORD 1 MED02
E043C CERT VOC TCHR 2 GS06 ETF07P VOC INSTRUCTOR 2 SGS08
E043C CERT VOC TCHR 1 GS06 ETF05P TEACHER I 1 SGS06
E043C CERT VOC TCHR 1 GS06 MNU01P LPN 1 MED02
E043C CERT VOC TCHR 3 GS06 MRE02P REHAB COORD 3 MED02
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G214C GRANTS SPEC 2 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 2 SGS04
R025C HR ANLST 2 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
M050C INTERP 1 GS06 CPR04I INTERPRETER 1 SGS07
102 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
M050C INTERP 3 GS06 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
P031C MEDIA SPEC 1 GS06 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
T062C PUB SAFE DIR 1 GS06 SSE03P SEC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
L051C REHAB CNSLR 2 GS06 MRE02P REHAB COORD 2 MED02
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST05P SKILL TRADES SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
C036C ADMINST REV ANLST 2 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
V014C BUYER 2 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 2 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 6 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 6 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 4 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
V018C WRHS MGR 1 GS05 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 22 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 22 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
V022C PURCHASING TECH 1 GS04 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S099C STATIONARY ENG 1 GS04 TST07P TRADES SPEC 1 SGS04
V023C STOREROOM SUPV 1 GS04 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 75 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 75 SGS02
S056C FOOD PREP SUPV 1 GS03 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 1 SGS03
M081C RES CARE SHIFT SUPV 1 GS03 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 1 SGS01
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 4 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
S068C FOOD PREP COORD 1 GS02 TFS01P COOK 1 SGS01
M076C REC ACTIVITY LEAD II 1 GS02 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 1 SGS01
M083C RES CARE TECH 2 GS02 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 2 SGS01
S087C INST SVCS ASST 1 GS01 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 1 SGS01
0425 STATE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT
U047U ACOM STATE INS COMM 1 SE03 EEX23A INS COMMER 1 EXE02
U042U ACOM INS CHIEF DEP CO 1 SE02 PPE06C INS DEP COMMISH 1 SPC10
103 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
N025N ACOM INS DEP COMM INF 1 SE01 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D028N REG HEALTH LINK TECH 1 IT10 IDA02C DATA ENGINEER 1 IST12
D010N ACOM INS CTO 1 IT08 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IAS06C APP SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 1 IST06
D022C SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 2 IST06
D022C SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 3 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 3 IST02
D044C SYST ANLST 1 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
N014N ACOM INS DEP COMM FIN 1 GS15 PPE06C INS DEP COMMISH 1 SPC10
N201N DEP COMM OF CRIM INVE 1 GS15 PPE06C INS DEP COMMISH 1 SPC10
G018N ACOM DIR RISK MNGMT 1 GS14 PRM02C RISK MNGMNT MNGR 1 SPC07
N140N ACOM INS ASST DEP COM 3 GS14 FIF06P INS EXAM SUPV/EXP 3 SPC07
A128C ACOM INS CLAIMS DIR P 1 GS14 PPE10C PUB EMP CLAIMS MNGR 1 SPC09
N190N ACOM INS GEN COUNSEL 1 GS14 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
X002N P&C MGR 1 GS14 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
A004N CERT FINAN EXAM MGR 3 GS13 FIF05P INS EXAM III 3 SPC06
G019C GEN COUNSEL 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 3 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 3 SPC08
G043N RISK MNGMT ASST DIR 1 GS13 PRM03P RISK MNGMNT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC05
G010C ACOM DIV MGR 1 GS12 MPA01P PHARMACIST 1 MED09
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
A004C CERT FINAN EXAM 2 GS12 FIF01P CERT FINAN EXAM 2 SPC06
A004C CERT FINAN EXAM 8 GS12 FIF04P INS EXAM II 8 SPC03
A004C CERT FINAN EXAM 1 GS12 FBF03P BANK EXAM II 1 SPC02
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 6 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 6 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 SRL03P ENFRCMNT AGENT III 1 LES05
A007C AUDIT MGR 1 GS11 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
P074C ACOM AID PUB INFO OFF 1 GS10 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
X009C ACOM INS DEPT DIR OF 1 GS10 SRL01P ENFRCMNT AGENT I 1 LES03
G259C ACOM INS PRGM MGR 4 GS10 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 4 SGS08
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 PCO02C COMM PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
X032C ACOM SEN SECS EXAM 1 GS09 FIF08P SEC EXAM II 1 SPC03
104 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G241C HEALTH INFO TECH OPER 1 GS09 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A042C INS SEN EXAM 6 GS09 FIF04P INS EXAM II 6 SPC03
X020C ACOM BURIAL ASSOCIATI 1 GS08 PPE02C BURIAL ASSOC BD COORD 1 SGS08
X018C ACOM INS CONS PROTECT 1 GS08 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
X017C ACOM INS LIC MGR 1 GS08 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G304C ACOM WRKRS' COMP PROG 1 GS08 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
X192C ASST DIR FRAUD INVSTI 1 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
X072C CRIM INS FRAUD INVSTI 7 GS08 SRL01P ENFRCMNT AGENT I 7 LES03
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A060C SEN AUD 2 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 2 SPC02
G064C SR HLTH INS INFO PRG 2 GS08 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G106C WCC CLAIMS SPEC 5 GS08 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 5 SGS07
A067C ACOM INS EXAM 1 GS07 FIF03P INS EXAM I 1 SPC01
A067C ACOM INS EXAM 1 GS07 FIN04P INVEST ANLST 1 SPC01
X083C ACOM INS LIFE & HEALT 4 GS07 PIC01I INS COMPE OFF 4 SGS06
X066C ACOM INS PREM TAX EXA 4 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 4 SPC01
A081C AUD 1 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 1 SPC01
X080C P&C COMP OFF 3 GS07 PIC01I INS COMPE OFF 3 SGS06
G120C RISK CONS 10 GS07 PRM01P RISK CONS 10 SPC01
C037C ADMINST ANLST 7 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 7 SGS05
X088C EMB & FNRL DIR INVSTI 2 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 2 SGS05
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
R029C HR RECRUITER 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 2 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS06
M066C PRGM ELGBLTY SPEC 3 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 3 SGS05
G202C VOL PRGM COORD 3 GS06 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 3 SGS06
C016C ACOM INS ADMINST COOR 1 GS05 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C016C ACOM INS ADMINST COOR 2 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
R033C BENE ANLST 1 GS05 HBE01P BENE ANLST 1 SGS04
X123C INS INVSTIGTR 9 GS05 IIV02P INVEST I 9 SGS04
G201C WCC CLAIMS ANLST 3 GS05 PCR02P CLAIMS REV SPEC 3 SGS03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 13 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 13 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 4 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS04
R036C HR SPEC 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS06
105 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
X180C ACOM INS LIC TECH 7 GS03 PCR02P CLAIMS REV SPEC 7 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 10 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 10 SGS02
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 1 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C084C MAIL SVCS SPEC 1 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0410 STATE SECURITIES DEPARTMENT
U040U ACOM SECS COMM 1 SE02 EEX38A SEC COMMER 1 EXE02
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
N137N ACOM SECS DEP COMM 1 GS14 PPE03C DEP SEC COMMER 1 SPC09
X008C ACOM SECS CHIEF EXAM 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
X008C ACOM SECS CHIEF EXAM 1 GS13 FIF02C CHIEF SEC EXAM 1 SPC07
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
X015C ACOM SECS EXAM SUPV 5 GS11 FIF09P SEC EXAM SUPV/EXP 5 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 4 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 4 SPC05
X032C ACOM SEN SECS EXAM 9 GS09 FIF08P SEC EXAM II 9 SPC03
X061C ACOM SECS EXAM 4 GS07 FIF07P SEC EXAM I 4 SPC01
A076C FINAN PRGM ANLST 1 GS07 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A075C FINAN ANLST I 1 GS07 FIF08P SEC EXAM II 1 SPC03
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
0405 STATE BANK DEPARTMENT
U049U ACOM STATE BANK COMM 1 SE04 EEX06A BANK COMMISH 1 EXE03
U086U ACOM BANK DEP COMM 2 SE02 EEX07A BANK DEP COMMISH 2 SPC10
D002N STATE DB ADMIN LEAD 1 IT11 IIA05C IT DIV MNGR 1 IST12
D012C DB SPEC 2 IT08 IAS06C APP SUPV/EXP 2 IST10
D022C SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 1 IST06
A005N ACOM ASST DEP BNK COM 6 GS15 FBF01C BANK DEP ADMIN 6 SPC09
A030C ACOM BNK CERT EXAMS M 9 GS14 FBF06P BANK EXAM SUPV/EXP 9 SPC07
G257C ACOM BNK CHIEF COUNS 1 GS14 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
A018C ACOM BANK CHIEF EXAM 1 GS14 FBF06P BANK EXAM SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
A039C CERT BANK SEN EXAM 18 GS13 FBF08P BANK EXAM VI 18 SPC06
A039C CERT BANK SEN EXAM 4 GS13 FBF07P BANK EXAM V 4 SPC05
A039C CERT BANK SEN EXAM 7 GS13 FBF05P BANK EXAM IV 7 SPC04
A039C CERT BANK SEN EXAM 10 GS13 FBF04P BANK EXAM III 10 SPC03
106 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A039C CERT BANK SEN EXAM 4 GS13 FBF03P BANK EXAM II 4 SPC02
A039C CERT BANK SEN EXAM 10 GS13 FBF02P BANK EXAM I 10 SPC01
R019C BUDGET MGR 1 GS09 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 3 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0402 AR DEPARTMENT OF AERONAUTICS
U021U ACOM AERONAUTICS DIR 1 GS12 PPE01C AERONAUTICS DIR 1 SPC07
B023C ENG, P.E. 1 GS11 SEN05P PROF ENGINEER 1 SPC05
B025C ACOM AERO ASST DIR 1 GS08 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
C114C ACOM EXEC ASST TO SEC 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
0395 DEVELOPMENT FINANCE AUTHORITY
U019U ACOM ADFA EXEC DIR 1 SE03 EEX20A FINAN AUTH DIR 1 EXE02
N024N ACOM DIR STDNT LOAN A 1 SE01 PPE12C STUDENT LOAN DIR 1 SPC09
A146C ACOM ADFA BUS FINAN D 1 GS15 PPF02P PUB FINAN OFF SUPV/EX 1 SPC07
G321C ACOM ADFA LEGAL COUNS 1 GS15 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
N066N ACOM CHIEF COMM & LEG 2 GS14 PPF02P PUB FINAN OFF SUPV/EX 2 SPC07
N066N ACOM CHIEF COMM & LEG 1 GS14 PCO04P COMM PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A017N ACOM ADFA PUB FINAN O 1 GS13 PPF01P PUB FINAN OFF 1 SPC05
A007N ACOM ASLA FED PRGMS F 1 GS13 PPF01P PUB FINAN OFF 1 SPC05
G027C ACOM ADFA PRGM OFF 1 GS12 FAC06C ASST CONTROLLER 1 SPC05
G027C ACOM ADFA PRGM OFF 1 GS12 FAU08P INT AUDITOR 1 SPC05
G027C ACOM ADFA PRGM OFF 6 GS12 PPF01P PUB FINAN OFF 6 SPC05
G027C ACOM ADFA PRGM OFF 1 GS12 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FIN03P FINAN SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
A040C ACOM ADFA FISC PRGM M 1 GS10 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
A040C ACOM ADFA FISC PRGM M 3 GS10 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 3 SGS07
A051C ACOM ADFA FINAN PRGM 4 GS09 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 4 SGS07
A051C ACOM ADFA FINAN PRGM 1 GS09 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
107 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A071C ACOM ADFA FINAN PRGM 4 GS08 PCO01P COMM PRGM COORD 4 SGS07
A022C STDNT LOAN FINAN SPEC 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G173C ACOM ADFA PRGM COORD 7 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 7 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 3 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 3 SGS07
A076C FINAN PRGM ANLST 1 GS07 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
A080C ACOM FINAN AUTH SPEC 5 GS06 PCO03P COMM PRGM SPEC 5 SGS06
A080C ACOM FINAN AUTH SPEC 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
0341 AR WATERWAYS COMMISSION
B009C ACOM DIR WATWAYS COMM 1 GS11 PPE13C WATERWAYS COMM DIR 1 SPC04
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
9903 DEPT OF CORRECTIONS
SC003 SEC OF CORRECTIONS 1 SE05 ESE03A SEC OF CORR 1 EXE04
N256N DOC COS 1 SE02 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
U083U DOC CFO 1 SE01 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
D140C DOC CIO 1 IT11 IIA02C CIO II 1 IST12
D012C DB SPEC 1 IT08 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
D094C DCC PROJ & ENTR PRGM 1 IT08 IIP03P IT SR PROJ MNGR 1 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS09P IT INFRA SPEC 1 IST04
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IDN02P DATA ANLST SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D017C INFO SYST SEC SPEC 1 IT07 IIE05C IT SEC MNGR 1 IST09
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 4 IT06 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 4 IST08
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 1 IT05 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT05 IDM02P DB ANLST 2 IST07
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 5 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 5 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IDM03P DB SPEC 1 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 4 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 4 IST04
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 1 IT03 PDA02P DATA/RESEARCH SPEC 1 SGS05
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 2 IT03 IIS09P IT INFRA SPEC 2 IST04
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 2 IT03 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 2 IST04
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 3 IT02 PDA02P DATA/RESEARCH SPEC 3 SGS05
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 1 IT02 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
108 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 13 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 13 IST02
N039N ADC DEP DIR 1 GS15 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
N048N ADC ASST DIR 1 GS14 SCP05C CORR ASST DIR II 1 SPC06
N261N DOC MENT HEALTH ADMIN 1 GS14 SCP05C CORR ASST DIR II 1 SPC06
N130N DOC SHARED SVCS CHIEF 2 GS14 SCP05C CORR ASST DIR II 2 SPC06
A108C ADC ASST CFO(CF0) 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
G024N ADC GEN COUNSEL 2 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 2 SPC08
N258N DOC APP RSRCHER 1 GS13 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
V043C DOC CHIEF PROC OFF 1 GS13 PPR03C PROC MNGR 1 SGS10
G347C DOC CONT IMPRV ADMIN 1 GS13 SCP05C CORR ASST DIR II 1 SPC06
G019C GEN COUNSEL 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
P003N ADC PUB INFO OFF 1 GS12 CPR01C CHIEF OF COMMS I 1 SPC06
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G348C DOC CHIEF OF INVESTI 1 GS12 IIV01C INVESTIGATIONS MNGR 1 SGS09
T129C DOC CHIEF TRNG OFF 1 GS12 CTR03C TRNG MNGR 1 SGS10
G346C DOC PLCY ADMIN 1 GS12 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH03C HR ADMIN II 1 SPC08
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 2 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 2 SPC04
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 2 GS11 HDH06C HR MNGR 2 SPC04
C112C ADC PLCY & RSRCH COOR 1 GS10 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
T015C DOC DEP WARDEN 1 GS10 SCO04C CORR MAJOR 1 LES07
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G222C DOC INT AFFRS ADMIN 1 GS09 SIA20C INT AFFRS MNGR 1 LES05
T027C DOC TRNG ADMIN 1 GS09 SPS04P LAW ENFORCE TRNG SUPV 1 LES06
G342C DOC VIC/WIT COORD 1 GS09 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
E022C ED & INSTRCTN MGR 1 GS09 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 1 GS08 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 1 LES04
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 1 GS08 SCO02P CORR CORPORAL 1 LES03
T104C DOC TRNG ACADEMY SUPV 1 GS08 CTR04P TRNG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
T104C DOC TRNG ACADEMY SUPV 1 GS08 SCO01C CORR CAPTAIN 1 LES06
A066C INT AUD 1 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 3 GS08 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 3 SGS08
109 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 2 SPC01
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH04P HR ANLST 1 SGS06
A081C AUD 1 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 1 SPC01
T075C DOC CORPORAL 1 GS07 SCO02P CORR CORPORAL 1 LES03
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
X053C INT AFFRS MGR 1 GS07 SIA21P INT AFFRS SUPV/EXP 1 LES04
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
A063C RSRCH & STATS SUPV 1 GS07 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
S011C ADC COMDTY & FOOD SVC 1 GS06 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 4 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 4 SGS05
X133C DOC INT AFFRS INVEST 6 GS06 SIA19P INT AFFRS INVEST 6 LES03
R030C EEO/GRIEVANCE OFF 1 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 5 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 5 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
R025C HR ANLST 3 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 3 SGS06
T103C LAW ENFORCE TRNG INST 11 GS06 SPS03P LAW ENFRCMNT TRNG OFF 11 LES04
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CME05P MEDIA TECH 1 SGS04
M048C SUB ABUSE PRGM LEAD 1 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
R033C BENE ANLST 1 GS05 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
V014C BUYER 4 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS04
V013C CENTRAL WRHS OP MGR 1 GS05 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
M058C DOC PRGM SPEC 1 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 9 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 9 SGS04
R032C HR PRGM REP 5 GS05 HDH04P HR ANLST 5 SGS06
R031C INSTITUTION HR COORD 2 GS05 HDH05P HR COORD 2 SGS07
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 6 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 6 SGS05
E051C STAFF DEV SPEC 3 GS05 PAS13C POLICY COORD 3 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 8 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 8 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 22 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 22 SGS04
R038C HR ASST 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
110 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R036C HR SPEC 2 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 2 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 2 SGS05
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
V022C PURCHASING TECH 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 4 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 1 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
V030C SHIP & RECEIV CLERK 1 GS02 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
0485 DEPT OF COMMUNITY CORRECTION
U084U DCC DIR 1 SE02 SCP07C CORR DIV DIR 1 EXE01
N129N DCC DEP DIR COMM SPRV 1 GS14 SCP05C CORR ASST DIR II 1 SPC06
N114N DCC DEP DIR RES SVCS 1 GS14 SCP05C CORR ASST DIR II 1 SPC06
T005C DOC CORR WARDEN 1 GS12 SCP13C DEP WARDEN II 1 LES09
T005C DOC CORR WARDEN 5 GS12 SCP12C DEP WARDEN I 5 LES08
T004C DCC PRGM ADMR COMM SP 4 GS11 SCP04C CORR ASST DIR I 4 SPC05
T004C DCC PRGM ADMR COMM SP 1 GS11 TCO04P CNSTRCT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
M001C DCC TREAT ADMIN 1 GS11 SCM10P SUB USE DIS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
T033C DOC MAJOR 3 GS11 SCO04C CORR MAJOR 3 LES07
X025C DCC COMM SPRVS AREA M 1 GS10 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
X025C DCC COMM SPRVS AREA M 16 GS10 SCL01C COMM SUPV MNGR 16 LES06
X025C DCC COMM SPRVS AREA M 1 GS10 SCL05P COMM SUPV SUPV/EXP 1 LES05
T048C DOC CAPTAIN 3 GS10 SCO01C CORR CAPTAIN 3 LES06
T048C DOC CAPTAIN 1 GS10 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 1 LES04
T015C DOC DEP WARDEN 1 GS10 SCP12C DEP WARDEN I 1 LES08
T015C DOC DEP WARDEN 2 GS10 SCO04C CORR MAJOR 2 LES07
T015C DOC DEP WARDEN 1 GS10 SCO01C CORR CAPTAIN 1 LES06
T054C DOC LIEUTENANT 32 GS09 SCO03C CORR LT 32 LES05
T054C DOC LIEUTENANT 1 GS09 SCO02P CORR CORPORAL 1 LES03
S094C ADC CNSTRCT/MAINT COO 2 GS08 TCO03P CNSTRCT PROJ MNGR 2 SGS08
M007C DCC ASST TREAT PRGM M 7 GS08 SCM08P SUB USE DIS COORD 7 SGS07
X042C DCC COMM SPRVS ASST A 47 GS08 SCL05P COMM SUPV SUPV/EXP 47 LES05
M021C DCC TREAT SUPV 7 GS08 SCM08P SUB USE DIS COORD 7 SGS07
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 48 GS08 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 48 LES04
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 14 GS08 SCO02P CORR CORPORAL 14 LES03
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 5 GS08 SCO05P CORR OFF 5 LES02
T045C DCC COMM SPRVS OFF 1 GS07 SCO03C CORR LT 1 LES05
T045C DCC COMM SPRVS OFF 308 GS07 SCL04P COMM SUPV OFF III 308 LES04
111 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
T045C DCC COMM SPRVS OFF 1 GS07 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 1 LES04
T045C DCC COMM SPRVS OFF 138 GS07 SCL03P COMM SUPV OFF II 138 LES03
T045C DCC COMM SPRVS OFF 101 GS07 SCL02P COMM SUPV OFF I 101 LES02
G154C DCC PRGM COORD 5 GS07 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 5 SGS07
T075C DOC CORPORAL 1 GS07 SCP16P INMATE HEARING OFF 1 SGS06
T075C DOC CORPORAL 3 GS07 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 3 LES04
T075C DOC CORPORAL 112 GS07 SCO02P CORR CORPORAL 112 LES03
T075C DOC CORPORAL 179 GS07 SCO05P CORR OFF 179 LES02
T059C DOC FOOD PREP MGR 7 GS07 SCO03C CORR LT 7 LES05
T059C DOC FOOD PREP MGR 4 GS07 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 4 LES04
M046C DOC TREAT COORD 2 GS07 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
M046C DOC TREAT COORD 15 GS07 SCM08P SUB USE DIS COORD 15 SGS07
M046C DOC TREAT COORD 1 GS07 SCL04P COMM SUPV OFF III 1 LES04
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
A063C RSRCH & STATS SUPV 1 GS07 PAS15P RECORDS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 4 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 4 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS14P RECORDS COORD 2 SGS05
M057C CHAPLAIN 6 GS06 SCM01I CHAPLAIN 6 SGS06
T083C DOC CORR OFF I 1 GS06 SCO05P CORR OFF 1 LES02
T070C DOC FOOD PREP SUPV 19 GS06 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 19 LES04
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
M048C SUB ABUSE PRGM LEAD 47 GS06 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 47 SGS07
M048C SUB ABUSE PRGM LEAD 11 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 11 SGS06
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 PAS06I CREER PLACEMENT SPEC 1 SGS04
C022C BUS OP SPEC 6 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 6 SGS04
G215C CREER PLNNG & PLCMNT 14 GS05 PAS06I CREER PLACEMENT SPEC 14 SGS04
G200C CLSSFCTN & ASSGNMNT O 4 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 4 SGS06
X128C CORR UNIT ACCRED SPEC 1 GS05 SCP01I ACCREDITATION SPEC 1 SGS03
T092C DCC COMM SPRVS OFF I 1 GS05 SCL02P COMM SUPV OFF I 1 LES02
T076C DOC ADMIN REV OFF 7 GS05 SCP16P INMATE HEARING OFF 7 SGS06
M059C DOC ADVSR 134 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 134 SGS06
S026C DOC ASST MAINT SUPV 9 GS05 TMA01P MAINT COORD 9 SGS05
M058C DOC PRGM SPEC 10 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 10 SGS06
C024C DOC REC SUPV 8 GS05 PAS14P RECORDS COORD 8 SGS05
R031C INSTITUTION HR COORD 5 GS05 HDH05P HR COORD 5 SGS07
R031C INSTITUTION HR COORD 1 GS05 HDH04P HR ANLST 1 SGS06
112 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 69 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 69 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 22 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 22 SGS02
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 4 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 64 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 64 SGS02
0480 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION
U035U ADC DIR 1 SE04 SCP07C CORR DIV DIR 1 EXE01
U062U ADC CHIEF DEP DIR 1 SE02 EEX14A CORR CHIEF DEP DIR 1 SPC10
L001C PSYCHOLOGIST SUPV 3 MP04 MPS04P PSYCHOLOGIST II 3 MED09
L097C ADC PSYCHOLOGIST 11 MP03 MPS03P PSYCHOLOGIST I 11 MED08
L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 1 MP03 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L038C RN 1 MP01 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
N039N ADC DEP DIR 2 GS15 SCP06C CORR DEP DIR 2 SPC09
N048N ADC ASST DIR 1 GS14 SCP05C CORR ASST DIR II 1 SPC06
G014N ADC COMP ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
T001N ADC SUPER 1 GS13 SCP04C CORR ASST DIR I 1 SPC05
T001N ADC SUPER 6 GS13 SCP22C WARDEN II 6 LES11
N120N ADC FRM ADMIN 1 GS12 TAG02C FARM MNGR 1 SGS10
N136N ADC HEALTH SVC ADMIN 1 GS12 MNU05C NRSNG ADMIN 1 MED08
N119N ADC INDST ADMIN 1 GS12 SCP09C CORR PRGM MNGR 1 SGS10
T005C DOC CORR WARDEN 9 GS12 SCP21C WARDEN I 9 LES10
T005C DOC CORR WARDEN 1 GS12 SCP13C DEP WARDEN II 1 LES09
T109C SEX OFFNDR COMM NOTIF 1 GS12 SCP09C CORR PRGM MNGR 1 SGS10
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
S108C DOC CNSTRCT DIV MGR 1 GS11 TCO04P CNSTRCT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
T033C DOC MAJOR 24 GS11 SCO04C CORR MAJOR 24 LES07
T033C DOC MAJOR 1 GS11 SCO01C CORR CAPTAIN 1 LES06
T048C DOC CAPTAIN 55 GS10 SCO01C CORR CAPTAIN 55 LES06
T015C DOC DEP WARDEN 25 GS10 SCP13C DEP WARDEN II 25 LES09
T006C ADC HEAD FRM MGR II 1 GS09 TAG03P FARM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
T006C ADC HEAD FRM MGR II 2 GS09 TAG01P FARM COORD 2 SGS06
T054C DOC LIEUTENANT 159 GS09 SCO03C CORR LT 159 LES05
E022C ED & INSTRCTN MGR 2 GS09 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
B042C ENG 1 GS09 SEN01P ENGINEER 1 SPC03
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 11 GS09 SCM03P LIC CLIN SOC WORKER 11 SPC03
113 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 SCM05P LIC PROF COUNSELOR 1 SPC03
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 9 GS09 SCM04P LIC MASTER SOC WORKER 9 SPC02
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 3 GS09 SCM06P LIC SOC WORKER 3 SPC01
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAM 1 GS09 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAM 1 GS09 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAM 2 GS09 MPS02P PSYCH EXAM 2 MED03
L041C ADC ASST MED PRGM MGR 1 GS08 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
S094C ADC CNSTRCT/MAINT COO 4 GS08 TCO03P CNSTRCT PROJ MNGR 4 SGS08
T021C ADC HEAD FRM MGR I 1 GS08 TAG03P FARM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
T021C ADC HEAD FRM MGR I 2 GS08 TAG01P FARM COORD 2 SGS06
S010C ADC INDST PRGM MGR 6 GS08 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 6 SGS08
S010C ADC INDST PRGM MGR 1 GS08 TCO02P CNSTRCT PROJ COORD 1 SGS06
M031C ADMIN OF CHAPLAINCY S 1 GS08 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 1 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 1 GS08 SIA10P CRIM INTEL ANLST 1 SGS06
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 721 GS08 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 721 LES04
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 151 GS08 SCO02P CORR CORPORAL 151 LES03
T065C DOC CORR SERGEANT 11 GS08 SCO05P CORR OFF 11 LES02
A066C INT AUD 1 GS08 SCP01I ACCREDITATION SPEC 1 SGS03
M088C LIC MSTR SOCIAL WRKR 7 GS08 SCM04P LIC MASTER SOC WORKER 7 SPC02
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 1 GS08 SCM05P LIC PROF COUNSELOR 1 SPC03
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 2 GS08 SCM02P LIC ASSOC COUNSELOR 2 SPC01
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 1 GS08 SCM06P LIC SOC WORKER 1 SPC01
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 1 GS08 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 2 GS08 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 50 GS08 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 50 SGS06
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 9 GS08 SCM09P SUB USE DIS SPEC 9 SGS06
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
G121C REHAB PRGM MGR 9 GS08 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 9 SGS07
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
G142C ADC CLSSFCTN ADMIN 1 GS07 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
S096C ADC CNSTRCT PROJ SUPV 14 GS07 TCO02P CNSTRCT PROJ COORD 14 SGS06
S096C ADC CNSTRCT PROJ SUPV 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G159C DEPT BUS COORD 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
114 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
S019C DIR MAINT 1 GS07 TMA02C MAINT MNGR 1 SGS07
S019C DIR MAINT 9 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 9 SGS06
T075C DOC CORPORAL 2253 GS07 SCO02P CORR CORPORAL 2253 LES03
T075C DOC CORPORAL 63 GS07 SCO05P CORR OFF 63 LES02
T059C DOC FOOD PREP MGR 1 GS07 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
T059C DOC FOOD PREP MGR 1 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
T059C DOC FOOD PREP MGR 18 GS07 SCO03C CORR LT 18 LES05
G322C DOC INM GRIEV COORD 2 GS07 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 2 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 2 SGS07
M026C LIC SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS07 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
L052C REHAB FCLTY SUPV 6 GS07 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 6 SGS07
M049C SEN CHAPLAIN 7 GS07 SCM01I CHAPLAIN 7 SGS06
E041C SEN LIBRN 1 GS07 ELI01P LIBRARIAN 1 SGS06
M023C SUB ABUSE PRGM COORD 1 GS07 SCM10P SUB USE DIS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
M023C SUB ABUSE PRGM COORD 3 GS07 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 3 SGS07
B040C ADC AGRI PROD SUPV 1 GS06 TAG01P FARM COORD 1 SGS06
T040C ADC ASST HEAD FRM MGR 3 GS06 TAG01P FARM COORD 3 SGS06
T040C ADC ASST HEAD FRM MGR 1 GS06 PAG06P AGRI UNIT COORD 1 SGS04
S095C ADC CNSTRCT PROJ SPEC 6 GS06 TST02P LIC TRADES 6 SGS07
S095C ADC CNSTRCT PROJ SPEC 2 GS06 TCO02P CNSTRCT PROJ COORD 2 SGS06
S095C ADC CNSTRCT PROJ SPEC 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
S027C ADC INDST SUPV II 19 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 19 SGS06
S105C ADC INDST PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
T039C ADC INMATE TRNSPRTN C 1 GS06 SIA10P CRIM INTEL ANLST 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 13 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 13 SGS05
T053C AGRI UNIT SUPV II 5 GS06 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 5 SGS07
T053C AGRI UNIT SUPV II 26 GS06 PAG06P AGRI UNIT COORD 26 SGS04
M044C ASSOC PROF CNSLR 14 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 14 SGS06
M057C CHAPLAIN 18 GS06 SCM01I CHAPLAIN 18 SGS06
L058C DISEASE INTRVNTN SPEC 1 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
L058C DISEASE INTRVNTN SPEC 1 GS06 MNU02P LPN SUPV/EXP 1 MED03
G340C DOC ASST INM GRIEV CO 6 GS06 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 6 SGS07
T070C DOC FOOD PREP SUPV 86 GS06 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 86 LES04
X133C DOC INT AFFRS INVEST 2 GS06 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
C026C REC/INTAKE SUPV 2 GS06 PAS15P RECORDS SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
T061C SEN IA 1 GS06 SCO06P CORR SERGEANT 1 LES04
115 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
S016C SKILLED TRADES FOREMA 1 GS06 TST02P LIC TRADES 1 SGS07
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST02P LIC TRADES 1 SGS07
M048C SUB ABUSE PRGM LEAD 38 GS06 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 38 SGS07
M048C SUB ABUSE PRGM LEAD 7 GS06 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 7 SGS06
T041C WORK REL PRGM SUPV 4 GS06 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 4 SGS07
G216C ADC INMATE GRIEVANCE 19 GS05 SCP15P INMATE GRIEV COORD 19 SGS05
P044C ADC SALES REP 4 GS05 CMA03P MRKTNG SPEC 4 SGS04
T071C ADC UNIT TRNG SUPV 17 GS05 CTR02P TRAINER 17 SGS07
T058C AGRI UNIT SUPV I 3 GS05 SCP08P CORR PRGM COORD 3 SGS07
C022C BUS OP SPEC 17 GS05 PPR01P PROC ANLST 17 SGS06
G215C CREER PLNNG & PLCMNT 2 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 2 SGS06
G200C CLSSFCTN & ASSGNMNT O 19 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 19 SGS06
G200C CLSSFCTN & ASSGNMNT O 1 GS05 SCP15P INMATE GRIEV COORD 1 SGS05
X128C CORR UNIT ACCRED SPEC 12 GS05 SCP01I ACCREDITATION SPEC 12 SGS03
X127C DISC HEARING OFF 5 GS05 SCP16P INMATE HEARING OFF 5 SGS06
T076C DOC ADMIN REV OFF 6 GS05 SCP16P INMATE HEARING OFF 6 SGS06
M059C DOC ADVSR 13 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 13 SGS06
M059C DOC ADVSR 1 GS05 SCM09P SUB USE DIS SPEC 1 SGS06
S026C DOC ASST MAINT SUPV 13 GS05 TMA01P MAINT COORD 13 SGS05
M058C DOC PRGM SPEC 14 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 14 SGS06
C024C DOC REC SUPV 8 GS05 PAS15P RECORDS SUPV/EXP 8 SGS06
C024C DOC REC SUPV 14 GS05 PAS14P RECORDS COORD 14 SGS05
C024C DOC REC SUPV 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
R031C INSTITUTION HR COORD 15 GS05 HDH05P HR COORD 15 SGS07
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 2 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 2 SGS05
M065C REC ACTIVITY SUPV 20 GS05 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 20 SGS06
S043C ADC INDST SUPV I 7 GS04 SCP10P CORR PRGM SPEC 7 SGS06
T077C ADC MLRM SVCS COORD 15 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 15 SGS02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 33 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 33 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 13 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 13 SGS04
R038C HR ASST 2 GS04 HDH04P HR ANLST 2 SGS06
R038C HR ASST 20 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 20 SGS04
R036C HR SPEC 2 GS04 HDH04P HR ANLST 2 SGS06
S051C INSTRUMENTATION TECH 1 GS04 TST07P TRADES SPEC 1 SGS04
116 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 24 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 24 SGS03
V024C ADC PROP OFF 2 GS03 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 2 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 65 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 65 SGS02
T081C COMMISSARY MGR 29 GS03 SCP03I COMMISSARY COORD 29 SGS04
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 102 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 102 SGS02
0328 AR SENTENCING COMMISSION
U081U AR SNTNCNG COMM DIR 1 GS13 SCP02C AR SENTNG COMM DIR 1 SPC08
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 SCP11P CORR PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
X038C QA MGR 1 GS09 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
0323 POST-PRISON TRANSFER BOARD
U038U PAROLE BD CHAIRMAN 1 SE01 EEX29A PPT BOARD CHAIR 1 EXE01
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
G055N EXEC ADMIN 1 GS13 SCP18C PPT BOARD ADMIN 1 SPC05
G019N PAROLE BD MEMBER 6 GS13 SCP19C PPT BOARD MEMBER 6 SPC08
G023N REVOCATION HEARING JU 3 GS12 SCP20I REV HEARING OFF 3 SPC05
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
X137C PAROLE BD INVSTIGTR 2 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 2 SGS05
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 4 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 4 SGS04
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
9904 DEPT OF EDUCATION
SC004 SEC OF ED 1 SE05 ESE05A SEC OF ED 1 EXE04
E080C ADE COS 1 SE04 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
U089U DHE DEP DIR 1 SE02 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
G331C ADE CLC 1 SE01 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
D011N ADE DIR OF INFO SYST 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
N009N ASST COMM FISCAL & AD 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
D147C ADE CIO 1 IT12 IIA03C CIO III 1 IST14
D146C ADE ENTR ARCHITECT 1 IT11 IDA01C DATA ARCHITECT 1 IST13
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IIS08C IT INFRA MNGR 1 IST11
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIE01C CHIEF INFO SEC OFF 1 IST12
117 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IDM01P DB ADMIN 1 IST09
D104C ADE STATE SYST ADMIN 1 IT08 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D006C SFTWR ENG LEAD 1 IT08 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D030C INFO SYST COORD 2 IT07 IIS01P IT COORD 2 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D047C INFO SYST BUS ANLST 1 IT05 IAS06C APP SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 1 IT05 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
G001N ADE LITIGATION ATRNY 1 GS15 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G281C ADE PLCY & SPCL PROJS 1 GS15 EEA03C HIGHER ED PROG MNGR 1 SPC09
N002N DHE SEN ASSOC DIR 1 GS15 EEA03C HIGHER ED PROG MNGR 1 SPC09
N002N DHE SEN ASSOC DIR 1 GS15 EEP04C ED PRGM MNGR 1 SPC06
N069N ADE SPCL ADVSR 1 GS14 CPR03C GOV AFFRS SPEC 1 SPC05
E001N ADE COORD SPCL PRGMS 1 GS13 HDH02C HR ADMIN I 1 SPC05
E001N ADE COORD SPCL PRGMS 1 GS13 SSP06I OMBUDSMAN 1 SGS08
G012C ADE ASST TO DIR 1 GS12 CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMS II 1 SPC07
G012C ADE ASST TO DIR 1 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G012C ADE ASST TO DIR 1 GS12 EES02P ED PROF II 1 SPC04
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FAU08P INT AUDITOR 1 SPC05
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FIN03P FINAN SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G047C ATRNY SPEC 2 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 2 SPC05
E006C PUB SCHOOL PRGM MGR 1 GS11 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
E061C ACE PRGM COORD 1 GS10 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
G075C ADE PRGM ADMIN 1 GS10 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 LAT03P ATTY I 1 SPC03
E016C PUB SCHOOL PRGM COORD 1 GS10 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
A032C ADE FINAN PRGM COORD 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 2 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
118 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
E019C PUB SCHOOL PRGM ADVSR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 2 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 2 SPC02
E031C ED PRGM COORD 2 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 3 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 3 SGS07
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
S008C CAMPUS MAINT SUPV 2 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
A075C FINAN ANLST I 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
P020C PROD ARTIST 2 GS07 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 2 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
S033C MAINT SUPV 2 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 2 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
S046C MAINT TECH 2 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 2 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0700 DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
U024U DHE DIR 1 SE05 EEX13A COMMER OF HIGHER ED 1 EXE03
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
D012C DB SPEC 2 IT08 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 2 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS01P IT COORD 1 IST08
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
119 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
G281C ADE PLCY & SPCL PROJS 1 GS15 EES03P ED PROF SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
N002N DHE SEN ASSOC DIR 1 GS15 EEP04C ED PRGM MNGR 1 SPC06
N069N ADE SPCL ADVSR 1 GS14 EEA03C HIGHER ED PROG MNGR 1 SPC09
N055N DHE ASSOC DIR 1 GS14 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
N054N DHE CREER PATHWAYS DI 1 GS13 EES03P ED PROF SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
N167N DHS PLCY & RSRCH DIR 1 GS12 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
G058C DHE FED PRGM MGR 1 GS11 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
G058C DHE FED PRGM MGR 1 GS11 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E061C ACE PRGM COORD 1 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
G071C DHE PRGM COORD 6 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 6 SPC02
E062C ACE PRGM ADVSR 2 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
G102C DHE PRGM SPEC 7 GS09 EES01P ED PROF I 7 SPC02
G102C DHE PRGM SPEC 9 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 9 SGS07
G102C DHE PRGM SPEC 1 GS09 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
G102C DHE PRGM SPEC 1 GS09 IIS09P IT INFRA SPEC 1 IST04
G080C NAT & COMM SVCS EXEC 1 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G295C OSTEOPATHIC RURAL MED 1 GS09 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 1 GS06 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0590 DEPT OF CAREER EDUCATION
U077U ACE DIR CREER & TECH 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
N069N ADE SPCL ADVSR 1 GS14 EES03P ED PROF SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
E076C ADE CREER ED DIV MGR 1 GS12 EES02P ED PROF II 1 SPC04
E061C ACE PRGM COORD 9 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 9 SPC02
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
E062C ACE PRGM ADVSR 18 GS09 EES01P ED PROF I 18 SPC02
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 3 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 3 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
120 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R036C HR SPEC 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 5 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 5 SGS02
0552 NORTHWEST TECHNICAL INSTITUTE
N227N NWTI DIR 1 SE01 ESA02C NTI DIR 1 SPC08
L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR 6 MP02 MNU03P NURSE INSTRUCTOR 6 MED06
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
E077C NWTI AMM REFRIGN TECH 1 GS13 ETF02P AMM & INDST TRNG SUPV 1 SGS10
E009C TECH INSTI ASST DIR 2 GS12 ESA01C NTI ASST DIR 2 SPC05
E071C AMMONIA & INDST TRAIN 2 GS10 ETF01P AMM & INDST TRAINER 2 SGS08
E013C ED PRGM MGR 1 GS10 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
E013C ED PRGM MGR 2 GS10 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
E013C ED PRGM MGR 1 GS10 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
E078C NWTI BUS & INDST COOR 1 GS10 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E022C ED & INSTRCTN MGR 3 GS09 CTR02P TRAINER 3 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
E018C SPCLIZED TECH FACULTY 7 GS08 ETF04P CREER & TECH FCLTY II 7 SPC02
E027C CREER & TECH FACULTY 28 GS07 ETF03P CREER & TECH FCLTY I 28 SPC01
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
S017C MAINT COORD 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G144C TECH INSTI PRGM COORD 2 GS07 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS10
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
C035C ASST REGISTRAR 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
G218C STDNT RECRUITMENT SPE 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 4 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 4 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A100C PYRLL OFF 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 4 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
S050C MAINT SPEC 1 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S065C MAINT ASST 2 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 2 SGS03
0519 ARKANSAS STATE LIBRARY
U031U STATE LIBRARY DIR 1 SE01 ELI05C STATE LIBRARIAN 1 SPC08
N161N STATE LIBRARY DEP DIR 1 GS12 ELI02C LIBRARY MNGR 1 SGS10
E012C STATE LIBRARY DIV MGR 1 GS10 ELI02C LIBRARY MNGR 1 SGS10
121 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
E021C STATE LIBRARY MGR 7 GS09 ELI04P LIBRARY SUPV/EXP 7 SGS08
E021C STATE LIBRARY MGR 1 GS09 ELI01P LIBRARIAN 1 SGS06
E030C LIBRARY COORD 5 GS08 ELI01P LIBRARIAN 5 SGS06
E041C SEN LIBRN 7 GS07 ELI01P LIBRARIAN 7 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
E052C LIBRN 3 GS06 ELI01P LIBRARIAN 3 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 ELI03P LIBRARY SPEC 1 SGS02
C069C LIBRARY TECH 4 GS03 ELI03P LIBRARY SPEC 4 SGS02
C085C LIBRARY SUPP ASST 3 GS02 ELI03P LIBRARY SPEC 3 SGS02
C089C LIBRARY TECH ASST 2 GS01 ELI03P LIBRARY SPEC 2 SGS02
0513 SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF
U029U DEAF SCHOOL SUPER 1 SE01 ESA04C SCHOOL SUPER 1 SPC08
L027C RN SUPV 1 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L045C AUDIOLOGIST 1 MP01 MLM01C AUDIOLOGIST 1 MED07
L038C RN 1 MP01 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
L042C SCHOOL SPEECH PATH 5 MP01 MLM07C SPEECH PATHOLOGIST 5 MED07
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 2 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
E004C SCHOOL PRINCIPAL 1 GS11 ESA03C PRINCIPAL 1 SPC05
E017C ASST PRINCIPAL 1 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
E013C ED PRGM MGR 1 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
E036C CERT MSTRS DEGREE LIB 1 GS09 ELI01P LIBRARIAN 1 SGS06
L040C DIETARY SVCS DIR 1 GS09 TFS03C FOOD SVCS MNGR 1 SGS09
E022C ED & INSTRCTN MGR 1 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E025C EDAL SPEC 1 GS09 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
E025C EDAL SPEC 1 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E015C SPCL ED SUPV 1 GS09 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
E035C CERT MSTRS TCHR 1 GS08 SIA23P PUB SAFETY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
E035C CERT MSTRS TCHR 22 GS08 ETF06P TEACHER II 22 SGS07
E035C CERT MSTRS TCHR 11 GS08 ETF05P TEACHER I 11 SGS06
M088C LIC MSTR SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS08 SCM02P LIC ASSOC COUNSELOR 1 SPC01
M020C LIC PROF CNSLR 1 GS08 SCM07P SCHOOL COUNSELOR 1 SPC01
122 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
E029C SIGN LANGUAGE COORD 1 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E032C ED CNSLR 1 GS07 SCM07P SCHOOL COUNSELOR 1 SPC01
E032C ED CNSLR 1 GS07 ETF05P TEACHER I 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
M024C RES SVCS MGR 1 GS07 PRC02C RES SVCS MNGR 1 SGS07
L069C LPN 2 GS06 MNU01P LPN 2 MED02
M064C RES ACTIVITIES SUPV 3 GS05 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 3 SGS04
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 2 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 2 SGS06
S038C TRANSIT OP SUPV 1 GS05 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
V018C WRHS MGR 1 GS05 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
L078C FAM SVCS ASST 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S047C LANDSCAPE SUPV 1 GS04 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 1 SGS02
S046C MAINT TECH 3 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 3 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 5 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 5 SGS02
L082C CERT NRSNG ASST 1 GS03 THT01I CNA 1 SGS03
C058C ED PARAPROF 19 GS03 EEP01P ED PARAPROF 19 SGS03
S056C FOOD PREP SUPV 1 GS03 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 1 SGS03
C053C MED REC TECH 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
M074C RES ADVSR 21 GS03 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 21 SGS01
S068C FOOD PREP COORD 2 GS02 TFS01P COOK 2 SGS01
S084C INST SVCS SUPV 1 GS02 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S086C COOK 6 GS01 TFS01P COOK 6 SGS01
S086C COOK 1 GS01 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 1 SGS01
S065C MAINT ASST 1 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S065C MAINT ASST 2 GS01 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 2 SGS01
0510 SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
U030U BLIND SCHOOL SUPER 1 SE01 ESA04C SCHOOL SUPER 1 SPC08
L038C RN 1 MP01 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
L042C SCHOOL SPEECH PATH 1 MP01 MLM07C SPEECH PATHOLOGIST 1 MED07
E004C SCHOOL PRINCIPAL 1 GS11 ESA03C PRINCIPAL 1 SPC05
E004C SCHOOL PRINCIPAL 1 GS11 EES02P ED PROF II 1 SPC04
L040C DIETARY SVCS DIR 1 GS09 TFS03C FOOD SVCS MNGR 1 SGS09
E024C TCHR SUPV 2 GS09 EES01P ED PROF I 2 SPC02
123 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
E035C CERT MSTRS TCHR 1 GS08 TMA02C MAINT MNGR 1 SGS07
E035C CERT MSTRS TCHR 24 GS08 ETF06P TEACHER II 24 SGS07
E035C CERT MSTRS TCHR 8 GS08 ETF05P TEACHER I 8 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
S009C ASD/ASB TRNSPRTN SVCS 1 GS06 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E044C CERT BACHELORS TCHR 2 GS06 ETF05P TEACHER I 2 SGS06
L069C LPN 2 GS06 MNU01P LPN 2 MED02
M064C RES ACTIVITIES SUPV 1 GS05 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS04
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 2 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 2 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
S047C LANDSCAPE SUPV 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S046C MAINT TECH 2 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 2 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
C058C ED PARAPROF 12 GS03 EEP01P ED PARAPROF 12 SGS03
S056C FOOD PREP SUPV 1 GS03 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 1 SGS03
V027C INVNTRY CONT TECH 1 GS03 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
M074C RES ADVSR 9 GS03 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 9 SGS01
S068C FOOD PREP COORD 2 GS02 TFS01P COOK 2 SGS01
S086C COOK 6 GS01 TFS01P COOK 6 SGS01
S087C INST SVCS ASST 4 GS01 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 4 SGS01
S065C MAINT ASST 1 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
0500 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
E083C ADE DEP SEC OF ED 1 SE04 EEX11A CHIEF PRGMS DIR 1 EXE03
U027U DEP COMM OF ED 1 SE03 EEX11A CHIEF PRGMS DIR 1 EXE03
E081C ADE ASSOC DEP 3 SE02 EEA02C ED DIV DIR 3 SPC09
N249N DHS DIV DIR 1 SE02 EEA02C ED DIV DIR 1 SPC09
N005N ADE ASST COMM LRNG SV 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
N006N ADE ASST COMM PUB SCH 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
N015N ADE DIR PUB SCHOOL FA 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
N008N ASST COMM RSRCH & TEC 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
N010N ASST COMMR EDUC EFFEC 1 SE01 EEA01C ED DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
L027C RN SUPV 1 MP02 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
D105C ADE STATE NET ENG 1 IT09 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
D104C ADE STATE SYST ADMIN 2 IT08 IAS01P APP ANLST I 2 IST07
124 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D104C ADE STATE SYST ADMIN 3 IT08 IDN01P DATA ANLST 3 IST07
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IDN02P DATA ANLST SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D042C DATA WRHS SPEC 1 IT06 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D037C ADE APSCN AP MGR 3 IT05 IAS01P APP ANLST I 3 IST07
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D047C INFO SYST BUS ANLST 2 IT05 IAS01P APP ANLST I 2 IST07
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 2 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
D057C INFO TECH MGR 1 IT05 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D044C SYST ANLST 1 IT05 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D055C ADE APSCN FLD ANLST 25 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 25 IST02
D062C DB ANLST 1 IT04 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 1 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D075C SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 2 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
N047N ADE APSCN DIR 1 GS15 IIA06C IT MNGR 1 IST10
E082C ADE PRGM DIR 1 GS15 EEP02C ED PRGM ADMIN 1 SPC07
N046N ADE ASST DIR ACADEMIC 1 GS14 EES03P ED PROF SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
N069N ADE SPCL ADVSR 1 GS14 EEP02C ED PRGM ADMIN 1 SPC07
N069N ADE SPCL ADVSR 6 GS14 EES03P ED PROF SUPV/EXP 6 SPC06
N122N DHS/DCC ASST DIR FINA 1 GS14 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
E003N ADE COORD SCH. IMP/ST 1 GS13 FIN03P FINAN SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
E001N ADE COORD SPCL PRGMS 2 GS13 EES03P ED PROF SUPV/EXP 2 SPC06
E001N ADE COORD SPCL PRGMS 5 GS13 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 5 SGS07
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
G056C DHS/DCC ASST DIR OPS 3 GS13 EEP02C ED PRGM ADMIN 3 SPC07
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G012C ADE ASST TO DIR 8 GS12 EES02P ED PROF II 8 SPC04
G012C ADE ASST TO DIR 2 GS12 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS10
G012C ADE ASST TO DIR 1 GS12 SIA23P PUB SAFETY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G006C ADE SPCL ED DIV MGR 1 GS12 EES02P ED PROF II 1 SPC04
N145N DHS ASST DIR CMS 1 GS12 EEP04C ED PRGM MNGR 1 SPC06
E006N ADE COORD COMP SCI 1 GS11 EES02P ED PROF II 1 SPC04
125 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
E069C ADE DIR OF MEDICAID S 1 GS11 EES02P ED PROF II 1 SPC04
E006C PUB SCHOOL PRGM MGR 11 GS11 EES02P ED PROF II 11 SPC04
G051C ADE ACADEMIC FACLTS S 2 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 2 SPC02
G050C ADE APSCN DIV MGR 3 GS10 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 3 IST08
E007C ADE OERZ DIR 1 GS10 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
G075C ADE PRGM ADMIN 6 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 6 SPC02
E013C ED PRGM MGR 2 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 2 SPC02
E016C PUB SCHOOL PRGM COORD 20 GS10 EES01P ED PROF I 20 SPC02
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 4 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 4 SPC02
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 2 GS09 IAS01P APP ANLST I 2 IST07
G090C ADE AREA PROJ MGR 12 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 12 SGS07
G074C ADE COORD OF GOV AFFR 1 GS09 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
A032C ADE FINAN PRGM COORD 3 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 3 SGS06
X012C ADE PLSB CHIEF INVSTI 1 GS09 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X012C ADE PLSB CHIEF INVSTI 1 GS09 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 1 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 EEC01C EC PRGM ADMIN 1 SGS10
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 3 GS09 PQA02C QA MNGR 3 SGS09
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 2 GS09 EEC05P EC PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 PQA04P QA SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 4 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 4 SGS06
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 1 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
E019C PUB SCHOOL PRGM ADVSR 87 GS09 EES01P ED PROF I 87 SPC02
E019C PUB SCHOOL PRGM ADVSR 5 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 5 SGS07
E019C PUB SCHOOL PRGM ADVSR 1 GS09 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
G039C SEN TRNSPRTN MGR 1 GS09 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
E020C ADE OERZ TECH ASSIST 3 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 3 SGS07
X202C ADE PLSB SEN INVSTIGT 1 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
E066C DCCECE ED MGR 1 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 4 GS08 EEC05P EC PRGM SUPV/EXP 4 SGS08
126 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 5 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 5 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 EEC02P EC PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 6 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 6 SGS06
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 1 GS08 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
X037C ED INVSTIGTR 3 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 3 SGS06
A047C FINAN ANLST II 1 GS08 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
L043C HEALTH PRGM SPEC III 1 GS08 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
L035C NUTRITIONIST CONS 9 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 9 SGS07
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 2 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 2 SGS07
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 6 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 6 SGS06
X062C QA COORD 5 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 5 SGS07
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 EEC05P EC PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 9 GS07 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 9 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 16 GS07 EEC02P EC PRGM COORD 16 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 3 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 3 SGS05
G267C DHS PRGM ELGBLTY ANLS 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
M042C DHS STAFF SUPV 1 GS07 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G182C DHS/DDS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 1 GS07 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 2 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 2 SGS07
X125C FRAUD INVSTIGTR COORD 4 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 4 SGS05
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
M025C PRGM ELGBLTY COORD I 2 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
A063C RSRCH & STATS SUPV 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 17 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 17 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
M053C CHILD CARE SVC SPEC 41 GS06 EEC04P EC PRGM SPEC 41 SGS04
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 EEC04P EC PRGM SPEC 1 SGS04
E038C ED & INSTRCTN ANLST 1 GS06 EEC04P EC PRGM SPEC 1 SGS04
127 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
M051C FAM SVC WRKR 2 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 2 SGS05
M051C FAM SVC WRKR 1 GS06 EEC04P EC PRGM SPEC 1 SGS04
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 4 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 4 SGS07
G180C GRANTS ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
G214C GRANTS SPEC 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 2 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS06
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G178C PLCY DEV COORD 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
G178C PLCY DEV COORD 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
M066C PRGM ELGBLTY SPEC 43 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 43 SGS05
X136C QA REVER 1 GS06 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
X094C SVCS & PRGM LIC SPEC 6 GS06 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 6 SGS03
C020C STDNT AP SPEC 2 GS06 IDM03P DB SPEC 2 IST05
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A088C ASSETS COORD 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
V012C FED SURP PROP SUPV 1 GS05 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 1 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 3 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 7 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 7 SGS02
S028C BUS DRIVER TRAINER 3 GS05 TAT10I SCHOOL BUS TRAINER 3 SGS05
X116C BUS TRANS INSPCT 6 GS05 IIN01P INSP I 6 SGS04
E051C STAFF DEV SPEC 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 38 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 38 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
V022C PURCHASING TECH 1 GS04 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 21 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 21 SGS02
0318 MARTIN LUTHER KING JR COMM
G077C MLK EXEC DIR 1 GS14 EEA04C MLK COMM DIR 1 SPC06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY & ENVIRONMENT
9905 DEPT OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT
128 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
SC005 SEC OF ENERGY & ENVIRO 1 SE05 ESE06A SEC OF E&E 1
EXE04
N218N E&E CHIEF ADMIN 1 SE02 EEX19A E&E DIR 1 EXE01
N257N E&E EXEC COS 1 SE01 EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I 1 EXE01
D129C E&E DIR OF INFO TECH 1 IT10 IIA01C CIO I 1 IST10
G298C E&E CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GS15 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
N230N E&E COS 1 GS15 PEM02C E&E DEP DIR 1 SPC08
N205N E&E DIR OF COMP 1 GS13 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
N204N E&E DIR OF SPCL PROJS 1 GS13 CPR03C GOV AFFRS SPEC 1 SPC05
G019C GEN COUNSEL 3 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 3 SPC08
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G035C ADEQ ADMIN DIV MNGR 1 GS12 PEM01C E&E ASSOC DIR 1 SPC05
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G024C DEPT ALJ 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
P079C E&E CHIEF OF COMMS 1 GS12 CPR01C CHIEF OF COMMS I 1 SPC06
G028C E&E TECH OP MGR 1 GS12 PEM03C E&E PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 FAC06C ASST CONTROLLER 1 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 3 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 3 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT03P ATTY I 1 SPC03
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS09
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
B037C CHEMIST SUPV 1 GS09 SBI01P BIOLOGIST I 1 SPC01
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
G139C E&E FCLTY SUPP SVCS M 1 GS08 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 1 SGS07
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 2 SPC01
X054C ENVIRO PRGM COORD 2 GS07 PEP02P E&E PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
A075C FINAN ANLST I 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
B051C GEO 1 GS07 SGE01P GEOLOGIST 1 SPC01
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
129 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
S024C CNSTRCT/MAINT COORD 1 GS06 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
X082C E&E INSPCT II 1 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 1 SGS05
P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GS06 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
R025C HR ANLST 2 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 2 SGS07
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 5 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 5 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS 1 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
R036C HR SPEC 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 4 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 4 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0930 DIV OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
U015U DEQ DIR 1 SE03 EEX19A E&E DIR 1 EXE01
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIA06C IT MNGR 1 IST10
D030C INFO SYST COORD 2 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 2 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
D039C NET SUPP SPEC 1 IT06 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 4 IT05 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 4 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IDM03P DB SPEC 1 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 1 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
N195N DEQ ASSOC DIR 3 GS15 PEM02C E&E DEP DIR 3 SPC08
N180N E&E ASSOC DIR ENERGY 1 GS14 PEM02C E&E DEP DIR 1 SPC08
G032N PC&E HEARING OFF 1 GS14 LAT01C ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 SPC08
B146C E&E PROF ENG SEN MGR 3 GS13 SEN04C MANAGING ENGINEER 3 SPC07
B012C E&E SEN MGR 1 GS13 SEN04C MANAGING ENGINEER 1 SPC07
B012C E&E SEN MGR 2 GS13 PEM01C E&E ASSOC DIR 2 SPC05
B012C E&E SEN MGR 1 GS13 SGE03C MANAGING GEOLOGIST 1 SPC05
B151C AIR QUALITY MODELER 1 GS12 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS09
130 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G032C E&E ENERGY OP MGR 1 GS12 PEM01C E&E ASSOC DIR 1 SPC05
B142C E&E ENVIRO OP MGR 1 GS12 PEM01C E&E ASSOC DIR 1 SPC05
B142C E&E ENVIRO OP MGR 1 GS12 SGE03C MANAGING GEOLOGIST 1 SPC05
B142C E&E ENVIRO OP MGR 2 GS12 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS09
B015C ENG SUPV 9 GS12 SEN02P ENGINEER SUPV/EXP 9 SPC06
B015C ENG SUPV 1 GS12 SEP02C EPID MNGR 1 SPC06
B015C ENG SUPV 1 GS12 PEM03C E&E PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS09
N203N E&E DIR OF ENTR SVCS 1 GS11 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS09
A021N E&E ENERGY FISCAL OFF 1 GS11 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS09
G013C E&E ENERGY PRGM MGR 1 GS11 PEM03C E&E PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
G013C E&E ENERGY PRGM MGR 1 GS11 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS09
B023C ENG, P.E. 8 GS11 SEN05P PROF ENGINEER 8 SPC05
B023C ENG, P.E. 7 GS11 SEN01P ENGINEER 7 SPC03
G063C E&E BRANCH MGR 1 GS10 SEP03P EPID SUPV/EXP 1 SPC05
G063C E&E BRANCH MGR 1 GS10 SGE03C MANAGING GEOLOGIST 1 SPC05
G063C E&E BRANCH MGR 15 GS10 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 15 SGS09
L099C EPIDEMIOLOGY SUPV 2 GS10 SEP03P EPID SUPV/EXP 2 SPC05
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
B037C CHEMIST SUPV 2 GS09 SCH03P CHEMIST SUPV/EXP 2 SPC04
B042C ENG 25 GS09 SEN01P ENGINEER 25 SPC03
L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 5 GS09 SEP01P EPIDEMIOLOGIST 5 SPC04
B035C GEOLOGY SUPV 3 GS09 SGE05P PROF GEOLOGIST 3 SPC03
G109C GRANTS MGR 3 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 3 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
B055C ECOLOGIST COORD 3 GS08 SCN03P ECOLOGIST SUPV/EXP 3 SPC02
B043C PROF GEO 6 GS08 SGE05P PROF GEOLOGIST 6 SPC03
B043C PROF GEO 1 GS08 SCN03P ECOLOGIST SUPV/EXP 1 SPC02
B043C PROF GEO 9 GS08 SGE01P GEOLOGIST 9 SPC01
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
B081C CHEMIST 1 GS07 SBI01P BIOLOGIST I 1 SPC01
B081C CHEMIST 7 GS07 SCH01P CHEMIST I 7 SPC01
G159C DEPT BUS COORD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
X059C E&E COMP COORD 3 GS07 PEP02P E&E PRGM COORD 3 SGS06
X059C E&E COMP COORD 2 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 2 SGS05
131 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X036C E&E INSPCT SUPV I 13 GS07 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 13 SGS07
X036C E&E INSPCT SUPV I 1 GS07 PEP02P E&E PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
B065C ECOLOGIST 1 GS07 SBI01P BIOLOGIST I 1 SPC01
B065C ECOLOGIST 6 GS07 SCN02P ECOLOGIST 6 SPC01
G248C ENERGY PRGM COORD 2 GS07 PEP02P E&E PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
X054C ENVIRO PRGM COORD 4 GS07 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 4 SGS07
X054C ENVIRO PRGM COORD 18 GS07 PEP02P E&E PRGM COORD 18 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A075C FINAN ANLST I 2 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G147C GRANTS COORD 2 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 2 SGS05
P020C PROD ARTIST 1 GS07 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
A072C RSRCH & STATS MGR 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 19 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 19 SGS05
R027C BUDGET SPEC 1 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 1 SGS05
X075C E&E COMP ANLST 5 GS06 PEP02P E&E PRGM COORD 5 SGS06
X075C E&E COMP ANLST 9 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 9 SGS05
X093C E&E INSPCT II 74 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 74 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 6 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 6 SGS04
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G178C PLCY DEV COORD 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 18 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 18 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0440 OIL AND GAS COMMISSION
U045U OIL & GAS DIR 1 SE01 PEM05C PROD AND CONS DIR 1 SPC09
U039U STATE GEO 1 SE01 EEX46A STATE GEOLOGIST 1 SPC09
D015C STATE NET ENG 1 IT07 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D040C GIS ANLST 2 IT06 IGI01P GIS ANLST 2 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D044C SYST ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D062C DB ANLST 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 1 IT03 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D078C GIS TECH 2 IT02 TAT03I ENGINEERING SPEC 2 SGS05
B013N ASST STATE GEO 1 GS12 SGE03C MANAGING GEOLOGIST 1 SPC05
132 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G032C E&E ENERGY OP MGR 2 GS12 PEM01C E&E ASSOC DIR 2 SPC05
B014N SEN PETROLEUM GEO 3 GS11 SGE04P PETROLEUM GEOLOGIST 3 SPC05
B014N SEN PETROLEUM GEO 1 GS11 SEN05P PROF ENGINEER 1 SPC05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G063C E&E BRANCH MGR 1 GS10 PEP03P E&E PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS09
G063C E&E BRANCH MGR 1 GS10 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
B035C GEOLOGY SUPV 4 GS09 SGE05P PROF GEOLOGIST 4 SPC03
B035C GEOLOGY SUPV 1 GS09 SGE01P GEOLOGIST 1 SPC01
B050C E&E INSPCT SUPV II 1 GS08 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
B043C PROF GEO 1 GS08 SGE05P PROF GEOLOGIST 1 SPC03
B043C PROF GEO 4 GS08 SGE01P GEOLOGIST 4 SPC01
B051C GEO 2 GS07 SGE01P GEOLOGIST 2 SPC01
C037C ADMINST ANLST 3 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
X082C E&E INSPCT II 9 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 9 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 4 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 4 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
X098C OIL & GAS TECH 1 GS04 IIN01P INSP I 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
0430 LIQUEFIED PETROLEUM GAS BOARD
N165N LP GAS BD DIR 1 GS12 PEM04C LP GAS BOARD DIR 1 SPC05
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X100C E&E INSPCT I 3 GS05 IIN01P INSP I 3 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE & ADMINISTRATION
9906 DEPT OF FINANCE & ADMINISTRATN
SC006 SEC OF FINAN & ADMIN 1 SE05 ESE04A SEC OF DFA 1 EXE04
U002U DFA DEP DIR AND COS 1 SE04 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
N033N DFA ADMINST SVCS ADMI 1 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 1 EXE01
G001C DFA ASST ADMIN SVCS A 1 GS15 HDH03C HR ADMIN II 1 SPC08
P006N DFA DIR OF COMMS 1 GS15 CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMS II 1 SPC07
G332C STATE INFRA COORD 1 GS15 PRP14P STATE INFRA COORD 1 SPC07
A003C DFA REV ASST ADMIN 1 GS14 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
R040C DFA STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
133 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 1 SPC03
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
V008C BUYER SUPV 1 GS07 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
G132C DFA PRGM MGR 2 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 5 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 5 SGS06
R022C BENE COORD 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
V010C DFA BUYER 4 GS06 PPR04P PROC SPEC 4 SGS05
C018C DFA EXEC ASST TO THE 1 GS06 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
R025C HR ANLST 2 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 2 SGS07
R025C HR ANLST 7 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 7 SGS06
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
0634 DFA - OFC OF CHILD SUPPORT ENF
N034N DFA OCSE ADMIN 1 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 1 EXE01
D005N DFA IT TECH SPEC 1 IT11 IIA05C IT DIV MNGR 1 IST12
D005N DFA IT TECH SPEC 1 IT11 IIS01P IT COORD 1 IST08
D002C DFA OIS ASST ADMIN 1 IT10 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
A003C DFA REV ASST ADMIN 1 GS14 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
G225C DFA OCSE FLD OP MGR 1 GS13 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
G025C ATRNY SUPV 4 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 4 SPC08
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 46 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 46 SPC05
G223C DFA OCSE DIV MGR 2 GS10 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 2 SPC03
G226C DFA OCSE PRGM MGR 2 GS10 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 2 SPC03
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 PRP08C REV MNGR 1 SGS08
G224C DFA OCSE FLD MGR 4 GS09 PRP10C REV REGNL MNGR 4 SGS09
G224C DFA OCSE FLD MGR 2 GS09 PRP08C REV MNGR 2 SGS08
134 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G227C DFA OCSE PRGM SUPV 2 GS08 PRP08C REV MNGR 2 SGS08
G227C DFA OCSE PRGM SUPV 12 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 12 SGS07
G227C DFA OCSE PRGM SUPV 1 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
G227C DFA OCSE PRGM SUPV 2 GS08 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 1 GS08 CTR04P TRNG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
A081C AUD 2 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 2 SPC01
M029C CHILD SUPP SUPV II 17 GS07 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 17 SGS07
M029C CHILD SUPP SUPV II 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 1 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
M052C CHILD SUPP SUPV I 5 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 5 SGS07
M052C CHILD SUPP SUPV I 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
M052C CHILD SUPP SUPV I 47 GS06 PCS02P CHILD SPPRT SUPV/EXP 47 SGS05
M052C CHILD SUPP SUPV I 1 GS06 PCS01P CHILD SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 3 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 1 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 3 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 3 SGS07
M067C CHILD SUPP COORD 12 GS05 PCS01P CHILD SPPRT SPEC 12 SGS04
M068C CHILD SUPP SPEC 277 GS05 PCS01P CHILD SPPRT SPEC 277 SGS04
M068C CHILD SUPP SPEC 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 11 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 11 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 63 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 63 SGS06
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PRP02P CUSTOMER SRVC SPEC 1 SGS03
C059C DFA SVC REP 3 GS03 CTR02P TRAINER 3 SGS07
C059C DFA SVC REP 1 GS03 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C059C DFA SVC REP 226 GS03 PRP02P CUSTOMER SRVC SPEC 226 SGS03
0631 DFA - DIVISION OF RACING
B009N DFA DOG RACING VET 1 MP04 MVE02P VETERINARIAN 1 MED08
G287C DFA REG ASST ADMIN RA 1 GS15 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
X069C DFA RAC SPRVS 3 GS09 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
135 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
X142C DFA RACING COMM JUDGE 2 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
A104C DFA RACING COMM OFF A 1 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
B110C VET ASST 4 GS03 TGT03I VETERINARY AIDE 4 SGS01
0630 DFA - REVENUE SERVICES DIV
N003N DFA DEP DIR AND COMM 1 SE03 EEX37A REV DIR 1 EXE02
N035N DFA MTR VEH ADMIN 1 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 1 EXE01
N004N DFA REV ASST COMM PLC 1 SE02 EEX08A CLC II 1 SPC11
G002N DFA REV CHIEF COUNSEL 1 SE02 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
N030N DFA STATE REV OFF ADM 1 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 1 EXE01
N029N DFA TAX ADMIN 2 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 2 EXE01
N028N DFA TAX AUDIT ADMIN 1 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 1 EXE01
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D084C COMP OP 1 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
A003C DFA REV ASST ADMIN 2 GS14 LAT06C ATTY IV 2 SPC09
A003C DFA REV ASST ADMIN 6 GS14 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 6 SPC08
A003C DFA REV ASST ADMIN 3 GS14 PRP07P REV DIV SUPV/EXP 3 SPC07
A006C DFA REV TAX DIV MGR 10 GS13 PRP07P REV DIV SUPV/EXP 10 SPC07
R040C DFA STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 PRP07P REV DIV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G310C TAX APP STAFF ATRNY 3 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 3 SPC08
G310C TAX APP STAFF ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 PTA01P TAX AUDIT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
G025C ATRNY SUPV 3 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 3 SPC05
G024C DEPT ALJ 3 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 3 SPC05
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 PRP07P REV DIV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 1 SPC03
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
G047C ATRNY SPEC 10 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 10 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT03P ATTY I 1 SPC03
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G044C DFA REV PROB RES OFF 2 GS11 PRP07P REV DIV SUPV/EXP 2 SPC07
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 6 GS11 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 6 SPC03
A033C TAX AUD SUPV 23 GS11 PTA01P TAX AUDIT SUPV/EXP 23 SPC06
136 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A033C TAX AUD SUPV 1 GS11 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 1 SPC03
G061C ACD DEP DIR 1 GS10 PRP07P REV DIV SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
A049C DFA REV OFF DIST MGR 5 GS10 PRP10C REV REGNL MNGR 5 SGS09
G045C DFA DIV MGR III 8 GS09 PRP08C REV MNGR 8 SGS08
G045C DFA DIV MGR III 1 GS09 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G045C DFA DIV MGR III 1 GS09 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
T106C DFA REV SEC SUPV 1 GS09 SLE01C POLICE CHIEF 1 LES03
R043C DFA STWD PRGM SPEC 1 GS09 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 1 SPC03
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
A054C TAX AUD II 3 GS09 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 3 SPC04
A054C TAX AUD II 118 GS09 PTA03P TAX AUDITOR II 118 SPC04
A054C TAX AUD II 45 GS09 PTA02P TAX AUDITOR I 45 SPC01
A054C TAX AUD II 5 GS09 PRP08C REV MNGR 5 SGS08
A054C TAX AUD II 3 GS09 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
A054C TAX AUD II 4 GS09 PRP06P REV COORD 4 SGS05
G084C DFA DIV MGR II 6 GS08 PRP08C REV MNGR 6 SGS08
G084C DFA DIV MGR II 1 GS08 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G133C DFA DIV MGR I 1 GS07 PRP08C REV MNGR 1 SGS08
G133C DFA DIV MGR I 14 GS07 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 14 SGS06
G133C DFA DIV MGR I 3 GS07 PRP06P REV COORD 3 SGS05
A069C DFA REV OFF ASST DIST 5 GS07 PRP08C REV MNGR 5 SGS08
T032C DFA REV SEC COORD 4 GS07 SLE02P POLICE OFF 4 LES01
S017C MAINT COORD 2 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
A059C TAX AUD 1 GS07 PRP08C REV MNGR 1 SGS08
A059C TAX AUD 1 GS07 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 3 GS06 PRP06P REV COORD 3 SGS05
A077C DFA LOCAL REV OFF MGR 49 GS06 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 49 SGS06
A077C DFA LOCAL REV OFF MGR 1 GS06 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
A077C DFA LOCAL REV OFF MGR 3 GS06 PRP11P REV SPEC 3 SGS04
E033C DFA ORG DEV SPEC 1 GS06 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 3 GS06 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
C029C HEARING OFF 21 GS06 ILS02I HEARING OFF 21 SGS06
137 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C029C HEARING OFF 5 GS06 PRP06P REV COORD 5 SGS05
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 5 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 5 SGS06
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 1 GS06 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
S041C BOILER OP 6 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 6 SGS06
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A094C DFA LOCAL REV OFF SUP 73 GS05 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 73 SGS06
A094C DFA LOCAL REV OFF SUP 14 GS05 PRP06P REV COORD 14 SGS05
A094C DFA LOCAL REV OFF SUP 1 GS05 PRP11P REV SPEC 1 SGS04
C042C DFA REV SUPV 25 GS05 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 25 SGS06
C042C DFA REV SUPV 6 GS05 PRP06P REV COORD 6 SGS05
C042C DFA REV SUPV 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 19 GS05 PRP06P REV COORD 19 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
R032C HR PRGM REP 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 8 GS04 PRP06P REV COORD 8 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C048C DFA SUPV 1 GS04 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
C048C DFA SUPV 36 GS04 PRP12P REV SUPV/EXP 36 SGS06
C048C DFA SUPV 4 GS04 PAS14P RECORDS COORD 4 SGS05
C048C DFA SUPV 47 GS04 PRP06P REV COORD 47 SGS05
C048C DFA SUPV 4 GS04 PRP11P REV SPEC 4 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 5 GS04 PRP06P REV COORD 5 SGS05
A102C FISCAL SUPP TECH 6 GS04 PRP06P REV COORD 6 SGS05
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 5 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 5 SGS06
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 13 GS03 PRP02P CUSTOMER SRVC SPEC 13 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 14 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 14 SGS02
C059C DFA SVC REP 1 GS03 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C059C DFA SVC REP 1 GS03 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
138 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C059C DFA SVC REP 806 GS03 PRP02P CUSTOMER SRVC SPEC 806 SGS03
C059C DFA SVC REP 4 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
C059C DFA SVC REP 1 GS03 THO02P HOUSEKEEP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS02
S064C SKILLED TRADES HELPER 2 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 2 SGS03
X172C TAX INVSTIGTR 33 GS03 IIV03P INVEST II 33 SGS05
S087C INST SVCS ASST 10 GS01 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 10 SGS01
0611 DFA - ALCOH BEV CONTROL DIV
G305C DFA REG ADMIN 1 SE02 EEX35A REG ENFRCMNT DIR 1 EXE01
G279C DFA REG ASST ADMIN-AD 1 GS15 SRL04C REG ENFRCMNT ADMIN 1 SPC10
G280C DFA REG ASST ADMIN-EN 1 GS15 SRL05C REG ENFRCMNT MNGR 1 LES10
R040C DFA STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 4 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 4 SPC05
A007C AUDIT MGR 1 GS11 FAU01C AUDIT MNGR 1 SPC06
G246C DFA REG BRANCH MGR 1 GS10 SRL03P ENFRCMNT AGENT III 1 LES05
X229C DFA REG ENFORCE AGENT 3 GS10 SRL03P ENFRCMNT AGENT III 3 LES05
T108C DFA REG BRANCH SUPV 1 GS09 SRL03P ENFRCMNT AGENT III 1 LES05
X196C DFA SEN REG ENFORCE A 5 GS08 SRL03P ENFRCMNT AGENT III 5 LES05
X196C DFA SEN REG ENFORCE A 3 GS08 SRL02P ENFRCMNT AGENT II 3 LES04
A060C SEN AUD 2 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 2 SPC02
A081C AUD 1 GS07 SRL01P ENFRCMNT AGENT I 1 LES03
X131C DFA REG ENFORCE AGENT 1 GS07 SIA10P CRIM INTEL ANLST 1 SGS06
X131C DFA REG ENFORCE AGENT 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
X131C DFA REG ENFORCE AGENT 27 GS07 SRL01P ENFRCMNT AGENT I 27 LES03
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
T061C SEN IA 1 GS06 SIA10P CRIM INTEL ANLST 1 SGS06
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
R036C HR SPEC 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 4 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS06
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
139 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
0610 DEPT OF FINANCE AND ADMIN
N012N DFA DEP DIR AND CONT 1 SE03 EEX40A STATE BUDGET DIR 1 EXE02
N012N DFA DEP DIR AND CONT 1 SE03 EEX43A STATE CONTROLLER 1 EXE02
N038N DFA BUDGET ADMIN 1 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 1 EXE01
N011N DFA CIO 1 SE02 IIA03C CIO III 1 IST14
D004N DFA INTGOV SVCS ADMIN 1 SE02 EEX17A DFA DIV ADMIN 1 EXE01
N042N DFA TAX RSRCH ADMIN 1 SE02 PRP13C STATE ECONOMIST 1 SPC07
D005N DFA IT TECH SPEC 1 IT11 IIE01C CHIEF INFO SEC OFF 1 IST12
D005N DFA IT TECH SPEC 1 IT11 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D005N DFA IT TECH SPEC 1 IT11 IIA05C IT DIV MNGR 1 IST12
D005N DFA IT TECH SPEC 1 IT11 IAS07C STATE APP ADMIN 1 IST11
D005N DFA IT TECH SPEC 3 IT11 ISI03C STATE SYSS EXP 3 IST11
D002C DFA OIS ASST ADMIN 1 IT10 IAS07C STATE APP ADMIN 1 IST11
D011C DFA ERP SYS MGR 1 IT09 IIA06C IT MNGR 1 IST10
D011C DFA ERP SYS MGR 2 IT09 IIP03P IT SR PROJ MNGR 2 IST10
D011C DFA ERP SYS MGR 1 IT09 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
D021C DFA ERP GROUP LEAD 4 IT08 IAS03P APP COORD 4 IST09
D021C DFA ERP GROUP LEAD 2 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 2 IST09
D007C INFO SYST MGR 2 IT08 IIA06C IT MNGR 2 IST10
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IAS02P APP ANLST II 1 IST08
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 8 IT06 IAS02P APP ANLST II 8 IST08
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IAS05P APP DEVELOPER II 1 IST08
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 9 IT06 IAS01P APP ANLST I 9 IST07
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 1 IST06
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 4 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 4 IST06
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 4 IT06 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 4 IST06
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D039C NET SUPP SPEC 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT06 IAS01P APP ANLST I 2 IST07
140 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 3 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 3 IST06
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 1 IT06 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 2 IT06 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 2 IST08
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 1 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 1 IST06
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT05 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 2 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 2 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D058C COMP OP COORD 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 5 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 5 IST02
D064C WEBSITE DEV 2 IT04 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 5 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 5 IST02
D084C COMP OP 2 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 3 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 3 IST02
A002C DFA ASST ACCNTNG ADMI 3 GS15 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 3 SPC08
R002C DFA ASST BUDGET ADMIN 2 GS15 FSA04C STATE BUDGET ASST ADM 2 SPC09
A001C DFA ASST TAX RSRCH AD 1 GS14 PRP03C DFA ASST DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
A006C DFA REV TAX DIV MGR 1 GS13 IAS02P APP ANLST II 1 IST08
R040C DFA STWD PRGM MGR 5 GS13 FAC04C ACCT MNGR 5 SPC06
R040C DFA STWD PRGM MGR 2 GS13 FSA07P STATE BUDGET SUPV/EXP 2 SPC06
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FSA02C STATE ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC07
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
A025C DFA ACCNTNG ACFR COOR 5 GS12 FSA02C STATE ACCT SUPV/EXP 5 SPC07
G002C DFA ASST IGS ADMIN 1 GS12 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 1 SPC03
A007C AUDIT MGR 1 GS11 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 FSA07P STATE BUDGET SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 11 GS11 FSA05P STATE BUDGET COORD 11 SPC05
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 2 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 2 SPC04
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 FSA03P STATE BUDGET ANLST 1 SPC04
141 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 12 GS11 FSA01P FINAN ACCOUNTANT 12 SPC03
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
U127U EXC DIR DEV DIS COUNC 1 GS11 SSP02C DEV DIS COUNCIL DIR 1 SPC05
R043C DFA STWD PRGM SPEC 4 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 4 SPC02
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 1 SPC03
G109C GRANTS MGR 3 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 3 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
A047C FINAN ANLST II 1 GS08 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 5 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 5 SPC01
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
G133C DFA DIV MGR I 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G132C DFA PRGM MGR 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
G132C DFA PRGM MGR 2 GS07 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G147C GRANTS COORD 7 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 7 SGS05
A065C PYRLL SVCS COORD 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
C037C ADMINST ANLST 5 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 5 SGS05
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 1 SGS07
G180C GRANTS ANLST 8 GS06 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 8 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
D077C HELP DESK SPEC 4 GS05 PAS05I CALL CENTER SPEC 4 SGS02
E051C STAFF DEV SPEC 1 GS05 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 5 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 5 SGS04
0490 ASSESSMENT COORDINATION DEPT
U085U ACD DIR 1 SE01 PRP01C ASSESS COORD DIR 1 SPC09
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
R041C DFA STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 PRP09P REV PRGM COORD 1 SPC03
X046C ACD DIV ADMIN 1 GS08 PRP05P PROP ASSESS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X046C ACD DIV ADMIN 3 GS08 PRP06P REV COORD 3 SGS05
E031C ED PRGM COORD 1 GS08 PRP06P REV COORD 1 SGS05
X049C PROP ASSMNT COORD MGR 5 GS07 PRP06P REV COORD 5 SGS05
A063C RSRCH & STATS SUPV 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
X079C PROP ASSMNT AUD SUPV 11 GS06 PRP04P PROP ASSESS SPEC 11 SGS06
142 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
X117C PROP ASSMNT AUD 6 GS05 PRP04P PROP ASSESS SPEC 6 SGS06
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
9907 DEPT OF HEALTH
SC007 SEC OF HEALTH 1 SE05 ESE07A SEC OF HEALTH 1 EXE04
0665 HEALTH SERVICES PERMIT AGENCY
U025U ADH HEALTH PERMIT SVC 1 SE01 PHP06C HEALTH PRGM ADMIN 1 SPC09
G272C ADH HSPA DEP ADMIN 1 GS11 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
C017C ADH HEALTH ADMINST CO 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0645 AR DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
U002U DFA DEP DIR AND COS 1 SE04 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
U119U ADH DEP DIR-PUB HEALT 2 SE03 EEX21A HEALTH DEP DIR 2 EXE02
B017N ADH CHIEF SCIENTIST 1 SE02 MHS03C STATE HEALTH SCI 1 SPC10
B017N ADH CHIEF SCIENTIST 1 SE02 EEX21A HEALTH DEP DIR 1 EXE02
N033N DFA ADMINST SVCS ADMI 1 SE02 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
U121U ADH HEALTH INFO TECH 1 SE01 PHP06C HEALTH PRGM ADMIN 1 SPC09
U026U ADH DIR 1 MP10 MHA04C STATE HEALTH DIR 1 MED16
L003N CHIEF PHYS SPEC 3 MP09 MPH04P PHYSC SUPV/EXP 3 MED14
L025N SEN PHYS SPEC 1 MP08 PHP06C HEALTH PRGM ADMIN 1 SPC09
L025N SEN PHYS SPEC 3 MP08 MPH02P PHYSICAN SPEC 3 MED12
L008N PHYS SPEC 1 MP07 MPH02P PHYSICAN SPEC 1 MED12
L011N DENTIST 1 MP06 MDE01I DENTIST 1 MED09
L014N DIR OF PHARM 1 MP06 MPA04C PHARMACY MNGR 1 MED10
B143C ADH PUB HEALTH VET 1 MP05 MVE02P VETERINARIAN 1 MED08
L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 4 MP05 MPA01P PHARMACIST 4 MED09
L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 2 MP05 MPA03P PHARMACY INSP 2 MED09
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MP04 SEP02C EPID MNGR 1 SPC06
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MP04 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 33 MP04 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 33 MED08
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MP04 MNU07C RN MNGR 1 MED07
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MP04 IIS08C IT INFRA MNGR 1 IST11
L002C NRSNG DIR 1 MP04 MNU05C NRSNG ADMIN 1 MED08
L009C NURSE MGR 3 MP03 MNU07C RN MNGR 3 MED07
L017C ADH AREA NRSNG DIR 5 MP02 MNU07C RN MNGR 5 MED07
L017C ADH AREA NRSNG DIR 2 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 2 MED06
143 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L026C ADH NRSNG PRGM COORD 1 MP02 PHP03C HEALTH BRANCH MNGR 1 SPC04
L026C ADH NRSNG PRGM COORD 1 MP02 PHP09C PUB HEALTH SECT CHIEF 1 SPC03
L026C ADH NRSNG PRGM COORD 1 MP02 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L026C ADH NRSNG PRGM COORD 16 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 16 MED06
L026C ADH NRSNG PRGM COORD 1 MP02 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR 1 MP02 MNU03P NURSE INSTRUCTOR 1 MED06
L022C NRSNG CLINIC COORD 1 MP02 PHP03C HEALTH BRANCH MNGR 1 SPC04
L022C NRSNG CLINIC COORD 1 MP02 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L022C NRSNG CLINIC COORD 1 MP02 MNU07C RN MNGR 1 MED07
L022C NRSNG CLINIC COORD 13 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 13 MED06
L022C NRSNG CLINIC COORD 29 MP02 MNU06P RN 29 MED05
L022C NRSNG CLINIC COORD 1 MP02 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
L019C RN COORD 7 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 7 MED06
L019C RN COORD 1 MP02 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
L038C RN 1 MP01 PHP03C HEALTH BRANCH MNGR 1 SPC04
L038C RN 2 MP01 PHP05C HEALTH DISTRICT MNGR 2 SPC03
L038C RN 2 MP01 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
L038C RN 307 MP01 MNU06P RN 307 MED05
N017N ADH CIO 1 IT11 IIA02C CIO II 1 IST12
D023N ADH HIT TECH DIR 1 IT08 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D023N ADH HIT TECH DIR 1 IT08 IAS03P APP COORD 1 IST09
D012C DB SPEC 1 IT08 IIS08C IT INFRA MNGR 1 IST11
D012C DB SPEC 1 IT08 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS08C IT INFRA MNGR 1 IST11
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D024N ADH HIT INTERFACE DEV 2 IT07 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 2 IST06
D035C COMP SUPP MGR 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 2 IT07 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 2 IST10
D030C INFO SYST COORD 4 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 4 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D029C SEN GIS ANLST 1 IT07 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IAS06C APP SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D042C DATA WRHS SPEC 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D040C GIS ANLST 1 IT06 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D040C GIS ANLST 2 IT06 IGI01P GIS ANLST 2 IST05
144 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D039C NET SUPP SPEC 1 IT06 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D039C NET SUPP SPEC 5 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 5 IST06
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 1 IT06 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 1 IT06 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
D022C SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IIE06P IT SEC SUPV 1 IST08
D022C SYST SPEC 6 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 6 IST06
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 2 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 IST06
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 4 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 4 IST04
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 2 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
D047C INFO SYST BUS ANLST 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 1 IT05 IIS09P IT INFRA SPEC 1 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT05 IDN01P DATA ANLST 2 IST07
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 3 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 3 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 21 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 21 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D044C SYST ANLST 2 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D058C COMP OP COORD 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 5 IT03 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 5 IST04
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 8 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 8 IST02
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 4 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 4 IST02
B001N ADH SEN SCIENTIST 1 GS15 MHS03C STATE HEALTH SCI 1 SPC10
N065N ADH CENTER DIR-HEALTH 2 GS14 PHP06C HEALTH PRGM ADMIN 2 SPC09
N064N ADH CENTER DIR-LOCAL 2 GS14 PHP06C HEALTH PRGM ADMIN 2 SPC09
N097N ADH CFO 1 GS14 PHP06C HEALTH PRGM ADMIN 1 SPC09
G009N ADH CLC 1 GS14 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
N063N ADH EPIDEMIOLOGY OFF 1 GS14 MHS03C STATE HEALTH SCI 1 SPC10
N063N ADH EPIDEMIOLOGY OFF 4 GS14 SEP02C EPID MNGR 4 SPC06
R001N ADH CHIEF HR OFF 1 GS13 HDH03C HR ADMIN II 1 SPC08
145 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B011N ADH DIR ENG 1 GS13 SEN03C HEALTH ENGINEER DIR 1 SPC08
N118N ADH DIR IN-HOME SVCS 1 GS13 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
P002N ADH DIR OF COMMS 1 GS13 CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMS II 1 SPC07
N104N ADH DIR STATS & VITAL 1 GS13 PHP04C HEALTH CENTER MNGR 1 SPC06
B138C ADH ENG CHIEF 2 GS13 SEN04C MANAGING ENGINEER 2 SPC07
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
N174N HEALTH INFO TECH PLCY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
N174N HEALTH INFO TECH PLCY 1 GS13 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 2 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 2 SPC08
G026C ADH ASSOC CENTER DIR- 6 GS12 PHP04C HEALTH CENTER MNGR 6 SPC06
G026C ADH ASSOC CENTER DIR- 1 GS12 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
L109C ADH CERT TUMOR REGIST 1 GS12 PHS02I CERT TUMOR REGISTRAR 1 SPC02
L019N ADH CHIEF EPIDEMIOLOG 6 GS12 SEP02C EPID MNGR 6 SPC06
N148N ADH GOV AFFRS PLCY DI 1 GS12 CPR03C GOV AFFRS SPEC 1 SPC05
N139N ADH MIN HLTH & HLTH D 1 GS12 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
G049C ADH REGNL DIR 5 GS12 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 5 SPC05
G024C DEPT ALJ 2 GS12 LAT01C ADMIN LAW JUDGE 2 SPC08
B015C ENG SUPV 8 GS12 SEN02P ENGINEER SUPV/EXP 8 SPC06
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
R006C HR ADMIN 2 GS12 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
L013C ADH BRANCH MGR 14 GS11 PHP03C HEALTH BRANCH MNGR 14 SPC04
D106C ADH HEALTH INFO TECH 1 GS11 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 PHP03C HEALTH BRANCH MNGR 1 SPC04
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 FAU02P AUDIT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 FBU02C BUDGET MNGR 1 SGS08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
B023C ENG, P.E. 5 GS11 SEN05P PROF ENGINEER 5 SPC05
B023C ENG, P.E. 9 GS11 SEN01P ENGINEER 9 SPC03
L030C ADH DIST MGR 1 GS10 SEP03P EPID SUPV/EXP 1 SPC05
L030C ADH DIST MGR 1 GS10 SEP01P EPIDEMIOLOGIST 1 SPC04
L030C ADH DIST MGR 5 GS10 PHP05C HEALTH DISTRICT MNGR 5 SPC03
L030C ADH DIST MGR 2 GS10 PHP09C PUB HEALTH SECT CHIEF 2 SPC03
L030C ADH DIST MGR 2 GS10 IEH03P ENVIRO HLTH INSP SUPV 2 SGS09
L030C ADH DIST MGR 1 GS10 PHS09C HEALTH UNIT ADMIN 1 SGS09
L030C ADH DIST MGR 2 GS10 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
146 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L014C ADH HIPAA PRGM CONS 1 GS10 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
D115C ADH HIT BUS COORD 2 GS10 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 2 IST04
L016C ADH PUB HEALTH ADMIN 1 GS10 SEP03P EPID SUPV/EXP 1 SPC05
L016C ADH PUB HEALTH ADMIN 7 GS10 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 7 SPC05
L016C ADH PUB HEALTH ADMIN 2 GS10 PHP09C PUB HEALTH SECT CHIEF 2 SPC03
L016C ADH PUB HEALTH ADMIN 1 GS10 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L025C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 13 GS10 PHP09C PUB HEALTH SECT CHIEF 13 SPC03
L025C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
L025C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS10 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L114C ADH RADIOACTIVE MATRL 1 GS10 MHS02P RADIOLGCL PRGM SUPV/E 1 SPC04
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 3 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 3 SGS09
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 PHP09C PUB HEALTH SECT CHIEF 1 SPC03
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 SEP03P EPID SUPV/EXP 1 SPC05
A044C AUDIT COORD 2 GS10 FAU04P AUDITOR II 2 SPC02
X013C ENVIRO HEALTH MGR 1 GS10 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
L099C EPIDEMIOLOGY SUPV 7 GS10 SEP03P EPID SUPV/EXP 7 SPC05
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 2 GS09 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 2 SPC04
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 2 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 2 SPC02
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
L023C ADH HEALTH FACLTS SUP 2 GS09 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
B044C ADH HEALTH PHYS SUPV 1 GS09 SPH02P PHYSICIST SUPV/EXP 1 SPC02
B047C ADH LAB MGR 14 GS09 SLA03P LAB SUPV/EXP 14 SPC03
G238C ADH LOCAL HEALTH UNIT 4 GS09 PHS09C HEALTH UNIT ADMIN 4 SGS09
L029C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS09 SEP01P EPIDEMIOLOGIST 1 SPC04
L029C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 4 GS09 IEH03P ENVIRO HLTH INSP SUPV 4 SGS09
L029C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 15 GS09 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 15 SGS08
L115C ADH RADIOACTIVE MATRL 4 GS09 MHS01P RADIOLGCL PRGM SPEC 4 SPC02
L112C ADH SUICIDE PREV SUPV 2 GS09 SCM12P SUICIDE PREV SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
R019C BUDGET MGR 10 GS09 FBU02C BUDGET MNGR 10 SGS08
B042C ENG 2 GS09 SEN01P ENGINEER 2 SPC03
L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 42 GS09 SEP01P EPIDEMIOLOGIST 42 SPC04
L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 1 GS09 SPH01P PHYSICIST 1 SPC01
L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 3 GS09 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 3 SGS08
L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 1 GS09 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 1 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 1 SGS07
L028C EPIDEMIOLOGIST 1 GS09 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
147 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
B035C GEOLOGY SUPV 1 GS09 SGE02P GEOLOGIST SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G109C GRANTS MGR 6 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 6 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 FBU02C BUDGET MNGR 1 SGS08
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
X038C QA MGR 4 GS09 PQA02C QA MNGR 4 SGS09
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 6 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 6 SPC02
X039C ADH DIR OF COSM BD 1 GS08 IIN03P INSP III 1 SGS06
X043C ADH ENVIRO SUPV 8 GS08 IEH02P ENVIRO HEALTH INSP II 8 SGS08
B079C ADH HEALTH FCLTY LAB 3 GS08 IIN03P INSP III 3 SGS06
B063C ADH HEALTH PHYS 8 GS08 SPH01P PHYSICIST 8 SPC01
G116C ADH LOCAL HEALTH UNIT 9 GS08 PHS09C HEALTH UNIT ADMIN 9 SGS09
G116C ADH LOCAL HEALTH UNIT 2 GS08 PHS10P HEALTH UNIT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 9 GS08 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 9 SGS08
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 2 GS08 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS08 MDI02P DIETICIAN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L113C ADH SUICIDE PREV CALL 8 GS08 SCM11P SUICIDE PREV SPEC 8 SGS06
R021C BUDGET ANLST 24 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 24 SGS07
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
X067C HEALTH FACLTS SURVYR 1 GS08 SCH02P CHEMIST II 1 SPC02
X067C HEALTH FACLTS SURVYR 1 GS08 IEH02P ENVIRO HEALTH INSP II 1 SGS08
L043C HEALTH PRGM SPEC III 6 GS08 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 6 SGS08
L043C HEALTH PRGM SPEC III 1 GS08 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L043C HEALTH PRGM SPEC III 40 GS08 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 40 SGS07
L043C HEALTH PRGM SPEC III 1 GS08 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
L035C NUTRITIONIST CONS 1 GS08 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
L035C NUTRITIONIST CONS 1 GS08 MDI02P DIETICIAN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L035C NUTRITIONIST CONS 9 GS08 MDI03P REGISTERED DIETICIAN 9 MED05
L034C NUTRITIONIST SUPV 1 GS08 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L034C NUTRITIONIST SUPV 1 GS08 PHS03P CONSUMER SCIENCE SPEC 1 SGS06
L034C NUTRITIONIST SUPV 5 GS08 MDI02P DIETICIAN SUPV/EXP 5 MED06
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 2 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 2 SGS07
X081C PLUMB/HVACR INSPCT SU 1 GS08 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
148 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B043C PROF GEO 2 GS08 SGE05P PROF GEOLOGIST 2 SPC03
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 2 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
A060C SEN AUD 2 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 2 SPC02
B126C SEN CHEMIST 5 GS08 SBI02P BIOLOGIST II 5 SPC02
B126C SEN CHEMIST 11 GS08 SCH02P CHEMIST II 11 SPC02
B126C SEN CHEMIST 2 GS08 SCH01P CHEMIST I 2 SPC01
B127C SEN MICROBIOLOGIST 24 GS08 SBI02P BIOLOGIST II 24 SPC02
B127C SEN MICROBIOLOGIST 3 GS08 SCH02P CHEMIST II 3 SPC02
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 2 SPC01
E064C ADH CERT PUB HEALTH E 1 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
E064C ADH CERT PUB HEALTH E 4 GS07 PHS04P HEALTH EDUCATOR 4 SGS05
E064C ADH CERT PUB HEALTH E 1 GS07 PHS01P CERT HEALTH EDUCATOR 1 MED02
L054C ADH EMER MED SVCS SUP 2 GS07 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
L054C ADH EMER MED SVCS SUP 1 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G143C ADH LOCAL HEALTH UNIT 18 GS07 PHS10P HEALTH UNIT SUPV/EXP 18 SGS08
X060C ADH SR ENVIRO HEALTH 16 GS07 IEH02P ENVIRO HEALTH INSP II 16 SGS08
X060C ADH SR ENVIRO HEALTH 1 GS07 IEH01P ENVIRO HEALTH INSP I 1 SGS07
G138C AGENCY ADMINST REV OF 1 GS07 ILS02I HEARING OFF 1 SGS06
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 4 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 4 SGS07
A081C AUD 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
B081C CHEMIST 3 GS07 SBI01P BIOLOGIST I 3 SPC01
B081C CHEMIST 10 GS07 SCH01P CHEMIST I 10 SPC01
L049C DISEASE INTRVNTN SPEC 7 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 7 SGS07
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 3 GS07 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 3 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 3 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 3 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A075C FINAN ANLST I 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
G147C GRANTS COORD 9 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 9 SGS05
L048C HEALTH PRGM SPEC II 4 GS07 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 4 SGS08
L048C HEALTH PRGM SPEC II 30 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 30 SGS07
L048C HEALTH PRGM SPEC II 2 GS07 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 2 SGS06
B077C MICROBIOLOGIST 22 GS07 SBI01P BIOLOGIST I 22 SPC01
B077C MICROBIOLOGIST 1 GS07 SCH01P CHEMIST I 1 SPC01
B077C MICROBIOLOGIST 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
B077C MICROBIOLOGIST 1 GS07 TAT03I ENGINEERING SPEC 1 SGS05
149 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L039C NUTRITIONIST 2 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
L039C NUTRITIONIST 1 GS07 PHS03P CONSUMER SCIENCE SPEC 1 SGS06
L039C NUTRITIONIST 3 GS07 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 3 SGS06
L039C NUTRITIONIST 21 GS07 MDI01P DIETICIAN 21 MED03
A065C PYRLL SVCS COORD 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
X096C PLUMB INSPCT 1 GS07 IEH02P ENVIRO HEALTH INSP II 1 SGS08
X096C PLUMB INSPCT 9 GS07 IIN03P INSP III 9 SGS06
P020C PROD ARTIST 1 GS07 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
P013C PUB INFO COORD 2 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 2 SGS07
X095C QA ANLST 1 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
A072C RSRCH & STATS MGR 3 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 3 SGS07
A063C RSRCH & STATS SUPV 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 4 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 4 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 PHS01P CERT HEALTH EDUCATOR 1 MED02
G176C VOL PRGM MGR 1 GS07 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
L065C ADH EMER MED SVCS SPE 6 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 6 SGS05
L063C ADH FAM CONS SCI SPEC 22 GS06 PHS03P CONSUMER SCIENCE SPEC 22 SGS06
L063C ADH FAM CONS SCI SPEC 2 GS06 THT03I LACTATION SPEC 2 SGS04
C017C ADH HEALTH ADMINST CO 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
C017C ADH HEALTH ADMINST CO 2 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
C017C ADH HEALTH ADMINST CO 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
E047C ADH PUB HEALTH ED 2 GS06 PHS04P HEALTH EDUCATOR 2 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 47 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 47 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
R027C BUDGET SPEC 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
R027C BUDGET SPEC 9 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 9 SGS05
D076C COMMS SYST SUPV 1 GS06 SIA13P DISPATCHER SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
L058C DISEASE INTRVNTN SPEC 30 GS06 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 30 SGS06
X102C ENVIRO HEALTH SPEC 117 GS06 IEH01P ENVIRO HEALTH INSP I 117 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 2 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 2 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
G180C GRANTS ANLST 9 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 9 SGS04
L053C HEALTH PRGM SPEC I 53 GS06 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 53 SGS06
R025C HR ANLST 6 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 6 SGS07
150 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 1 SGS05
R029C HR RECRUITER 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
L069C LPN 1 GS06 IEH01P ENVIRO HEALTH INSP I 1 SGS07
L069C LPN 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
L069C LPN 3 GS06 PHS03P CONSUMER SCIENCE SPEC 3 SGS06
L069C LPN 13 GS06 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 13 SGS06
L069C LPN 57 GS06 MNU01P LPN 57 MED02
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TST04P SKILL TRADES 1 SGS06
M038C PRGM ELGBLTY ANLST 1 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 3 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 3 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 PHS04P HEALTH EDUCATOR 1 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 TAT03I ENGINEERING SPEC 1 SGS05
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST05P SKILL TRADES SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 2 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
X191C ADH MASSAGE THER INSP 1 GS05 IIN01P INSP I 1 SGS04
R033C BENE ANLST 1 GS05 HBE01P BENE ANLST 1 SGS04
S041C BOILER OP 5 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 5 SGS06
S041C BOILER OP 1 GS05 TST07P TRADES SPEC 1 SGS04
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
V013C CENTRAL WRHS OP MGR 2 GS05 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 2 SGS05
B090C ENG TECH 7 GS05 TAT03I ENGINEERING SPEC 7 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 15 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 15 SGS04
C030C HEALTH REC SPEC 4 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 4 SGS05
R032C HR PRGM REP 5 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 5 SGS04
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 2 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 5 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 5 SGS05
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 1 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 1 GS05 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
D081C TELECOMMS SPEC 6 GS05 SIA12P DISPATCHER 6 SGS05
X174C ADH COSM INSPCT 5 GS04 IIN01P INSP I 5 SGS04
151 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L073C ADH LACTATION CONS 10 GS04 THT03I LACTATION SPEC 10 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 FFS06P MED BILLING SPEC 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 95 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 95 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S040C CALIBRATION TECH 2 GS04 TST07P TRADES SPEC 2 SGS04
D088C EMER COMM SPEC 6 GS04 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 6 SGS06
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 16 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 16 SGS04
L077C HEALTH SVCS SPEC II 312 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 312 SGS05
L077C HEALTH SVCS SPEC II 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 6 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 6 SGS03
B111C LAB TECH 14 GS04 SLA04P LAB TECH I 14 SGS06
C083C MAIL SVCS COORD 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S046C MAINT TECH 2 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 2 SGS03
C044C MED BILLING SPEC 9 GS04 FFS06P MED BILLING SPEC 9 SGS05
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
V025C WRHS SPEC 5 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 5 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 38 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 38 SGS02
C070C DUPLICATION ASST 3 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
L083C HEALTH SVCS SPEC I 6 GS03 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 6 SGS05
L083C HEALTH SVCS SPEC I 2 GS03 PRC01P HEALTH AIDE 2 SGS01
V027C INVNTRY CONT TECH 5 GS03 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 5 SGS03
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 1 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
L088C NRSNG AIDE/NRSNG ASST 3 GS02 PRC01P HEALTH AIDE 3 SGS01
V028C WRHS WRKR 5 GS02 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 5 SGS03
0334 AR TOBACCO SETTLEMENT COMM
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
0319 ARKANSAS MINORITY HEALTH COMM
L038C RN 1 MP01 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
N133N ADH DIR MH COMM 1 GS14 PHP08C MH COMM DIR 1 SPC07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
L053C HEALTH PRGM SPEC I 2 GS06 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
P031C MEDIA SPEC 1 GS06 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
152 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
0295 AR SPINAL CORD COMMISSION
D057C INFO TECH MGR 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
U006U ADH EXEC DIR SC COMM 1 GS12 PHP02C HEALTH BOARD DIR II 1 SPC04
M013C ADH SC COMN CLIENT SV 1 GS09 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 1 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
L098C CERT VOC REHAB CNSLR 2 GS08 MRE06P VOC REHAB COUNSELOR 2 MED04
L098C CERT VOC REHAB CNSLR 5 GS08 MRE02P REHAB COORD 5 MED02
M026C LIC SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS07 SCM06P LIC SOC WORKER 1 SPC01
L051C REHAB CNSLR 9 GS06 MRE02P REHAB COORD 9 MED02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 3 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
0292 EXAM SPEECH-LANG PATH & AUD BD
L059C ADH ABSLPA DIR 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
C072C ADMINST SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0289 ST BD OF EXAMINERS PSYCHOLOGY
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0283 STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY
N001N ADH DIR OF PHARM BD 1 MP08 EEX28A PHARMACY BOARD DIR 1 MED12
L015N ADH ASST PHARM DIR 1 MP07 MPA02C PHARMACY BOARD ADMIN 1 MED11
L107C ADH ASBP PHARMACIST I 3 MP06 MPA03P PHARMACY INSP 3 MED09
G041N ADH ASPB GEN COUNSEL 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
A023C ADH PHARM BD CFO 1 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
D087C DB COORD/BUS LICENSE 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0280 STATE BOARD OF OPTOMETRY
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
0279 ST BD OF DISPENSING OPTICIANS
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
0277 AR STATE BOARD OF NURSING
U096U ADH ASBN EXEC DIR 1 SE01 EEX25A NRSNG BOARD DIR 1 MED10
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MP04 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MED08
L009C NURSE MGR 2 MP03 MNU07C RN MNGR 2 MED07
L009C NURSE MGR 1 MP03 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
153 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L026C ADH NRSNG PRGM COORD 2 MP02 MNU06P RN 2 MED05
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D084C COMP OP 1 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
G013N ADH ASBN GEN COUNSEL 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
X030C REG BD CHIEF INVSTIGT 1 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 4 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS06
C045C LIC COORD 6 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 6 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
0274 STATE MEDICAL BOARD
U134U ADH EXEC DIR AR STATE 1 SE01 PHP07C MED BOARD DIR 1 SPC07
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
R019C BUDGET MGR 1 GS09 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
X030C REG BD CHIEF INVSTIGT 1 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 4 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 4 SGS05
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
G187C CRED COORD SUPV 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G187C CRED COORD SUPV 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C045C LIC COORD 16 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 16 SGS02
0270 AR DIETETICS LICENSING BD
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
0268 STATE BD OF DENTAL EXAMINERS
X027C ADH DENTAL EXAMS BD E 1 GS10 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
154 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
0265 STATE BD OF CHIROPRACTIC EXAM
L091C ADH PUB HEALTH SECT C 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
0254 SOCIAL WORK LICENSING BOARD
X135C ADH SOCIAL WORK LIC B 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0246 AR ST BD OF PHYSICAL THERAPY
X050C ADH PT BD EXEC DIR 1 GS08 PHP01C HEALTH BOARD DIR I 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0228 ST BD OF EXAMINERS COUNSELING
N176N ADH EXEC DIR COUNSING 1 GS11 PHP02C HEALTH BOARD DIR II 1 SPC04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES
9908 DEPT OF HUMAN SERVICES
SC008 SEC OF HUMAN SVCS 1 SE05 ESE08A SEC OF HUMAN SVCS 1 EXE04
0710 AR DEPT OF HUMAN SERVICES
N255N DHS CHIEF DEP DIR 2 SE04 EEX11A CHIEF PRGMS DIR 2 EXE03
N221N AR STATE HOSP COO 1 SE03 MLM08C STATE HOSPITAL ADMIN 1 MED12
L023N DHS DEP DIR 1 SE03 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
L023N DHS DEP DIR 1 SE03 EEX22A HUMAN SVCS DIV DIR 1 EXE02
N220N DHS CHIEF ATRNY 1 SE02 EEX22A HUMAN SVCS DIV DIR 1 EXE02
N040N DHS CIO 1 SE02 EEX08A CLC II 1 SPC11
N040N DHS CIO 1 SE02 IIA03C CIO III 1 IST14
N233N DHS CHIEF OF BUS OP 1 SE02 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
N232N DHS DEP CIO 1 SE02 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
N249N DHS DIV DIR 7 SE02 EEX22A HUMAN SVCS DIV DIR 7 EXE02
A136C DHS MEDICAID CFO 1 SE02 FAC12C MEDICAID FISC OFF 1 SPC08
N027N DHS DEP DIR ADULT SVC 1 SE01 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 1 SPC08
N027N DHS DEP DIR ADULT SVC 1 SE01 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
G029N DHS DIR OF PLCY AND L 1 SE01 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
G029N DHS DIR OF PLCY AND L 1 SE01 LAT07C CHIEF ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 SPC09
L005N PSYCHIATRIC SPEC 1 MP08 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L008N PHYS SPEC 4 MP07 MPH02P PHYSICAN SPEC 4 MED12
L008N PHYS SPEC 1 MP07 MPS04P PSYCHOLOGIST II 1 MED09
L008N PHYS SPEC 1 MP07 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MED08
155 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L011N DENTIST 2 MP06 MDE01I DENTIST 2 MED09
L009N DHS BEHAV HLTH GEN PH 3 MP06 MPH03P PHYSC 3 MED10
L014N DIR OF PHARM 1 MP06 MPA04C PHARMACY MNGR 1 MED10
L013N GEN PHYS 1 MP06 MPH03P PHYSC 1 MED10
L013N GEN PHYS 1 MP06 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MED08
L013N GEN PHYS 1 MP06 MNU05C NRSNG ADMIN 1 MED08
L017N DHS ALEXANDER CHIEF P 1 MP05 MPS04P PSYCHOLOGIST II 1 MED09
L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 1 MP05 SSP03C DHS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC09
L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 6 MP05 MPA01P PHARMACIST 6 MED09
L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 1 MP05 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MED08
L105C AHC NRSNG DIR 1 MP04 MNU05C NRSNG ADMIN 1 MED08
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 7 MP04 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 7 MED08
L001C PSYCHOLOGIST SUPV 1 MP04 MPS04P PSYCHOLOGIST II 1 MED09
L001C PSYCHOLOGIST SUPV 1 MP04 MNU07C RN MNGR 1 MED07
L006C ASSOC DIR OF NRSNG 3 MP03 MNU07C RN MNGR 3 MED07
L009C NURSE MGR 1 MP03 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
L009C NURSE MGR 17 MP03 MNU07C RN MNGR 17 MED07
L009C NURSE MGR 2 MP03 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 2 MED06
L021N PHYSICAL THERAPIST 1 MP03 MNU07C RN MNGR 1 MED07
L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 1 MP03 MLM05C PHYSICAL THER 1 MED07
L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 3 MP03 MNU07C RN MNGR 3 MED07
L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 1 MP03 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L015C CLIN SPEECH PATH 9 MP02 MLM07C SPEECH PATHOLOGIST 9 MED07
L015C CLIN SPEECH PATH 2 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 2 MED06
L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR 4 MP02 MNU03P NURSE INSTRUCTOR 4 MED06
L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR 1 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L020C NRSNG SVCS UNIT MGR 1 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L019C RN COORD 9 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 9 MED06
L027C RN SUPV 1 MP02 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
L027C RN SUPV 56 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 56 MED06
L038C RN 1 MP01 IIV01C INVESTIGATIONS MNGR 1 SGS09
L038C RN 1 MP01 IIN04C INSP MNGR 1 SGS08
L038C RN 260 MP01 MNU06P RN 260 MED05
L032C RN - HOSP 28 MP01 MNU06P RN 28 MED05
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IIE01C CHIEF INFO SEC OFF 1 IST12
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 2 IT10 IIA04C IT ADMIN 2 IST12
156 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IIS05C IT INFRA ARCHITECT 1 IST11
D025N DHS IT SEN ENG 1 IT09 IDA01C DATA ARCHITECT 1 IST13
D025N DHS IT SEN ENG 3 IT09 IIS05C IT INFRA ARCHITECT 3 IST11
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIS05C IT INFRA ARCHITECT 1 IST11
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 2 IT09 IIP03P IT SR PROJ MNGR 2 IST10
D123C DB ADMIN 1 IT08 IIS08C IT INFRA MNGR 1 IST11
D007C INFO SYST MGR 2 IT08 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 2 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIP03P IT SR PROJ MNGR 1 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 6 IT08 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 6 IST08
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IAS03P APP COORD 1 IST09
D030C INFO SYST COORD 2 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 2 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D025C STATE IT SEC SPEC 1 IT06 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D025C STATE IT SEC SPEC 2 IT06 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 2 IST06
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IDM03P DB SPEC 1 IST05
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 12 IT05 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 12 IST05
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 2 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 3 IT05 IDN01P DATA ANLST 3 IST07
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 5 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 5 IST04
D057C INFO TECH MGR 1 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 3 IT05 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 3 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 4 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 4 IST04
D044C SYST ANLST 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D058C COMP OP COORD 1 IT04 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D062C DB ANLST 4 IT04 IDM02P DB ANLST 4 IST07
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 1 IT04 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 1 IT04 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 3 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 3 IST02
D075C SFTWR SUPP SPEC 3 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 3 IST02
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 1 IT02 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 4 IT02 IIS09P IT INFRA SPEC 4 IST04
157 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 11 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 11 IST02
R048C DHS CHIEF HR OFF 1 GS15 HDH03C HR ADMIN II 1 SPC08
N244N DHS CHIEF OF COMM 1 GS15 CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMS II 1 SPC07
A131C DHS CHIEF PROC OFF 1 GS15 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
G283C DHS CHIEF SEC & COMP 1 GS15 SSP03C DHS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC09
N175N DHS DDS ASST DIR FOR 1 GS15 SSP03C DHS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC09
A019N DHS DEP CHIEF FIN OFF 1 GS15 FAC04C ACCT MNGR 1 SPC06
N016N DHS DEP DIR ADMINST S 2 GS15 SSP03C DHS DIV ADMIN 2 SPC09
N016N DHS DEP DIR ADMINST S 1 GS15 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
N231N DHS DEP CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GS15 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
G286C DMS DEP DIR 3 GS15 SSP03C DHS DIV ADMIN 3 SPC09
N144N DHS DDS DIR CLIENT SV 1 GS14 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
N086N DHS DDS DIR EVAL PLAN 1 GS14 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
N081N DHS DDS SUPT HDC/CONW 1 GS14 MHA01C NRSNG HOME ADMIN 1 SPC08
N103N DHS MENT HEALTH CENTE 1 GS14 MHA01C NRSNG HOME ADMIN 1 SPC08
N142N DHS/DAAS DEP DIR 1 GS14 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
N134N DHS/DCFS ASST DIR 4 GS14 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 4 SPC07
N121N DHS/DCFS DEP DIR 2 GS14 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 2 SPC07
N102N DHS/DCO ASST DIR 1 GS14 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 1 SPC08
N102N DHS/DCO ASST DIR 1 GS14 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
N101N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR 1 GS14 LAT01C ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 SPC08
N101N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR 1 GS14 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
N099N DHS/DMS ADD - LONG TE 1 GS14 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
N100N DHS/DMS ADD - MED SVC 5 GS14 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 5 SPC08
N100N DHS/DMS ADD - MED SVC 1 GS14 FAU01C AUDIT MNGR 1 SPC06
N080N DHS/DMS ASST DIR - FI 1 GS14 SSP03C DHS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC09
N080N DHS/DMS ASST DIR - FI 1 GS14 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 1 SPC08
N080N DHS/DMS ASST DIR - FI 1 GS14 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
N124N DHS/DYS ASST DIV DIR 2 GS14 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 2 SPC07
N124N DHS/DYS ASST DIV DIR 1 GS14 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
G017N ACOM DWS ASST DIR - T 1 GS13 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 1 SPC08
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
G290C ASST DEP DIR OF LEG A 1 GS13 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
N112N DHS ASST DEP DIR FIN 1 GS13 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
N111N DHS ASST DEP DIR FOR 1 GS13 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 1 SPC08
N110N DHS ASST DIR CONT MON 1 GS13 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
158 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
N128N DHS ASST DIR QA 1 GS13 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
N128N DHS ASST DIR QA 1 GS13 FAU07P INT AUDIT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
M002C DHS BEHAV HLTH ASSOC 1 GS13 MHA02C NRSNG HOME ASST ADMIN 1 SPC06
M003C DHS BEHAV HLTH CHILD 1 GS13 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 1 SPC08
M003C DHS BEHAV HLTH CHILD 1 GS13 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
N126N DHS DDS SUPT HDC 4 GS13 MHA01C NRSNG HOME ADMIN 4 SPC08
D026N DHS ELGBLTY SYS PRGM 1 GS13 HDH06C HR MNGR 1 SPC04
D026N DHS ELGBLTY SYS PRGM 2 GS13 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
G054N DHS GEN COUNSEL 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G277C DHS PROCESS IMPRV DIR 1 GS13 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
G277C DHS PROCESS IMPRV DIR 1 GS13 PQA02C QA MNGR 1 SGS09
N127N DHS/DBHS DIR ALCH & D 1 GS13 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
G056C DHS/DCC ASST DIR OPS 1 GS13 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
N108N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR 2 GS13 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 2 SPC08
N108N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR 1 GS13 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
N107N DHS/OFA ASST DIR - AC 2 GS13 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 2 SPC07
N109N DHS/OFA ASST DIR 1 GS13 FAC11C DIV FISC ADMIN 1 SPC07
G019C GEN COUNSEL 1 GS13 LAT01C ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 SPC08
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT01C ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 SPC08
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 2 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 2 SPC08
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 SSP07C SOC SVCS ADMIN 1 SPC08
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FAC06C ASST CONTROLLER 1 SPC05
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G025C ATRNY SUPV 9 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 9 SPC08
N156N BEHAV HLTH ASST DIR C 1 GS12 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G024C DEPT ALJ 2 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 2 SPC05
G042C DHS ALJ 6 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 6 SPC05
G101C DHS AREA MGR 1 GS12 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
G101C DHS AREA MGR 1 GS12 SSP01C ADULT PUB GUARD ADMIN 1 SGS12
G101C DHS AREA MGR 10 GS12 SSP09C SOC SVCS AREA MNGR 10 SGS11
N168N DHS DIR HOME & COMM B 1 GS12 SSP09C SOC SVCS AREA MNGR 1 SGS11
N168N DHS DIR HOME & COMM B 1 GS12 SSP15C SOC SVCS MNGR 1 SGS09
P004N DHS DIR OF PUB REL 1 GS12 CPR06C PUB INFO MNGR 1 SGS09
P004N DHS DIR OF PUB REL 1 GS12 CPR08P PUB INFO SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
P004N DHS DIR OF PUB REL 1 GS12 CMA04P MRKTNG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 1 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
159 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 1 GS12 FFS01C FISC SPPRT ADMIN 1 SGS10
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 1 GS12 PPR03C PROC MNGR 1 SGS10
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 3 GS12 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 3 SGS09
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 1 GS12 SSP15C SOC SVCS MNGR 1 SGS09
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 1 GS12 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 1 GS12 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 2 GS12 PQA04P QA SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
A016C DHS DMS BUS OP MGR 3 GS12 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 3 SGS08
N167N DHS PLCY & RSRCH DIR 1 GS12 MHA02C NRSNG HOME ASST ADMIN 1 SPC06
N167N DHS PLCY & RSRCH DIR 2 GS12 SSP15C SOC SVCS MNGR 2 SGS09
N152N DHS/DBHS ASST DIR ADM 1 GS12 SSP04C DHS DIV MNGR 1 SPC07
N141N DHS/DCO AREA DIR 7 GS12 SSP09C SOC SVCS AREA MNGR 7 SGS11
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 2 GS12 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 2 GS12 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
R006C HR ADMIN 2 GS12 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A031C ASST CONT 7 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 7 SPC04
G047C ATRNY SPEC 56 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 56 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 4 GS11 LAT03P ATTY I 4 SPC03
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
L011C DHS ALCH/DRUG ABUSE P 1 GS11 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
L011C DHS ALCH/DRUG ABUSE P 1 GS11 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
L011C DHS ALCH/DRUG ABUSE P 1 GS11 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
M005C DHS ASST SUPER - CONW 1 GS11 MHA02C NRSNG HOME ASST ADMIN 1 SPC06
G022C DHS DIR OF EMER OP 1 GS11 SEM04P EMER MNGMNT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A024C DHS DIV CFO 1 GS11 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
G027N DHS RSRCH ANALYSIS MG 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G027N DHS RSRCH ANALYSIS MG 3 GS11 PQA02C QA MNGR 3 SGS09
G027N DHS RSRCH ANALYSIS MG 1 GS11 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G027N DHS RSRCH ANALYSIS MG 1 GS11 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
N153N DHS/DBHS CLIN DIR 1 GS11 SSP15C SOC SVCS MNGR 1 SGS09
G255C DYS ACADEMIC ADMIN 1 GS11 CTR03C TRNG MNGR 1 SGS10
G008C RISK MNGMT ASST DIR 1 GS11 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 1 SGS07
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 2 GS10 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
160 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
V036C AGENCY PROC ADMIN 1 GS10 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 LAT03P ATTY I 1 SPC03
A044C AUDIT COORD 2 GS10 FAU02P AUDIT SUPV/EXP 2 SPC04
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
A044C AUDIT COORD 3 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS07
G100C DHS CO ADMIN III 13 GS10 SSP14C SOC SVCS CO MNGR III 13 SGS10
L010C DHS DMS MED ASSTNCE M 2 GS10 FAC03P ACCT COORD 2 SPC03
L010C DHS DMS MED ASSTNCE M 1 GS10 IIV01C INVESTIGATIONS MNGR 1 SGS09
L010C DHS DMS MED ASSTNCE M 1 GS10 PQA02C QA MNGR 1 SGS09
L010C DHS DMS MED ASSTNCE M 1 GS10 ILS04I RULES & REGS COORD 1 SGS08
L010C DHS DMS MED ASSTNCE M 2 GS10 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
L010C DHS DMS MED ASSTNCE M 1 GS10 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 1 SGS07
E013C ED PRGM MGR 1 GS10 EES02P ED PROF II 1 SPC04
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 2 GS09 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 2 SPC01
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 1 SGS07
G288C ACOM DWS DIV MGR 1 GS09 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G110C ACOM DWS PRGM MGR 1 GS09 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 2 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G111C DHS CO ADMIN II 31 GS09 SSP13C SOC SVCS CO MNGR II 31 SGS09
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 9 GS09 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 9 SPC05
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 SLA03P LAB SUPV/EXP 1 SPC03
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 FFS01C FISC SPPRT ADMIN 1 SGS10
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 SSP13C SOC SVCS CO MNGR II 1 SGS09
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 22 GS09 SSP15C SOC SVCS MNGR 22 SGS09
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 TCO04P CNSTRCT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 8 GS09 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 8 SGS08
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 5 GS09 ILS04I RULES & REGS COORD 5 SGS08
161 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 23 GS09 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 23 SGS08
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 10 GS09 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 10 SGS07
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 TIS01P INDST SAFETY COORD 1 SGS07
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 TMA02C MAINT MNGR 1 SGS07
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 4 GS09 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 4 SGS07
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G099C DHS PRGM ADMIN 1 GS09 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
L040C DIETARY SVCS DIR 1 GS09 TFS03C FOOD SVCS MNGR 1 SGS09
L040C DIETARY SVCS DIR 2 GS09 MDI02P DIETICIAN SUPV/EXP 2 MED06
L040C DIETARY SVCS DIR 1 GS09 MDI03P REGISTERED DIETICIAN 1 MED05
M011C FAM SVC WRKR CO SUPV 28 GS09 SSP12C SOC SVCS CO MNGR I 28 SGS08
M011C FAM SVC WRKR CO SUPV 1 GS09 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G109C GRANTS MGR 2 GS09 PPR02P PROC COORD 2 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 PDA02P DATA/RESEARCH SPEC 1 SGS05
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 14 GS09 SCM03P LIC CLIN SOC WORKER 14 SPC03
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 13 GS09 SCM04P LIC MASTER SOC WORKER 13 SPC02
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 SCM06P LIC SOC WORKER 1 SPC01
L021C NRSNG HOME ASST ADMIN 4 GS09 MHA02C NRSNG HOME ASST ADMIN 4 SPC06
M014C PRGM ELIG COORD III 9 GS09 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 9 SGS07
M014C PRGM ELIG COORD III 3 GS09 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 3 SGS05
L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAM 11 GS09 MPS02P PSYCH EXAM 11 MED03
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
X038C QA MGR 2 GS09 PQA02C QA MNGR 2 SGS09
X038C QA MGR 1 GS09 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
E015C SPCL ED SUPV 1 GS09 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
E024C TCHR SUPV 1 GS09 EES01P ED PROF I 1 SPC02
M008C YOUTH PRGM DIR 1 GS09 SSP15C SOC SVCS MNGR 1 SGS09
162 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 3 GS08 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 3 SPC01
G081C ACOM DWS DIV CHIEF 1 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G128C ACOM DWS FLD MGR II 3 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 3 SGS08
G127C ACOM DWS PRGM OP MGR 5 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 5 SGS08
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 PCR03P CLAIMS REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS01C FISC SPPRT ADMIN 1 SGS10
E035C CERT MSTRS TCHR 6 GS08 ETF06P TEACHER II 6 SGS07
L050C CERT RESP THER TECH 4 GS08 MLM06C RESPIRATORY THER 4 MED04
T031C DHS BEHAV HLTH PUB SA 1 GS08 SSE02C SEC MNGR 1 SGS07
G130C DHS CO ADMIN I 39 GS08 SSP12C SOC SVCS CO MNGR I 39 SGS08
M016C DHS FLD MGR 5 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 5 SGS08
A056C DHS FINAN SECT MGR 4 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 4 SGS07
A056C DHS FINAN SECT MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A056C DHS FINAN SECT MGR 2 GS08 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 PHS06C HEALTH PRGM MNGR 2 SPC05
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 11 GS08 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 11 SGS08
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 26 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 26 SGS08
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 TCO01P CNSTRCT COORD 1 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 8 GS08 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 8 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 8 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 8 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 12 GS08 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 12 SGS07
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 2 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 3 GS08 ILS02I HEARING OFF 3 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 2 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 2 GS08 PPR01P PROC ANLST 2 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
163 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 TFM01P FACILITY COORD 1 SGS04
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 SIA21P INT AFFRS SUPV/EXP 1 LES04
G152C DHS PRGM MGR 1 GS08 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
G083C DHS/DAAS DIV MGR 1 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G129C DHS/DCO PRGM MGR 1 GS08 PQA02C QA MNGR 1 SGS09
G129C DHS/DCO PRGM MGR 5 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 5 SGS08
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 1 GS08 PQA02C QA MNGR 1 SGS09
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 2 GS08 CTR04P TRNG SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 2 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
E031C ED PRGM COORD 1 GS08 CMA01P MRKTNG COORD 1 SGS05
M010C FAM SVC WRKR CLIN SPE 1 GS08 SCM04P LIC MASTER SOC WORKER 1 SPC02
M010C FAM SVC WRKR CLIN SPE 15 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 15 SGS08
M010C FAM SVC WRKR CLIN SPE 4 GS08 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 4 SGS07
M010C FAM SVC WRKR CLIN SPE 7 GS08 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 7 SGS06
M015C FAM SVC WRKR SUPV 144 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 144 SGS08
M015C FAM SVC WRKR SUPV 18 GS08 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 18 SGS07
A047C FINAN ANLST II 2 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
A047C FINAN ANLST II 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
X067C HEALTH FACLTS SURVYR 3 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 3 SGS07
X067C HEALTH FACLTS SURVYR 19 GS08 IIN03P INSP III 19 SGS06
A066C INT AUD 1 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
A066C INT AUD 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
M100C LTSS - PRGM ELGBLTY S 15 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 15 SGS08
M100C LTSS - PRGM ELGBLTY S 3 GS08 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 3 SGS07
S004C MAINT MGR 1 GS08 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 1 SGS07
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 3 GS08 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 3 SGS08
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 5 GS08 HDH04P HR ANLST 5 SGS06
V007C PROC COORD 4 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 4 SGS07
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR01P PROC ANLST 1 SGS06
V004C PROC MGR 1 GS08 TCO01P CNSTRCT COORD 1 SGS07
V004C PROC MGR 3 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 3 SGS07
M018C PRGM ELGBLTY COORD II 22 GS08 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 22 SGS07
M018C PRGM ELGBLTY COORD II 12 GS08 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 12 SGS05
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 2 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
164 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X062C QA COORD 2 GS08 PQA04P QA SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 SSP17P SOC SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
X062C QA COORD 2 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 3 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 3 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 2 GS08 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 2 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FAU02P AUDIT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
A060C SEN AUD 13 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 13 SPC02
A060C SEN AUD 2 GS08 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 2 SPC01
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A060C SEN AUD 1 GS08 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 CTR03C TRNG MNGR 1 SGS10
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 PHS08P HEALTH PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 CTR04P TRNG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 1 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
E023C TRNG PROJ MGR 2 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
M012C YOUTH PRGM MGR 1 GS08 IMP02C MILITARY PRGM MNGR 1 SGS09
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 7 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 7 SGS06
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 3 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 3 SGS07
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 1 GS07 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 1 SGS07
G149C ACOM DWS FLD MGR I 1 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 2 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 PPE03P PROG ELIG SPEC II 1 SGS06
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
G181C ACOM DWS PRGM MONITOR 1 GS07 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
G209C ACOM DWS PRGM SUPV 2 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G196C ACOM DWS SAT OFF SUPV 1 GS07 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
G138C AGENCY ADMINST REV OF 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
G138C AGENCY ADMINST REV OF 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G138C AGENCY ADMINST REV OF 3 GS07 ILS02I HEARING OFF 3 SGS06
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 4 GS07 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 4 SGS08
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 8 GS07 HDH04P HR ANLST 8 SGS06
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 5 GS07 HDH07P HR SPEC 5 SGS04
165 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A081C AUD 1 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 1 SPC01
A081C AUD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A081C AUD 1 GS07 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
V008C BUYER SUPV 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
S008C CAMPUS MAINT SUPV 1 GS07 TST03P LIC TRADES SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
S008C CAMPUS MAINT SUPV 1 GS07 TST05P SKILL TRADES SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
S008C CAMPUS MAINT SUPV 1 GS07 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
M043C DDS PRGM COORD 3 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 3 SGS07
P065C DEV SPEC 1 GS07 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
G131C DHS BEHAV HLTH MED BU 1 GS07 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
A055C DHS INSTITUTION BUS M 4 GS07 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 4 SGS09
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 2 GS07 SCM06P LIC SOC WORKER 2 SPC01
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 CME02P EDITOR 1 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 2 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 2 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 60 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 60 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 2 GS07 PPR02P PROC COORD 2 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 4 GS07 PQA01P QA COORD 4 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 7 GS07 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 7 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 2 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 3 GS07 PCR03P CLAIMS REV SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 2 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 2 GS07 PHS07P HEALTH PRGM SPEC 2 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 HDH04P HR ANLST 1 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 2 GS07 PPE03P PROG ELIG SPEC II 2 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 5 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 5 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 13 GS07 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 13 SGS06
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAS13C POLICY COORD 1 SGS05
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
G183C DHS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
G267C DHS PRGM ELGBLTY ANLS 18 GS07 PPE03P PROG ELIG SPEC II 18 SGS06
G267C DHS PRGM ELGBLTY ANLS 2 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 2 SGS05
M042C DHS STAFF SUPV 2 GS07 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
M042C DHS STAFF SUPV 1 GS07 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 1 SGS07
166 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G153C DHS/DAAS PRGM SUPV 2 GS07 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 2 SGS07
G153C DHS/DAAS PRGM SUPV 1 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
G182C DHS/DDS PRGM COORD 32 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 32 SGS07
G182C DHS/DDS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
G082C DHS/DYS ADMISNS EVAL 1 GS07 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 1 SGS07
L055C DIETICIAN 2 GS07 MDI01P DIETICIAN 2 MED03
S019C DIR MAINT 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 1 GS07 ETF06P TEACHER II 1 SGS07
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 1 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 10 GS07 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 10 SGS06
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 3 GS07 ETF05P TEACHER I 3 SGS06
E032C ED CNSLR 1 GS07 SCM07P SCHOOL COUNSELOR 1 SPC01
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
M027C FAM SVC WRKR SPEC 670 GS07 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 670 SGS06
M040C FAM SVCS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
M040C FAM SVCS PRGM COORD 1 GS07 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
A076C FINAN PRGM ANLST 2 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
A075C FINAN ANLST I 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A075C FINAN ANLST I 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
X125C FRAUD INVSTIGTR COORD 2 GS07 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G147C GRANTS COORD 2 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 2 SGS05
L048C HEALTH PRGM SPEC II 1 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
L062C LPN SUPV 9 GS07 MNU02P LPN SUPV/EXP 9 MED03
L062C LPN SUPV 3 GS07 MNU01P LPN 3 MED02
M026C LIC SOCIAL WRKR 7 GS07 SCM06P LIC SOC WORKER 7 SPC01
M026C LIC SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS07 SCM01I CHAPLAIN 1 SGS06
M099C LTSS - PRGM ELGBLTY S 131 GS07 PPE03P PROG ELIG SPEC II 131 SGS06
M099C LTSS - PRGM ELGBLTY S 79 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 79 SGS05
S017C MAINT COORD 1 GS07 TIW02P INVENTORY MNGR 1 SGS06
S017C MAINT COORD 3 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
S017C MAINT COORD 1 GS07 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
M039C MEDICAID SVCS SUPV 1 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
L061C MED TECHNOLOGIST 2 GS07 MLM02C MED TECHNOLOGIST 2 MED04
A065C PYRLL SVCS COORD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
167 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
P020C PROD ARTIST 2 GS07 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 2 SGS07
M025C PRGM ELGBLTY COORD I 27 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 27 SGS07
M025C PRGM ELGBLTY COORD I 1 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
M025C PRGM ELGBLTY COORD I 5 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 5 SGS05
M037C PRGM ELGBLTY SUPV 86 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 86 SGS07
M037C PRGM ELGBLTY SUPV 1 GS07 PPE03P PROG ELIG SPEC II 1 SGS06
M037C PRGM ELGBLTY SUPV 23 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 23 SGS05
P013C PUB INFO COORD 3 GS07 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 3 SGS06
X095C QA ANLST 5 GS07 PQA04P QA SUPV/EXP 5 SGS08
X095C QA ANLST 7 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 7 SGS06
X095C QA ANLST 3 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 3 SGS05
L052C REHAB FCLTY SUPV 2 GS07 MRE02P REHAB COORD 2 MED02
A072C RSRCH & STATS MGR 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
A063C RSRCH & STATS SUPV 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
M024C RES SVCS MGR 1 GS07 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
M024C RES SVCS MGR 12 GS07 PRC07C RES CRE MNGR 12 SGS07
M024C RES SVCS MGR 1 GS07 PRC02C RES SVCS MNGR 1 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 6 GS07 CTR04P TRNG SUPV/EXP 6 SGS08
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 7 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 7 SGS07
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 1 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
M023C SUB ABUSE PRGM COORD 1 GS07 SCM09P SUB USE DIS SPEC 1 SGS06
A092C ACOM DWS FLD TAX REP 1 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
G217C ACOM DWS WRKFRCE SPEC 29 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 29 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 4 GS06 PPR01P PROC ANLST 4 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 57 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 57 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 2 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 SSP08P SOC SVCS ADVISOR 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
C037C ADMINST ANLST 4 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS04
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS12P MAILROOM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS02
168 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
M045C ADULT PROT SVCS WRKR 43 GS06 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 43 SGS06
R027C BUDGET SPEC 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
R027C BUDGET SPEC 3 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 3 SGS05
R027C BUDGET SPEC 15 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 15 SGS04
E044C CERT BACHELORS TCHR 1 GS06 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
E044C CERT BACHELORS TCHR 14 GS06 ETF05P TEACHER I 14 SGS06
M057C CHAPLAIN 1 GS06 SCM01I CHAPLAIN 1 SGS06
M053C CHILD CARE SVC SPEC 9 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 9 SGS05
M053C CHILD CARE SVC SPEC 2 GS06 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 2 SGS03
R026C CR/EMP REL COORD 1 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 1 SGS06
G170C DHS ADMINST REV OFF 6 GS06 ILS02I HEARING OFF 6 SGS06
L044C DHS BEHAV HLTH CASE R 1 GS06 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
G184C DHS PRGM CONS 2 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS06
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 2 GS06 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 23 GS06 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 23 SGS07
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 3 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 3 SGS06
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 2 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS06
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 5 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 5 SGS05
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 2 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 2 SGS05
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
G210C DHS PRGM SPEC 6 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 6 SGS04
G198C DHS/DAAS PRGM SPEC 2 GS06 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
G198C DHS/DAAS PRGM SPEC 5 GS06 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 5 SGS07
G198C DHS/DAAS PRGM SPEC 2 GS06 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 2 SGS03
T052C DHS/DBHS PUB SAFE SUP 4 GS06 SLE02P POLICE OFF 4 LES01
P021C EDITOR 1 GS06 CME02P EDITOR 1 SGS07
M051C FAM SVC WRKR 40 GS06 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 40 SGS06
M051C FAM SVC WRKR 5 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 5 SGS05
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 6 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 6 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 3 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 3 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 4 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS04
X156C FRAUD INVSTIGTR 3 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 3 SGS05
169 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G180C GRANTS ANLST 2 GS06 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 2 SGS07
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G180C GRANTS ANLST 6 GS06 PPR01P PROC ANLST 6 SGS06
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 12 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 12 SGS04
G214C GRANTS SPEC 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
G214C GRANTS SPEC 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
G214C GRANTS SPEC 1 GS06 IIN01P INSP I 1 SGS04
P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GS06 CMA01P MRKTNG COORD 1 SGS05
L053C HEALTH PRGM SPEC I 1 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 1 SGS06
R025C HR ANLST 17 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 17 SGS06
R025C HR ANLST 3 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 3 SGS04
R029C HR RECRUITER 1 GS06 HBE02P BENE COORD 1 SGS06
R029C HR RECRUITER 4 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 4 SGS06
X101C INT AFFRS INVSTIGTR 5 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 5 SGS05
X101C INT AFFRS INVSTIGTR 1 GS06 SIA19P INT AFFRS INVEST 1 LES03
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 2 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 8 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 8 SGS06
L069C LPN 2 GS06 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 2 SGS06
L069C LPN 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
L069C LPN 2 GS06 THT01I CNA 2 SGS03
L069C LPN 188 GS06 MNU01P LPN 188 MED02
L069C LPN 4 GS06 MRE03P REHAB INSTRUCTOR 4 MED02
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TST02P LIC TRADES 1 SGS07
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 PRC02C RES SVCS MNGR 1 SGS07
S033C MAINT SUPV 3 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TAT09P PRINTER SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
S033C MAINT SUPV 3 GS06 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 3 SGS04
P031C MEDIA SPEC 1 GS06 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
P031C MEDIA SPEC 1 GS06 CMA03P MRKTNG SPEC 1 SGS04
C013C MED SVCS REP 1 GS06 PCR03P CLAIMS REV SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G166C MIL PRGM COORD 3 GS06 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 3 SGS07
G124C OMBUDSMAN 1 GS06 SSP11P SOC SVCS COORD 1 SGS07
G178C PLCY DEV COORD 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G178C PLCY DEV COORD 4 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 4 SGS05
170 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
M066C PRGM ELGBLTY SPEC 1 GS06 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
M066C PRGM ELGBLTY SPEC 846 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 846 SGS05
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 1 GS06 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
A084C PRGM/FLD AUDIT SPEC 1 GS06 PRC06C RES CRE TM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
L103C PSYCHOLOGICAL EVAL 3 GS06 MPS01P PSYCH EVALUATOR 3 SGS03
X154C PUB ASSTNCE INVSTIGTR 20 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 20 SGS05
X136C QA REVER 30 GS06 PQA03P QA SPEC 30 SGS06
C026C REC/INTAKE SUPV 1 GS06 PAS15P RECORDS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
C026C REC/INTAKE SUPV 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
L060C REHAB INSTRUCTOR SUPV 16 GS06 PRC06C RES CRE TM SUPV/EXP 16 SGS05
L060C REHAB INSTRUCTOR SUPV 10 GS06 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 10 SGS04
L051C REHAB CNSLR 1 GS06 MRE02P REHAB COORD 1 MED02
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 3 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 2 GS06 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 2 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 4 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS04
M098C RES CARE SHIFT MGR 54 GS06 PRC06C RES CRE TM SUPV/EXP 54 SGS05
M098C RES CARE SHIFT MGR 1 GS06 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS04
X094C SVCS & PRGM LIC SPEC 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
X094C SVCS & PRGM LIC SPEC 5 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 5 SGS05
X094C SVCS & PRGM LIC SPEC 1 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
X094C SVCS & PRGM LIC SPEC 1 GS06 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 5 GS06 TST05P SKILL TRADES SUPV/EXP 5 SGS07
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 3 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST04P SKILL TRADES 1 SGS06
M054C SOCIAL SVC WRKR 10 GS06 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 10 SGS07
M054C SOCIAL SVC WRKR 1 GS06 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 21 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 21 SGS07
G202C VOL PRGM COORD 2 GS06 PHS05P HEALTH PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
G202C VOL PRGM COORD 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S021C WAT FILT/WASTE DIS PL 1 GS06 TST03P LIC TRADES SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
S021C WAT FILT/WASTE DIS PL 1 GS06 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
M047C YOUTH SVCS ADVSR 11 GS06 SSP08P SOC SVCS ADVISOR 11 SGS05
C036C ADMINST REV ANLST 2 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 4 GS05 TFS04C FOOD SVCS SUPV/EXP 4 SGS05
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 6 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 6 SGS04
171 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 1 GS05 TAT08P PRINTER 1 SGS04
A088C ASSETS COORD 2 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 2 SGS05
A088C ASSETS COORD 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A088C ASSETS COORD 1 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
R033C BENE ANLST 1 GS05 HBE01P BENE ANLST 1 SGS04
S041C BOILER OP 4 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 4 SGS06
S041C BOILER OP 2 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 2 SGS04
S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS 1 GS05 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
V014C BUYER 2 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 2 SGS05
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PAS14P RECORDS COORD 1 SGS05
B090C ENG TECH 7 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 7 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 PAS07I CO ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 16 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 16 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 11 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 11 SGS02
L070C HEALTH CARE ANLST 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
L070C HEALTH CARE ANLST 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
L070C HEALTH CARE ANLST 3 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
L070C HEALTH CARE ANLST 3 GS05 PCR02P CLAIMS REV SPEC 3 SGS03
L070C HEALTH CARE ANLST 3 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
X124C HEALTH FCLTY REVER 1 GS05 IIN01P INSP I 1 SGS04
C030C HEALTH REC SPEC 1 GS05 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
C030C HEALTH REC SPEC 2 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
D077C HELP DESK SPEC 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
D077C HELP DESK SPEC 4 GS05 PAS05I CALL CENTER SPEC 4 SGS02
R032C HR PRGM REP 9 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 9 SGS04
C040C LEASING SPEC 1 GS05 TAT08P PRINTER 1 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 34 GS05 PAS07I CO ADMIN SUPV 34 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 1 GS05 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 5 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 5 SGS02
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
172 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 2 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 1 GS05 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
T055C PUB SAFE OFF 20 GS05 SLE02P POLICE OFF 20 LES01
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 4 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 4 SGS05
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 2 GS05 PAS14P RECORDS COORD 2 SGS05
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 4 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS04
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
M065C REC ACTIVITY SUPV 3 GS05 PRC06C RES CRE TM SUPV/EXP 3 SGS05
M065C REC ACTIVITY SUPV 1 GS05 THT01I CNA 1 SGS03
L066C REHAB INSTRUCTOR 14 GS05 PRC06C RES CRE TM SUPV/EXP 14 SGS05
L066C REHAB INSTRUCTOR 110 GS05 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 110 SGS04
L066C REHAB INSTRUCTOR 11 GS05 THT01I CNA 11 SGS03
L066C REHAB INSTRUCTOR 24 GS05 MRE03P REHAB INSTRUCTOR 24 MED02
M004C RES OP MGR 301 GS05 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 301 SGS04
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 25 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 25 SGS06
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 21 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 21 SGS04
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 4 GS05 TMA05P MAINT TECH 4 SGS03
E051C STAFF DEV SPEC 1 GS05 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
E051C STAFF DEV SPEC 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
V018C WRHS MGR 1 GS05 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
V018C WRHS MGR 2 GS05 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 2 SGS04
V018C WRHS MGR 1 GS05 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
S030C WAT FILT/WASTE DIS PL 2 GS05 TST02P LIC TRADES 2 SGS07
S030C WAT FILT/WASTE DIS PL 1 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
S030C WAT FILT/WASTE DIS PL 1 GS05 TST07P TRADES SPEC 1 SGS04
M060C YOUTH PRGM COORD 10 GS05 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 10 SGS06
A101C ACCNTNG TECH 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 108 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 108 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 3 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 TAT08P PRINTER 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 45 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 45 SGS02
C072C ADMINST SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECH 1 GS04 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
S061C CHDC LAUNDRY OP MGR 1 GS04 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 1 SGS01
X167C COMPLAINTS INVSTIGTR 1 GS04 IIV02P INVEST I 1 SGS04
173 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L081C DENTAL ASST 2 GS04 THT02I DENTAL ASST 2 SGS04
L102C DIETETIC SPEC 2 GS04 TFS04C FOOD SVCS SUPV/EXP 2 SGS05
L078C FAM SVCS ASST 6 GS04 SSP10P SOC SVCS ASST 6 SGS02
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 16 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 16 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
A102C FISCAL SUPP TECH 3 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
S044C FOOD PREP MGR 6 GS04 TFS04C FOOD SVCS SUPV/EXP 6 SGS05
R038C HR ASST 2 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
R036C HR SPEC 3 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 3 SGS04
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 2 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 2 SGS05
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 2 GS04 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 2 SGS04
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
B111C LAB TECH 1 GS04 SLA04P LAB TECH I 1 SGS06
B111C LAB TECH 2 GS04 MLM04P PHLEBOTOMIST 2 SGS04
S047C LANDSCAPE SUPV 2 GS04 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 2 SGS02
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 7 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 7 SGS06
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 27 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 27 SGS04
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
S046C MAINT TECH 5 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 5 SGS03
C044C MED BILLING SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C044C MED BILLING SPEC 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
A097C PYRLL TECH 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A097C PYRLL TECH 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 1 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 6 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 6 SGS05
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 1 GS04 TAT08P PRINTER 1 SGS04
M063C RES CARE PRGM COORD 1 GS04 THT01I CNA 1 SGS03
T072C SEC OFF SUPV 1 GS04 SSE01P SEC GUARD 1 SGS03
T072C SEC OFF SUPV 1 GS04 SSP10P SOC SVCS ASST 1 SGS02
V023C STOREROOM SUPV 5 GS04 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 5 SGS04
V021C SURP PROP AGENT 1 GS04 TIW06P SURPLUS PROP AGENT 1 SGS05
L074C THER ASST 3 GS04 PRC01P HEALTH AIDE 3 SGS01
V025C WRHS SPEC 6 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 6 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 91 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 91 SGS02
174 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 3 GS03 PAS11P MAILROOM SPEC 3 SGS01
S081C APPRENTICE TRADESMAN 1 GS03 TST06P TRADES APPRENTICE 1 SGS05
S081C APPRENTICE TRADESMAN 7 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 7 SGS03
M084C BEHAV HLTH AIDE 106 GS03 THT01I CNA 106 SGS03
M084C BEHAV HLTH AIDE 59 GS03 PRC03P RES CRE COORD 59 SGS02
M084C BEHAV HLTH AIDE 16 GS03 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 16 SGS01
L082C CERT NRSNG ASST 935 GS03 THT01I CNA 935 SGS03
M090C DHS PRGM ASST 2 GS03 THT01I CNA 2 SGS03
M090C DHS PRGM ASST 2 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
M090C DHS PRGM ASST 338 GS03 SSP10P SOC SVCS ASST 338 SGS02
S056C FOOD PREP SUPV 14 GS03 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 14 SGS03
S067C HOUSEKEEPER SUPV 2 GS03 THO02P HOUSEKEEP SUPV/EXP 2 SGS02
S076C INST BEAUTICIAN 4 GS03 TAT01I BEAUTICIAN 4 SGS01
V027C INVNTRY CONT TECH 1 GS03 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
V027C INVNTRY CONT TECH 9 GS03 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 9 SGS03
V027C INVNTRY CONT TECH 1 GS03 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 1 SGS03
C062C LO ADMINST ASST 418 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 418 SGS02
S050C MAINT SPEC 7 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 7 SGS03
C074C MED REC ASST 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C066C PATIENT ACCOUNT SPEC 1 GS03 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C066C PATIENT ACCOUNT SPEC 1 GS03 THT01I CNA 1 SGS03
S054C PRINTER 1 GS03 TAT08P PRINTER 1 SGS04
T084C PUB SAFE SEC OFF 60 GS03 SSE01P SEC GUARD 60 SGS03
T084C PUB SAFE SEC OFF 14 GS03 SSP10P SOC SVCS ASST 14 SGS02
T087C SEC OFF 1 GS03 SSE01P SEC GUARD 1 SGS03
M070C YOUTH PRGM SPEC 9 GS03 SSP10P SOC SVCS ASST 9 SGS02
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 37 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 37 SGS02
S083C BAKER 4 GS02 TFS01P COOK 4 SGS01
S082C CANTEEN SUPV 2 GS02 TFS01P COOK 2 SGS01
S070C EQUIP TECH 4 GS02 TST07P TRADES SPEC 4 SGS04
S070C EQUIP TECH 8 GS02 TMA05P MAINT TECH 8 SGS03
S070C EQUIP TECH 10 GS02 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 10 SGS02
S085C FOOD PREP SPEC 22 GS02 TFS01P COOK 22 SGS01
S084C INST SVCS SUPV 5 GS02 THO02P HOUSEKEEP SUPV/EXP 5 SGS02
S084C INST SVCS SUPV 2 GS02 TFS01P COOK 2 SGS01
S084C INST SVCS SUPV 33 GS02 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 33 SGS01
175 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
S088C KITCHEN ASST 1 GS02 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S088C KITCHEN ASST 71 GS02 TFS01P COOK 71 SGS01
S066C LANDSCAPE TECH 2 GS02 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 2 SGS02
L075C ORTHOTIST AIDE 4 GS02 THT01I CNA 4 SGS03
L085C PT AIDE 1 GS02 THT01I CNA 1 SGS03
M076C REC ACTIVITY LEAD II 20 GS02 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 20 SGS01
V030C SHIP & RECEIV CLERK 1 GS02 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
E056C TCHR ASST 5 GS02 EEP01P ED PARAPROF 5 SGS03
L084C THER AIDE 1 GS02 THT01I CNA 1 SGS03
V028C WRHS WRKR 5 GS02 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 5 SGS03
S086C COOK 6 GS01 TFS01P COOK 6 SGS01
S080C EQUIP OP 1 GS01 TST07P TRADES SPEC 1 SGS04
S089C FOOD PREP TECH 58 GS01 TFS01P COOK 58 SGS01
S087C INST SVCS ASST 1 GS01 TFS01P COOK 1 SGS01
S087C INST SVCS ASST 134 GS01 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 134 SGS01
S065C MAINT ASST 5 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 5 SGS03
S065C MAINT ASST 1 GS01 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 1 SGS02
L086C PHARM ASST 2 GS01 THT04I PHARMACY TECH 2 SGS02
M082C REC ACTIVITY LEAD I 2 GS01 PRC04P RES CRE SPEC 2 SGS01
DEPARTMENT OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL
9909 DEPT OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL
SC009 SEC OF INSPCT GEN 1 SE05 ESE09A SEC OF INSP GENERAL 1 EXE04
N247N TAX APP COMM 3 SE04 EEX50A TAX APPEALS COMMER 3 EXE02
U124U MEDICAID INSPCT GEN 1 SE03 EEX24A MEDICAID INSP GENERAL 1 SPC10
N219N DFA ADMIN INT AUDIT 1 SE02 EEX47A STATE INT AUDIT DIR 1 EXE02
U125U IG CHIEF COUNS 1 SE01 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
L027C RN SUPV 2 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 2 MED06
L027C RN SUPV 1 MP02 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
L038C RN 1 MP01 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
N226N AR FAIR HOUS EXEC DIR 1 GS15 SSP05C FAIR HOUSING DIR 1 SPC06
A144C INT AUDIT DEP DIR 1 GS15 FAU06C INT AUDIT DEP DIR 1 SPC08
N199N DIG DEP ADMIN 1 GS14 EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I 1 EXE01
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAU07P INT AUDIT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
G055N EXEC ADMIN 1 GS13 PCA03P CLAIMS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A143C TAX APP ACCOUNTANT 1 GS13 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
G310C TAX APP STAFF ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
176 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FAU08P INT AUDITOR 1 SPC05
A115C DIG CFO 1 GS12 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G249C DIG PRGM ADMIN 1 GS12 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G249C DIG PRGM ADMIN 1 GS12 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
G250C DIG OP MGR 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G250C DIG OP MGR 1 GS11 PCA03P CLAIMS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G250C DIG OP MGR 1 GS11 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 1 SGS07
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 PCA03P CLAIMS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A044C AUDIT COORD 5 GS10 FAU08P INT AUDITOR 5 SPC05
A044C AUDIT COORD 1 GS10 PCA03P CLAIMS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
C118C COMM ASST 1 GS10 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 1 SGS07
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 1 SGS07
A113C DIG SR. AUD 1 GS08 PCA03P CLAIMS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A113C DIG SR. AUD 3 GS08 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 3 SGS07
A113C DIG SR. AUD 1 GS08 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
A113C DIG SR. AUD 1 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
C107C OMIG MED REV OFF 3 GS08 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 3 SGS07
X112C AFHC CHIEF INVSTIGTR 1 GS07 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
X200C MEDICAID FRAUD INVSTI 1 GS07 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 1 SGS07
G311C TAX APP COMM LAW CLER 1 GS07 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 3 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
X150C AFHC INVSTIGTR 5 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 5 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR & LICENSING
9910 DEPT OF LABOR AND LICENSING
SC010 SEC OF LABOR & LIC 1 SE05 ESE10A SEC OF L&L 1 EXE04
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIA01C CIO I 1 IST10
177 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 3 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 3 IST04
D057C INFO TECH MGR 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
N245N DLL COS 1 GS15 EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I 1 EXE01
U135U DLL DIV OF LABOR DIR 1 GS15 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
G019C GEN COUNSEL 1 GS13 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH02C HR ADMIN I 1 SPC05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G308C DLL ENFRCMNT MGR 1 GS10 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
X081C PLUMB/HVACR INSPCT SU 1 GS08 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
S018C HVACR MECHAL INSPCT 6 GS07 IIN03P INSP III 6 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C094C ATHL COMM PRGM MGR 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 2 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
P031C MEDIA SPEC 1 GS06 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 IIN01P INSP I 1 SGS04
0800 DIVISION OF LABOR
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
G096C DLL LABOR DIV MGR 2 GS09 TIS02P INDST SAFETY SUPV/EXP 2 SGS09
G096C DLL LABOR DIV MGR 1 GS09 TCO04P CNSTRCT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G096C DLL LABOR DIV MGR 1 GS09 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
X052C DLL LABOR INSPCT SUPV 6 GS08 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 6 SGS07
X052C DLL LABOR INSPCT SUPV 1 GS08 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X051C DLL LABOR MEDIATOR 1 GS08 ILP03P LABOR MEDIATOR 1 SGS07
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 1 GS08 CTR04P TRNG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G159C DEPT BUS COORD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
X065C DLL LABOR INSPCT 8 GS07 IIN03P INSP III 8 SGS06
178 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X065C DLL LABOR INSPCT 18 GS07 IIN02P INSP II 18 SGS05
X052C DLL LABOR INSPCT SUPV 1 GS07 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 2 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
A072C RSRCH & STATS MGR 1 GS07 PDA01P DATA/RESEARCH ANLST 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 3 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
X122C DLL LABOR STAND INVST 8 GS06 IIN02P INSP II 8 SGS05
A093C STATISTICIAN 2 GS06 PQA03P QA SPEC 2 SGS06
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 5 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 5 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
0390 WORKERS' COMPENSATION COMM
U100U DLL WCC CHAIRMAN 1 SE03 EEX53A WC CHAIR 1 EXE02
U007U DLL WCC COMM 2 SE02 EEX54A WC COMM 2 EXE01
U046U DLL WCC CEO 1 SE01 ILP06C WORKERS COMP CEO 1 SPC10
L038C RN 1 MP01 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D062C DB ANLST 1 IT04 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 1 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
N070N DLL WCC ASST CEO 1 GS15 ILP05C WORKERS COMP ASST CEO 1 SPC09
G005N DLL WCC CHIEF ALJ 1 GS15 LAT07C CHIEF ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 SPC09
G010N DLL WCC ALJ 12 GS14 LAT01C ADMIN LAW JUDGE 12 SPC08
G010N DLL WCC ALJ 1 GS14 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 6 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 6 SPC05
G007C DLL WCC DIV MGR 7 GS11 ILP07C WORKERS COMP DIV MNGR 7 SPC05
G073C ATRNY 5 GS10 LAT04P ATTY II 5 SPC05
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
A042C INS SEN EXAM 1 GS09 PCA01P CLAIMS COORD 1 SGS07
A042C INS SEN EXAM 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G107C DLL WCC PROG MNGR 4 GS08 PCA04P WORKERS COMP COORD 4 SGS05
179 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G093C OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 2 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 2 SGS07
C009C HEARING REPORTER 1 GS07 ILS01I COURT REPORTER 1 SGS08
C009C HEARING REPORTER 2 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 2 SGS07
G168C INDST CONS 4 GS07 TIS01P INDST SAFETY COORD 4 SGS07
R027C BUDGET SPEC 1 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 1 SGS05
G160C DLL WCC PRGM COORD 2 GS06 PCA04P WORKERS COMP COORD 2 SGS05
G193C DLL WCC PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G193C DLL WCC PRGM SPEC 12 GS06 PCA04P WORKERS COMP COORD 12 SGS05
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 4 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 4 SGS07
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS06 PCA04P WORKERS COMP COORD 1 SGS05
C036C ADMINST REV ANLST 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C050C ADMINST SUPP SUPV 2 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
X123C INS INVSTIGTR 3 GS05 IIV02P INVEST I 3 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 10 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 10 SGS04
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 3 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS06
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0320 ARKANSAS MOTOR VEHICLE COMM
N169N MTR VEH COMM DIR 1 GS10 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
X120C MTR VEH INVSTIGTR 2 GS06 IIV04P INVEST III 2 SGS06
X099C MTR VEH LICENSE SUPV 1 GS06 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0305 AR MANUFACTURED HOME COMM
X016C DLL MANU HOMES COMM D 1 GS08 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
X121C DLL MANU HOUS SPEC SU 1 GS05 IIN02P INSP II 1 SGS05
X155C DLL MANU HOUS SPEC 1 GS04 IIN02P INSP II 1 SGS05
0263 FIRE PROTECTION LICENSING BD
X138C FIRE PROTECTION LIC B 1 GS06 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
X166C FIRE PROT LIC BRD INS 1 GS03 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
0258 AR TOWING AND RECOVERY BOARD
X147C AR TOW & RECOV BD DIR 1 GS07 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
X101C INT AFFRS INVSTIGTR 1 GS06 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
180 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X170C AR TOWING & RECOVERY 1 GS03 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 1 GS02 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
0248 AR REAL ESTATE COMMISSION
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 1 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
U097U DLL AREC EXEC DIR 1 GS15 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
G054C DLL AREC DEP EXEC DIR 1 GS11 ILP04I REAL ESTATE ANLST 1 SGS06
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
C004C DLL AREC SPRVS 1 GS08 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X091C DLL AREC SR REAL ESTA 1 GS07 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 1 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
X110C DLL AREC INVSTIGTR 2 GS06 IIV03P INVEST II 2 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
X169C DLL AREC EXAM 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
0240 ST BD REG FOR PROF GEOLOGIST
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0236 STATE BD PROF ENG & PROF SURV
N132N ENG & LAND SURVYRS EX 1 GS12 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
X030C REG BD CHIEF INVSTIGT 1 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 1 SGS06
C031C ENG & LAND SURVYRS AS 1 GS07 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C045C LIC COORD 2 GS04 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 2 SGS03
0224 CONTRACTOR'S LICENSING BD
N090N DLL CONTS LICENSE ADM 1 GS13 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
X073C DLL CONTS BD INVEST 6 GS08 IIV04P INVEST III 6 SGS06
E031C ED PRGM COORD 1 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
X105C DLL CONTS LIC COORD 5 GS06 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 5 SGS03
X105C DLL CONTS LIC COORD 1 GS06 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0221 STATE BD - COLLECTION AGENCIES
X001N BD OF COLLECTION EXEC 1 GS12 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
X130C BD OF COLLECTION FLD 1 GS05 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
181 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0212 STATE BD OF BARBER EXAMINERS
X028C DLL BD OF BARBER EXAM 1 GS07 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
X159C DLL BD OF BARBER EXAM 1 GS03 IIN01P INSP I 1 SGS04
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 1 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0211 PROF BAIL BONDSMAN LICENSING
X022C DLL BAIL BOND BD EXEC 1 GS09 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
X168C DLL BAIL BOND BD INVS 1 GS04 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
0210 AUCTIONEER'S LICENSING BOARD
G159C DEPT BUS COORD 1 GS07 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
0209 STATE ATHLETIC COMMISSION
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0206 AR BD ARCHITECT LAND INT DSN
N116N DLL BD OF ARCHITECTS 1 GS12 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
C011C DLL BD OF ARCH ADMIN 1 GS07 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
0205 AR ST BD OF APR, ABSTR, HM INS
N146N DLL BD OF APPRAISER E 1 GS12 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
X185C DLL ABS BD SEC GEN 1 GS02 ILP01C L&L DIV DIR I 1 SGS07
0203 STATE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
N117N DLL BD OF ACCT EXEC D 1 GS12 ILP02C L&L DIV DIR II 1 SPC05
X021C DLL BD OF ACCT INVSTI 2 GS10 FAC07P CERT PUB ACCOUNTANT 2 SPC05
A086C BD OF ACCT FISCAL OFF 1 GS06 PAS09P LICENSING COORD 1 SGS03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
X176C DLL BD OF ACCT ADMIN 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
DEPARTMENT OF THE MILITARY
9911 DEPT OF THE MILITARY
SC011 SEC OF THE MIL 1 SE05 ESE13A SEC OF THE MILITARY 1 EXE04
U132U ARK DEP ADJUTANT GEN 1 SE03 EEX05A ASST ADJUTANT GENERAL 1 EXE03
182 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
N253N DOM COS 1 SE02 EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I 1 EXE01
L038C RN 1 MP01 MNU06P RN 1 MED05
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIS08C IT INFRA MNGR 1 IST11
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIA01C CIO I 1 IST10
D040C GIS ANLST 4 IT06 IGI01P GIS ANLST 4 IST05
D039C NET SUPP SPEC 2 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D022C SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D058C COMP OP COORD 1 IT04 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D082C NET ANLST 2 IT04 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 2 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
G319C DOM CLC 1 GS14 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
R055C DOM CHIEF OF HR 1 GS13 HDH02C HR ADMIN I 1 SPC05
A023N MIL CFO 1 GS13 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH06C HR MNGR 1 SPC04
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
A141C MIL FED BUDGET MGR 1 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
V036C AGENCY PROC ADMIN 1 GS10 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
S111C ASSET MAINT MGR 1 GS10 TFM03P FACILITY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
T125C DOM CHIEF OF POLICE 2 GS10 SLE01C POLICE CHIEF 2 LES03
R056C DOM SEN BUDGET ANLST 1 GS10 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
X013C ENVIRO HEALTH MGR 1 GS10 SCN03P ECOLOGIST SUPV/EXP 1 SPC02
M097C MIL YOUTH CHALL PRGM 1 GS10 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 1 SGS05
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 1 GS09 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
S112C ITAM COORD 1 GS09 IMS01P ITAM COORD 1 SGS08
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 SCM03P LIC CLIN SOC WORKER 1 SPC03
S113C LRAM COORD 1 GS09 IMS02P LRAM COORD 1 SGS06
R050C MIL ASST HR ADMIN 1 GS09 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
M096C MIL YOUTH CHALL PRGM 1 GS09 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 1 SGS05
X038C QA MGR 1 GS09 PQA02C QA MNGR 1 SGS09
X225C SEC SYST COORD 1 GS09 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 1 IST06
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 2 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 2 SPC02
B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST 1 GS08 SCN01I ARCHAEOLOGIST 1 SPC01
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FBU01P BUDGET ANLST 1 SGS07
183 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B024C CONSERV PRGM MGR 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
B055C ECOLOGIST COORD 1 GS08 SCN03P ECOLOGIST SUPV/EXP 1 SPC02
B055C ECOLOGIST COORD 1 GS08 SCN02P ECOLOGIST 1 SPC01
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 1 GS08 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 1 SGS05
S004C MAINT MGR 2 GS08 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 2 SGS07
P014C MUSE MGR 1 GS08 RMA10I MUSEUM COORD 1 SPC02
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 3 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 3 SPC01
B082C BIOLOGIST 2 GS07 SBI01P BIOLOGIST I 2 SPC01
B054C CAMPUS CNSTRCT COORD 1 GS07 TMA01P MAINT COORD 1 SGS05
B065C ECOLOGIST 5 GS07 SCN02P ECOLOGIST 5 SPC01
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 5 GS07 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 5 SGS05
G148C ENERGY PRGM MGR 1 GS07 IMP01P MILITARY PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
B080C FORESTER 1 GS07 PAG09P FORESTER 1 SPC01
S017C MAINT COORD 4 GS07 TMA01P MAINT COORD 4 SGS05
T043C MIL DEP FIRE CHIEF 2 GS07 SFI01C DEP FIRE CHIEF 2 SGS07
T036C MIL FACLTS SUPV 1 GS07 TCO01P CNSTRCT COORD 1 SGS07
T036C MIL FACLTS SUPV 2 GS07 TMA02C MAINT MNGR 2 SGS07
T036C MIL FACLTS SUPV 3 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
T036C MIL FACLTS SUPV 1 GS07 IFR02P FIRING RANGE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
T036C MIL FACLTS SUPV 1 GS07 TMA01P MAINT COORD 1 SGS05
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
T124C PUB SAFE POLICE OFF S 2 GS07 SLE03P POLICE OFF SUPV/EXP 2 LES02
T124C PUB SAFE POLICE OFF S 2 GS07 SLE02P POLICE OFF 2 LES01
E040C STAFF DEV COORD 2 GS07 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
T111C TRNG SUPP CENTER MGR 1 GS07 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 9 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 9 SGS05
R027C BUDGET SPEC 3 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 3 SGS05
G172C CREER PLNNG & PLAC CO 1 GS06 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 1 SGS05
E044C CERT BACHELORS TCHR 4 GS06 ETF05P TEACHER I 4 SGS06
S024C CNSTRCT/MAINT COORD 2 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
S024C CNSTRCT/MAINT COORD 3 GS06 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 3 SGS04
E037C ED PRGM SPEC 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
R030C EEO/GRIEVANCE OFF 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
T068C FIRE DESK OP 2 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
T068C FIRE DESK OP 4 GS06 IFR01P FIRING RANGE SPEC 4 SGS03
184 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R025C HR ANLST 2 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 2 SGS04
B086C LAND MNGMT SPEC 1 GS06 PEP01P CONS SPEC 1 SGS04
L069C LPN 1 GS06 MNU01P LPN 1 MED02
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 SSE03P SEC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TMA01P MAINT COORD 1 SGS05
T049C MIL FF SHIFT LEAD 11 GS06 SFI04P FIREFIGHTER SUPV/EXP 11 SGS07
B148C MIL NAT RES PROG COOR 1 GS06 SSE03P SEC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G166C MIL PRGM COORD 1 GS06 IMP02C MILITARY PRGM MNGR 1 SGS09
G166C MIL PRGM COORD 1 GS06 IMP04P MIL PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G166C MIL PRGM COORD 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G166C MIL PRGM COORD 7 GS06 IMP01P MILITARY PRGM COORD 7 SGS06
G166C MIL PRGM COORD 2 GS06 SSE03P SEC SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
T123C PUB SAFE POLICE OFF 1 GS06 SSE03P SEC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
T123C PUB SAFE POLICE OFF 12 GS06 SLE02P POLICE OFF 12 LES01
S114C RTLA COORD 1 GS06 IMS03P RTLA COORD 1 SGS03
X226C SEC SYST ANLST 1 GS06 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 3 GS06 TST03P LIC TRADES SUPV/EXP 3 SGS08
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 4 GS06 TST02P LIC TRADES 4 SGS07
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST05P SKILL TRADES SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST04P SKILL TRADES 1 SGS06
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
D074C TELECOMMS SUPV 2 GS06 SIA13P DISPATCHER SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
S021C WAT FILT/WASTE DIS PL 1 GS06 TST04P SKILL TRADES 1 SGS06
M101C YTH PRGM TRNG OFF II 5 GS06 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 5 SGS05
A088C ASSETS COORD 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS 1 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
V014C BUYER 3 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 3 SGS05
G215C CREER PLNNG & PLCMNT 4 GS05 PAS06I CREER PLACEMENT SPEC 4 SGS04
T064C CIVIL AIR PAT SVCS CO 1 GS05 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 1 SGS05
T122C DOM SEC OFF 40 GS05 SSE01P SEC GUARD 40 SGS03
B090C ENG TECH 1 GS05 TAT03I ENGINEERING SPEC 1 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 3 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 1 SGS04
R032C HR PRGM REP 1 GS05 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
185 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R032C HR PRGM REP 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 1 GS05 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
M056C MIL HOUS MGR 1 GS05 THO02P HOUSEKEEP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS02
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
S069C RADIO DISPATCH OP 12 GS05 SIA12P DISPATCHER 12 SGS05
T060C SEN MIL FF 16 GS05 SFI03P FIREFIGHTER II 16 SGS06
T060C SEN MIL FF 9 GS05 SFI02P FIREFIGHTER I 9 SGS05
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 17 GS05 TST02P LIC TRADES 17 SGS07
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 14 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 14 SGS06
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 2 GS05 TST07P TRADES SPEC 2 SGS04
S038C TRANSIT OP SUPV 1 GS05 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
V018C WRHS MGR 2 GS05 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 2 SGS05
V018C WRHS MGR 1 GS05 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 1 SGS04
S030C WAT FILT/WASTE DIS PL 1 GS05 TST02P LIC TRADES 1 SGS07
M060C YOUTH PRGM COORD 1 GS05 SSP16P SOC SVCS SPEC 1 SGS06
M102C YOUTH PRGM TRNG OFF I 28 GS05 IMP03P MILITARY PRGM SPEC 28 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 8 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 8 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 2 SGS03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 SSE01P SEC GUARD 1 SGS03
S040C CALIBRATION TECH 2 GS04 TAT02I CALIBRATION TECH 2 SGS04
S110C CUSTODIAN PROF SUPV 2 GS04 THO02P HOUSEKEEP SUPV/EXP 2 SGS02
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
V020C INVNTRY CONT MGR 1 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
S047C LANDSCAPE SUPV 1 GS04 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 1 SGS02
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 TAT06P MECHANIC 1 SGS06
S046C MAINT TECH 2 GS04 TAT05I HEAVY EQUIP OPERATOR 2 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 29 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 29 SGS03
S046C MAINT TECH 2 GS04 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 2 SGS02
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 1 SGS01
T066C MIL FF 31 GS04 SFI02P FIREFIGHTER I 31 SGS05
P048C MULTI-MEDIA SPEC 4 GS04 CME05P MEDIA TECH 4 SGS04
X152C REAL PROP MNGMT SPEC 3 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 3 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 4 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
S109C CUSTODIAN PROF 27 GS03 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 27 SGS01
C070C DUPLICATION ASST 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
186 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
V027C INVNTRY CONT TECH 1 GS03 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
S050C MAINT SPEC 4 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 4 SGS03
S050C MAINT SPEC 1 GS03 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 1 SGS02
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 1 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S060C HEAVY EQUIP OP 7 GS02 TAT05I HEAVY EQUIP OPERATOR 7 SGS04
S060C HEAVY EQUIP OP 1 GS02 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 1 SGS01
S084C INST SVCS SUPV 1 GS02 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S087C INST SVCS ASST 2 GS01 THO01P HOUSEKEEP 2 SGS01
S065C MAINT ASST 4 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 4 SGS03
DEPARTMENT OF PARKS, HERITAGE, & TOURISM
9912 DEPT OF PARKS HERITAGE & TOUR
SC012 SEC OF PARKS, HERI & 1 SE05 ESE11A SEC OF PH&T 1 EXE04
U016U ADPHT DIR PARKS REC & 1 SE03 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
U018U ADPHT HERI DIV DIR 1 SE02 EEX26A PARKS DEP DIR 1 SPC10
N213N ADPHT CFO 1 SE01 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
U020U ADPHT HERI DIV ASST D 1 SE01 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
N250N ADPHT CIO 1 IT10 IIA02C CIO II 1 IST12
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D017C INFO SYST SEC SPEC 1 IT07 IIE06P IT SEC SUPV 1 IST08
D029C SEN GIS ANLST 1 IT07 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
D040C GIS ANLST 1 IT06 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IGI01P GIS ANLST 1 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IDM03P DB SPEC 1 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 2 IST04
D062C DB ANLST 1 IT04 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 2 IT04 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D064C WEBSITE DEV 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 2 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
G275C ADPHT ADMIN MGR 1 GS13 RPA02C ASST PARK DIR 1 SPC07
G275C ADPHT ADMIN MGR 1 GS13 RPA07C OUTDOOR REC DIR 1 SGS12
G018C ADPHT PARKS ADMIN MGR 1 GS13 CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMS II 1 SPC07
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 EEX51A TOUR DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH02C HR ADMIN I 1 SPC05
187 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R006C HR ADMIN 1 GS12 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 FAC06C ASST CONTROLLER 1 SPC05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 CPR06C PUB INFO MNGR 1 SGS09
V036C AGENCY PROC ADMIN 1 GS10 PPR03C PROC MNGR 1 SGS10
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 3 GS09 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 3 SPC04
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR06C PUB INFO MNGR 1 SGS09
P004C PUB INFO MGR 2 GS09 CPR08P PUB INFO SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
R021C BUDGET ANLST 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 1 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
S004C MAINT MGR 1 GS08 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 1 SGS07
V004C PROC MGR 1 GS08 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
P015C ADPHT MGR OF HIST PRO 1 GS07 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
G155C ADPHT PRGM MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
P020C PROD ARTIST 1 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
P020C PROD ARTIST 1 GS07 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
R025C HR ANLST 6 GS06 HDH04P HR ANLST 6 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 4 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 4 SGS06
P019C TRAVEL INFO WRITER 4 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 4 SGS06
C036C ADMINST REV ANLST 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C022C BUS OP SPEC 3 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
V014C BUYER 3 GS05 PPR02P PROC COORD 3 SGS07
V013C CENTRAL WRHS OP MGR 1 GS05 TIW04P INVENTORY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 7 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 7 SGS04
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
V015C PURCHASING SPEC 1 GS05 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 12 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 12 SGS04
R036C HR SPEC 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C083C MAIL SVCS COORD 2 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
188 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
P048C MULTI-MEDIA SPEC 1 GS04 CME05P MEDIA TECH 1 SGS04
V022C PURCHASING TECH 1 GS04 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
P045C PUB INFO TECH 1 GS03 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
V028C WRHS WRKR 1 GS02 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
S065C MAINT ASST 1 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
0900 DEPT OF PARKS AND TOURISM
U068U ADPHT PARKS DIV DIR 1 SE01 EEX27A PH&T DIV DIR 1 EXE01
U067U ADPHT TOUR DIV DIR 1 SE01 EEX27A PH&T DIV DIR 1 EXE01
N223N ADPHT PARKS DIV DEP D 1 GS14 EEX26A PARKS DEP DIR 1 SPC10
S001C ADPHT PARKS OP MGR 1 GS12 RPA08C PARK ADMIN 1 SGS12
G037C ADPHT PARKS PLNNG & D 1 GS12 RPA08C PARK ADMIN 1 SGS12
B015C ENG SUPV 1 GS12 SEN02P ENGINEER SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
B020C ADPHT REGNL PARK SUPV 5 GS11 RPA09C PARK AREA MNGR 5 SGS11
B023C ENG, P.E. 1 GS11 RPA13C PARK MNGR 1 SGS11
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 RPA25P PH&T PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A036C ADPHT REV OP MGR 1 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
T116C EMER SVCS MGR 1 GS10 SPL01C PARK LT COLONEL 1 LES07
B027C PARK SUPER V 5 GS10 RPA20C PARK SUPER IV 5 SGS10
G078C ADPHT PRGM SVCS ADMIN 1 GS09 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
C100C ADPHT RES PROJ COORD 1 GS09 RPA25P PH&T PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
B042C ENG 1 GS09 SEN01P ENGINEER 1 SPC03
G167C KEEP AR BEAUTIFUL DIR 1 GS09 RPA25P PH&T PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
B021C LIC ARCHITECT 1 GS09 SAS01I ARCHITECT 1 SPC03
G095C LODGE MGR 3 GS09 RPA04C LODGE MNGR 3 SGS09
B031C PARK SUPER IV 1 GS09 RPA20C PARK SUPER IV 1 SGS10
B031C PARK SUPER IV 13 GS09 RPA19C PARK SUPER III 13 SGS09
T042C ADPHT CHIEF RANGER 1 GS08 SPL02C PARK MAJOR 1 LES06
G105C ADPHT DEV MGR 2 GS08 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 2 SGS06
C101C ADPHT WELC CENTER ADM 1 GS08 RTO02C WELC CENTER MNGR 1 SGS06
B032C CHIEF PARK PLANNER 1 GS08 RPA15P PARK PLANNER SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
P010C EXHIBITS COORD 1 GS08 RPA25P PH&T PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
S003C FOOD & BEVERAGE DIR 2 GS08 RRE01C FOOD & BEVERAGE MNGR 2 SGS06
S004C MAINT MGR 1 GS08 TCO04P CNSTRCT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
S004C MAINT MGR 2 GS08 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 2 SGS07
G079C OUTDOOR REC GRANTS PR 1 GS08 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
189 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B048C PARK SUPER III 7 GS08 RPA19C PARK SUPER III 7 SGS09
B048C PARK SUPER III 17 GS08 RPA18C PARK SUPER II 17 SGS08
G165C ADPHT SPCLITY OP MGR 1 GS07 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
G165C ADPHT SPCLITY OP MGR 2 GS07 RPA10P PARK COORD 2 SGS05
S015C ASST LODGE MGR 3 GS07 RPA01C ASST LODGE MNGR 3 SGS07
P016C CURATOR 4 GS07 RMA03I CURATOR 4 SPC01
S017C MAINT COORD 1 GS07 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
S017C MAINT COORD 3 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
P030C MUSE EXHB PRGM SPEC 2 GS07 RMA04P EXHIBIT COORD 2 SGS05
B075C PARK PLANNER 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
B075C PARK PLANNER 6 GS07 RPA14P PARK PLANNER 6 SGS06
B071C PARK SUPER II 2 GS07 RPA19C PARK SUPER III 2 SGS09
B071C PARK SUPER II 19 GS07 RPA18C PARK SUPER II 19 SGS08
B071C PARK SUPER II 6 GS07 RPA17C PARK SUPER I 6 SGS06
B071C PARK SUPER II 3 GS07 SPL04C PARK SERGEANT 3 LES04
P020C PROD ARTIST 2 GS07 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 2 SGS07
P068C RADIO PRODUCER 1 GS07 CME06P PRODUCER 1 SGS07
X077C REAL ESTATE OFF 1 GS07 ILP04I REAL ESTATE ANLST 1 SGS06
C003C STAD COMM MRKTNG/EVEN 1 GS07 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
P025C SUPV OF INTERP PRGMS 1 GS07 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
G176C VOL PRGM MGR 1 GS07 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
P034C ADPHT CONS 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
P034C ADPHT CONS 1 GS06 CMA01P MRKTNG COORD 1 SGS05
P041C COMM GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GS06 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
P049C GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 GS06 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
P040C HISTAL RSRCHER 1 GS06 RMA02P ARCHIVIST 1 SGS06
G206C LODGE SALES DIR 1 GS06 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
G206C LODGE SALES DIR 5 GS06 RPA05P LODGE SALES COORD 5 SGS05
S033C MAINT SUPV 9 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 9 SGS06
P028C PARK INTERP II 13 GS06 RPA23P PH&T INTERPRETER II 13 SGS05
G205C PARK PRGM SPEC 4 GS06 RPA10P PARK COORD 4 SGS05
T056C PARK RANGER II 20 GS06 SPL03P PARK RNGR 20 LES03
B085C PARK SUPER I 2 GS06 RPA18C PARK SUPER II 2 SGS08
B085C PARK SUPER I 7 GS06 RPA17C PARK SUPER I 7 SGS06
190 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
B085C PARK SUPER I 3 GS06 RPA21P PARK SUPER TRAINEE 3 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 CMA01P MRKTNG COORD 1 SGS05
S014C RESTAURANT MGR 4 GS06 TFS04C FOOD SVCS SUPV/EXP 4 SGS05
S014C RESTAURANT MGR 1 GS06 RRE02P RESTAURANT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS04
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 3 GS06 TST02P LIC TRADES 3 SGS07
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 3 GS06 TST04P SKILL TRADES 3 SGS06
C036C ADMINST REV ANLST 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C096C ADPHT OFF MGR III 4 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 4 SGS05
C096C ADPHT OFF MGR III 3 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 3 SGS04
C027C ADPHT WELC CENTER MGR 7 GS05 RTO03P WELC CENTER SUPV/EXP 7 SGS04
S048C ASST RESTAURANT MGR 5 GS05 RRE02P RESTAURANT SUPV/EXP 5 SGS04
X129C CNSTRCT INSPCT 3 GS05 IIN01P INSP I 3 SGS04
B090C ENG TECH 1 GS05 TAT03I ENGINEERING SPEC 1 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C047C FRONT DESK SUPV 1 GS05 RPA10P PARK COORD 1 SGS05
C047C FRONT DESK SUPV 2 GS05 RPA06P LODGE SUPV/EXP 2 SGS03
S049C LODGE HOUSEKEEPING SU 4 GS05 RPA12P PARK HOUSEKEEP SUPV/E 4 SGS03
P035C PARK INTERP 29 GS05 RPA23P PH&T INTERPRETER II 29 SGS05
T063C PARK RANGER 5 GS05 SPL03P PARK RNGR 5 LES03
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 15 GS05 TST04P SKILL TRADES 15 SGS06
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 1 GS05 TMA01P MAINT COORD 1 SGS05
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 3 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 3 SGS04
C008C STAD COMM OFF MGR 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 8 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 8 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 TST07P TRADES SPEC 1 SGS04
S104C ADPHT HOUSEKEEP SUPV 8 GS04 RPA12P PARK HOUSEKEEP SUPV/E 8 SGS03
S104C ADPHT HOUSEKEEP SUPV 3 GS04 RPA11P PARK HOUSEKEEP 3 SGS02
C039C ADPHT OFF MGR II 2 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
C039C ADPHT OFF MGR II 39 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 39 SGS04
C091C ADPHT WELC CENTER MGR 7 GS04 RTO03P WELC CENTER SUPV/EXP 7 SGS04
T079C FCLTY MGR II 14 GS04 TFM03P FACILITY SUPV/EXP 14 SGS05
T079C FCLTY MGR II 3 GS04 TFM01P FACILITY COORD 3 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A102C FISCAL SUPP TECH 7 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 7 SGS04
191 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A102C FISCAL SUPP TECH 1 GS04 RPA16P PARK SPEC 1 SGS02
S044C FOOD PREP MGR 1 GS04 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 1 SGS03
S052C HEAVY EQUIP SPEC 3 GS04 TAT05I HEAVY EQUIP OPERATOR 3 SGS04
R036C HR SPEC 3 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 3 SGS04
S047C LANDSCAPE SUPV 2 GS04 TMA01P MAINT COORD 2 SGS05
S046C MAINT TECH 8 GS04 TMA01P MAINT COORD 8 SGS05
S046C MAINT TECH 2 GS04 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 2 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 30 GS04 TST07P TRADES SPEC 30 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 14 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 14 SGS03
S046C MAINT TECH 3 GS04 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 3 SGS02
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 1 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 10 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 10 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 RPA16P PARK SPEC 1 SGS02
S103C ADPHT HOUSEKEEPER 1 GS03 RPA12P PARK HOUSEKEEP SUPV/E 1 SGS03
S103C ADPHT HOUSEKEEPER 14 GS03 RPA11P PARK HOUSEKEEP 14 SGS02
C067C ADPHT WELC CENTER ASS 13 GS03 RTO01P TRAVEL CONS 13 SGS02
P054C ASST LODGE SALES DIR 3 GS03 RPA05P LODGE SALES COORD 3 SGS05
S058C EQUIP MECH 1 GS03 TAT06P MECHANIC 1 SGS06
T085C FCLTY MGR I 1 GS03 TFM03P FACILITY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
T085C FCLTY MGR I 25 GS03 TFM01P FACILITY COORD 25 SGS04
T085C FCLTY MGR I 1 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S056C FOOD PREP SUPV 1 GS03 RPA11P PARK HOUSEKEEP 1 SGS02
S057C LANDSCAPE SPEC 5 GS03 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 5 SGS02
S059C LODGE COOK 18 GS03 TFS01P COOK 18 SGS01
S050C MAINT SPEC 1 GS03 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
S050C MAINT SPEC 6 GS03 TST07P TRADES SPEC 6 SGS04
S050C MAINT SPEC 46 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 46 SGS03
P056C MUSE PRGM ASST II 2 GS03 RMA11P MUSEUM SPEC 2 SGS02
S054C PRINTER 1 GS03 TAT08P PRINTER 1 SGS04
C068C RETL SPEC 5 GS03 RPA16P PARK SPEC 5 SGS02
T087C SEC OFF 1 GS03 SSE01P SEC GUARD 1 SGS03
C086C DESK CLERK 25 GS02 RPA16P PARK SPEC 25 SGS02
S068C FOOD PREP COORD 2 GS02 TFS01P COOK 2 SGS01
S085C FOOD PREP SPEC 1 GS02 TFS01P COOK 1 SGS01
S066C LANDSCAPE TECH 1 GS02 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
192 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
S066C LANDSCAPE TECH 4 GS02 TGR01P LANDSCAPE COORD 4 SGS02
P064C MUSE PRGM ASST I 4 GS02 RMA11P MUSEUM SPEC 4 SGS02
P055C SPCL EVENTS SUPV 1 GS02 RPA16P PARK SPEC 1 SGS02
P061C TRAVEL CONS 19 GS02 RTO01P TRAVEL CONS 19 SGS02
S089C FOOD PREP TECH 1 GS01 TFS01P COOK 1 SGS01
S065C MAINT ASST 29 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 29 SGS03
S090C WAITRESS/WAITER 12 GS01 RRE03P SERVER 12 SGS01
0870 DAH - ARKANSAS ARTS COUNCIL
G214C GRANTS SPEC 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0865 DAH - CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION
U020U ADPHT HERI DIV ASST D 1 SE01 EEX27A PH&T DIV DIR 1 EXE01
P081C ADPHT MUSE & HERI SRV 1 GS13 RMA05C HERI DEP DIR 1 SPC05
P003C ADPHT AGENCY DIR 2 GS11 RMA07C HERI MNGR II 2 SPC04
P003C ADPHT AGENCY DIR 6 GS11 RMA06C HERI MNGR I 6 SPC03
P006C ADPHT AGENCY ASST DIR 4 GS09 RPA25P PH&T PRGM SUPV/EXP 4 SGS08
B045C BIOLOGIST SUPV 2 GS09 SBI02P BIOLOGIST II 2 SPC02
B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST 1 GS08 SCN01I ARCHAEOLOGIST 1 SPC01
B067C ARCHAEOLOGIST 1 GS08 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
P014C MUSE MGR 1 GS08 RMA10I MUSEUM COORD 1 SPC02
P015C ADPHT MGR OF HIST PRO 4 GS07 RMA09P HISTORIC PROP COORD 4 SGS05
G155C ADPHT PRGM MGR 5 GS07 RPA25P PH&T PRGM SUPV/EXP 5 SGS08
G155C ADPHT PRGM MGR 2 GS07 RMA12P MUSEUM SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
G155C ADPHT PRGM MGR 6 GS07 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 6 SGS06
G155C ADPHT PRGM MGR 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
P018C ARCHIVAL MGR 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
P018C ARCHIVAL MGR 4 GS07 RMA02P ARCHIVIST 4 SGS06
P018C ARCHIVAL MGR 1 GS07 RMA12P MUSEUM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
P018C ARCHIVAL MGR 1 GS07 RPA14P PARK PLANNER 1 SGS06
B066C BIOLOGIST SPEC 4 GS07 SBI01P BIOLOGIST I 4 SPC01
P016C CURATOR 4 GS07 RMA12P MUSEUM SUPV/EXP 4 SGS06
P038C HISTORIAN 4 GS07 RMA08P HISTORIAN 4 SGS05
G186C ADPHT PRGM COORD 16 GS06 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 16 SGS06
P024C ARCHIVIST 3 GS06 RMA01P ARCHIVAL ASST 3 SGS03
G171C COORD OF AFRICAN AMER 1 GS06 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
B086C LAND MNGMT SPEC 3 GS06 PEP01P CONS SPEC 3 SGS04
193 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
E052C LIBRN 1 GS06 ELI01P LIBRARIAN 1 SGS06
P037C MUSE INTERP SPEC 1 GS06 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
P037C MUSE INTERP SPEC 1 GS06 RMA04P EXHIBIT COORD 1 SGS05
P037C MUSE INTERP SPEC 2 GS06 RPA23P PH&T INTERPRETER II 2 SGS05
P029C MUSE PRGMS SPEC 1 GS06 RPA23P PH&T INTERPRETER II 1 SGS05
P047C MUSE REGISTRAR 2 GS06 RMA04P EXHIBIT COORD 2 SGS05
P036C MUSE STORE MGR 3 GS06 RPA03P GIFT SHOP SUPV/EXP 3 SGS05
P036C MUSE STORE MGR 1 GS06 RMA08P HISTORIAN 1 SGS05
G204C PLNNG SPEC 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G202C VOL PRGM COORD 1 GS06 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
C036C ADMINST REV ANLST 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 8 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 8 SGS04
P043C ARCHIVAL ASST 12 GS04 RMA01P ARCHIVAL ASST 12 SGS03
S046C MAINT TECH 3 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 3 SGS03
T072C SEC OFF SUPV 1 GS04 SSE01P SEC GUARD 1 SGS03
S050C MAINT SPEC 1 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
P056C MUSE PRGM ASST II 5 GS03 RMA11P MUSEUM SPEC 5 SGS02
S065C MAINT ASST 4 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 4 SGS03
T091C WATCHMAN 2 GS01 SSE01P SEC GUARD 2 SGS03
0315 CAPITOL ZONING COMMISSION
G155C ADPHT PRGM MGR 1 GS07 RPA24P PH&T PRGM COORD 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
X106C ADPHT CZDC PLNNG/PRES 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
9913 DEPT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
SC013 SEC OF PUB SAFE 1 SE05 ESE12A SEC OF PUB SAFETY 1 EXE04
D145C DPS COS 1 SE02 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
D103C DPS CIO 1 IT11 IIA02C CIO II 1 IST12
D003C STATE SYST ADMIN LEAD 1 IT09 IIS01P IT COORD 1 IST08
D012C DB SPEC 1 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D123C DB ADMIN 1 IT08 IIA06C IT MNGR 1 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D035C COMP SUPP MGR 1 IT07 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D034C DB ADMIN 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
194 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D030C INFO SYST COORD 2 IT07 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D017C INFO SYST SEC SPEC 1 IT07 IIS01P IT COORD 1 IST08
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IIE03P IT SEC ANLST II 1 IST07
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D025C STATE IT SEC SPEC 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 3 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 3 IST04
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 1 SGS04
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 7 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 7 IST02
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 2 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
D089C INFO TECH ASST 5 IT01 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 5 IST02
A139C CFO 1 GS15 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
G316C DPS GEN COUNSEL 1 GS15 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
G031N ASP GEN COUNSEL 1 GS14 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
B150C DPS RSRCH AND PLNNG D 1 GS14 PRQ01C RESEARCH AND PLAN DIR 1 SPC06
P002N ADH DIR OF COMMS 1 GS13 CPR02C CHIEF OF COMMS II 1 SPC07
A140C DPS CFO 1 GS13 HDH03C HR ADMIN II 1 SPC08
A011N DPS FISCAL OFF 1 GS13 FFS01C FISC SPPRT ADMIN 1 SGS10
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
A031C ASST CONT 2 GS11 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
G047C ATRNY SPEC 3 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 3 SPC05
N229N DPS CRIME VIC ADMIN 1 GS11 SIA23P PUB SAFETY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
E079C DPS SPCL PROJS COORD 1 GS11 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G156C DPS PRGM MGR 1 GS10 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A050C AGENCY FISCAL MGR 1 GS09 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
C113C DPS EXEC ASST 1 GS08 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
B053C FORENSIC SCIENTIST 1 GS08 SFO03P FORENSIC SCI 1 SPC03
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 2 GS08 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
195 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
V004C PROC MGR 3 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 3 SGS07
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X220C CVRB SEN ELGBLTY SPEC 5 GS07 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 5 SGS05
B052C FORENSIC SPEC 1 GS07 SFO03P FORENSIC SCI 1 SPC03
G147C GRANTS COORD 1 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
R022C BENE COORD 1 GS06 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 2 GS06 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 3 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 5 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 5 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 2 SGS04
R032C HR PRGM REP 3 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 3 SGS04
A090C PYRLL SVCS SPEC 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
A101C ACCNTNG TECH 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 6 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 6 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0995 DEPT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT
U013U ADEM DIR 1 SE01 EEX18A EMER MNGMNT DIR 1 EXE01
D043C ADEM INFO TECH DIV DI 1 IT08 IIA06C IT MNGR 1 IST10
D014C STATE SYST ADMIN 1 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D122C IT PROJ MGR 1 IT07 IIS01P IT COORD 1 IST08
D016C SEN TECH ANLST 1 IT06 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 2 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 2 IT04 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D065C NET SUPP ANLST 1 IT04 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D084C COMP OP 1 IT02 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
G350C ADEM SEN DEP DIR 1 GS13 SPS05C PUB SAFETY DEP DIR 1 SPC06
G055C ADEM DEP DIR 2 GS12 SPS05C PUB SAFETY DEP DIR 2 SPC06
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
X224C STATE FIRE MARSHALL 1 GS12 SFI05C STATE FIRE MARSHALL 1 SGS09
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G109C GRANTS MGR 2 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 2 SGS07
196 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
B021C LIC ARCHITECT 1 GS09 SAS01I ARCHITECT 1 SPC03
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
G140C ADEM PRGM MGR 6 GS08 SEM04P EMER MNGMNT SUPV/EXP 6 SGS08
G140C ADEM PRGM MGR 1 GS08 SEM01P EMER MNGMNT COORD 1 SGS06
G140C ADEM PRGM MGR 1 GS08 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 1 SGS05
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 2 GS08 SEM01P EMER MNGMNT COORD 2 SGS06
V002C FED SURP PROP MGR 1 GS08 FFS03C FISC SPPRT MNGR 1 SGS09
V002C FED SURP PROP MGR 1 GS08 TIW07P SURPLUS PROP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
V004C PROC MGR 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
G157C ADEM AREA COORD 7 GS07 SEM01P EMER MNGMNT COORD 7 SGS06
X227C ADEM FIRE MARSHALL IN 2 GS07 IIN02P INSP II 2 SGS05
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
A075C FINAN ANLST I 1 GS07 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
G147C GRANTS COORD 6 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 6 SGS05
A063C RSRCH & STATS SUPV 1 GS07 TIW07P SURPLUS PROP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G175C ADEM PRGM COORD 1 GS06 SEM01P EMER MNGMNT COORD 1 SGS06
G175C ADEM PRGM COORD 7 GS06 SEM03P EMER MNGMNT SPEC 7 SGS05
C120C ADEM SEN EMER MGMT DU 8 GS06 SEM05P EMER MNGMNT WATCH OFF 8 SGS03
R027C BUDGET SPEC 1 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 1 SGS05
S024C CNSTRCT/MAINT COORD 1 GS06 TCO01P CNSTRCT COORD 1 SGS07
G208C EMER PLANNER 5 GS06 SEM03P EMER MNGMNT SPEC 5 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 SEM01P EMER MNGMNT COORD 1 SGS06
G180C GRANTS ANLST 1 GS06 SEM03P EMER MNGMNT SPEC 1 SGS05
G180C GRANTS ANLST 2 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 2 SGS04
G214C GRANTS SPEC 1 GS06 FGM04P GRANTS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
G204C PLNNG SPEC 1 GS06 SEM01P EMER MNGMNT COORD 1 SGS06
G204C PLNNG SPEC 1 GS06 FGM01P GRANTS ANLST 1 SGS04
T061C SEN IA 1 GS06 SIA10P CRIM INTEL ANLST 1 SGS06
D074C TELECOMMS SUPV 1 GS06 SEM04P EMER MNGMNT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
E046C TRNG INSTRUCTOR 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
C038C ADEM EMER MNGMT DUTY 1 GS05 SEM05P EMER MNGMNT WATCH OFF 1 SGS03
S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS 2 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 2 SGS04
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
197 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 TIW06P SURPLUS PROP AGENT 1 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 TIW01P INVENTORY COORD 1 SGS04
S034C INTERSTATE TRUCK DRIV 3 GS05 TAT11I TRUCK DRIVER 3 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 5 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 5 SGS04
T079C FCLTY MGR II 1 GS04 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 1 SGS07
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 3 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
V021C SURP PROP AGENT 3 GS04 TIW06P SURPLUS PROP AGENT 3 SGS05
V019C SURP PROP SPEC 1 GS04 TIW06P SURPLUS PROP AGENT 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S050C MAINT SPEC 1 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
0990 AR CRIME INFORMATION CENTER
U069U ACIC DIR 1 SE01 EEX15A CRIME INFO DIR 1 EXE01
G052C DPS DIV MGR 2 GS11 SPS05C PUB SAFETY DEP DIR 2 SPC06
G158C ACIC PRGM MGR 2 GS07 SIA23P PUB SAFETY SUPV/EXP 2 SGS08
G158C ACIC PRGM MGR 3 GS07 SIA22P PUB SAFETY COORD 3 SGS06
G158C ACIC PRGM MGR 1 GS07 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
X095C QA ANLST 1 GS07 SIA18P INFO SEC OFF 1 SGS04
D073C ACIC FLD AGENT 8 GS06 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 8 IST02
G192C ACIC PRGM ANLST 5 GS06 SIA22P PUB SAFETY COORD 5 SGS06
G192C ACIC PRGM ANLST 3 GS06 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
X189C AFIS TECH 4 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 21 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 21 SGS02
0960 DEPT OF ARKANSAS STATE POLICE
U064U DIR STATE POLICE 1 SE04 EEX04A ASP COLONEL 1 EXE01
N057N ASP DEP DIR/LT. COLON 2 SE02 SPO04C ASP LT COLONEL 2 LES12
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 3 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 3 IST02
T001C ASP MAJOR 5 GS14 SPO05C ASP MAJOR 5 LES11
T001C ASP MAJOR 1 GS14 SPO01C ASP CAPTAIN 1 LES10
T003C ASP CAPTAIN 17 GS13 SPO01C ASP CAPTAIN 17 LES10
T003C ASP CAPTAIN 3 GS13 SPO03C ASP LT 3 LES09
198 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
T003C ASP CAPTAIN 1 GS13 SPO06C ASP SERGEANT 1 LES08
T007C ASP LIEUTENANT 27 GS12 SPO03C ASP LT 27 LES09
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 SPO03C ASP LT 1 LES09
T011C ASP SERGEANT 73 GS11 SPO06C ASP SERGEANT 73 LES08
T009C ASP SPCL OP ADMIN 1 GS11 SFO05P FORENSIC SUPV/EXP 1 SPC05
T009C ASP SPCL OP ADMIN 1 GS11 SPS06C PUB SAFETY PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
X011C ASP/CACD INVSTIGTR AD 1 GS11 SIA07C CA PRGM ADMIN 1 SGS09
E079C DPS SPCL PROJS COORD 1 GS11 SCM05P LIC PROF COUNSELOR 1 SPC03
C002C HIGHWAY SAFE OFF ADMI 1 GS11 SPS06C PUB SAFETY PRGM MNGR 1 SPC05
P067C ASP PUB INFO OFF 1 GS10 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
T024C ASP/CACD HOTLINE ADMI 1 GS10 SIA07C CA PRGM ADMIN 1 SGS09
G156C DPS PRGM MGR 1 GS10 SIA23P PUB SAFETY SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
C109C ASP CACD AREA MGR 11 GS09 SIA05P CA INVEST SUPV/EXP 11 SGS07
T022C ASP CORPORAL 279 GS09 SPO02P ASP CORPORAL 279 LES07
T022C ASP CORPORAL 86 GS09 SPO08P ASP TROOPER 1ST CLASS 86 LES06
T022C ASP CORPORAL 166 GS09 SPO07P ASP TROOPER 166 LES05
S005C AVIATION MGR 1 GS09 PAV01P AVIATION MNGR 1 SPC07
R019C BUDGET MGR 1 GS09 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C110C DPS FLEET ADMIN 3 GS09 TAT04P FLEET COORD 3 SGS09
G109C GRANTS MGR 1 GS09 FGM03C GRANTS MNGR 1 SGS07
G086C DPS PRGM COORD 2 GS08 SIA22P PUB SAFETY COORD 2 SGS06
S004C MAINT MGR 1 GS08 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 1 SGS07
S004C MAINT MGR 1 GS08 TAT07P MECHANIC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
M018C PRGM ELGBLTY COORD II 1 GS08 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
X108C ASP DL/CDL COORD 1 GS07 SIA14P DL COORD 1 SGS06
X108C ASP DL/CDL COORD 1 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
X108C ASP DL/CDL COORD 3 GS07 SIA16P DL SUPV/EXP 3 SGS05
X090C ASP/CACD SEN INVEST 73 GS07 SIA06P CHILD ABUSE INVEST 73 SGS06
S115C AUTO BODY REPAIR TECH 1 GS07 TAT06P MECHANIC 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
G147C GRANTS COORD 3 GS07 FGM02P GRANTS COORD 3 SGS05
T044C IA SUPV 1 GS07 SIA11P CRIM INTEL SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
S017C MAINT COORD 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CPR08P PUB INFO SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
199 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X095C QA ANLST 1 GS07 SIA22P PUB SAFETY COORD 1 SGS06
X095C QA ANLST 1 GS07 PQA03P QA SPEC 1 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PPE04P PROG ELIG SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 6 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 6 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C037C ADMINST ANLST 3 GS06 PAS10P LICENSING SPEC 3 SGS02
X219C ASP DL EXAM SUPV 2 GS06 SIA16P DL SUPV/EXP 2 SGS05
T046C ASP/CACD HOTLINE SUPV 5 GS06 SIA08P CA PRGM SUPV/EXP 5 SGS05
S020C AVIATION TECH 1 GS06 SIA13P DISPATCHER SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
S024C CNSTRCT/MAINT COORD 3 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS06
G191C HWY SAFE PRGM SPEC 3 GS06 SIA22P PUB SAFETY COORD 3 SGS06
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
T061C SEN IA 4 GS06 SIA10P CRIM INTEL ANLST 4 SGS06
D074C TELECOMMS SUPV 12 GS06 SIA13P DISPATCHER SUPV/EXP 12 SGS06
D074C TELECOMMS SUPV 1 GS06 SIA12P DISPATCHER 1 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 PAS10P LICENSING SPEC 1 SGS02
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 1 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 1 GS05 SIA12P DISPATCHER 1 SGS05
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 1 GS05 PPE02P PROG ELIG SPEC I 1 SGS05
C054C LO ADMINST SPEC 20 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 20 SGS04
D081C TELECOMMS SPEC 71 GS05 SIA12P DISPATCHER 71 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 7 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 7 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS10P LICENSING SPEC 1 SGS02
X189C AFIS TECH 1 GS04 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
X189C AFIS TECH 7 GS04 SIA17P FINGERPRINT TECH 7 SGS04
T102C ASP CACD SR. HOTLINE 35 GS04 SIA04P CA HOTLINE REP 35 SGS04
X179C ASP COMM DL EXAM 13 GS04 SIA01P CDL EXAM 13 SGS06
X179C ASP COMM DL EXAM 6 GS04 SIA15P DL EXAM 6 SGS04
X182C ASP DRIVERS LICENSE E 39 GS04 SIA15P DL EXAM 39 SGS04
X160C ASP USED MTR VEH INSP 1 GS04 SIA01P CDL EXAM 1 SGS06
X160C ASP USED MTR VEH INSP 1 GS04 IIN02P INSP II 1 SGS05
X160C ASP USED MTR VEH INSP 6 GS04 IIV03P INVEST II 6 SGS05
S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECH 1 GS04 TAT06P MECHANIC 1 SGS06
S044C FOOD PREP MGR 1 GS04 TFS04C FOOD SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
200 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R036C HR SPEC 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C043C REC MNGMT ANLST 3 GS04 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 3 GS03 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 3 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 4 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 4 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 14 GS03 PAS10P LICENSING SPEC 14 SGS02
X161C ASP INVSTIGTR SPEC 1 GS03 IIV02P INVEST I 1 SGS04
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 3 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 7 GS02 PAS10P LICENSING SPEC 7 SGS02
C080C CRED ASST 1 GS02 PAS10P LICENSING SPEC 1 SGS02
X178C FINGERPRINT TECH 2 GS02 SIA17P FINGERPRINT TECH 2 SGS04
0955 STATE CRIME LABORATORY
U094U CRIME LAB EXEC DIR 1 SE02 SPS05C PUB SAFETY DEP DIR 1 SPC06
L001N CRIME LAB DIR MED EXA 1 MP10 SFO01C CHIEF MED EXAM 1 MED16
L004N CRIME LAB ASSOC MED E 1 MP09 MPH01C DEP MED EXAM 1 MED15
L004N CRIME LAB ASSOC MED E 7 MP09 SFO02C CRIME LAB MED EXAM 7 MED14
U093U CRIME LAB ASST DIR 1 GS13 SPS05C PUB SAFETY DEP DIR 1 SPC06
B019C FORENSIC ADMIN 15 GS11 SFO05P FORENSIC SUPV/EXP 15 SPC05
B053C FORENSIC SCIENTIST 87 GS08 SFO03P FORENSIC SCI 87 SPC03
B053C FORENSIC SCIENTIST 2 GS08 SFO06P FORENSIC TECH 2 SGS05
B137C CRIME LAB PRGM COORD 2 GS07 SFO04P FORENSIC SPEC 2 SPC01
B073C FORENSIC TECH SUPV 2 GS06 SLA03P LAB SUPV/EXP 2 SPC03
B073C FORENSIC TECH SUPV 1 GS06 SLA06P LAB TECH III 1 SGS08
B073C FORENSIC TECH SUPV 1 GS06 SFO06P FORENSIC TECH 1 SGS05
B094C FORENSIC TECH 33 GS05 SFO06P FORENSIC TECH 33 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 3 GS04 SFO06P FORENSIC TECH 3 SGS05
B111C LAB TECH 3 GS04 SFO06P FORENSIC TECH 3 SGS05
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 SFO06P FORENSIC TECH 2 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
0950 LAW ENFORCEMENT STANDARDS/TRNG
N252N CLEST DIR 1 SE01 SPS01C CLEST DIR 1 LES11
T128C CLEST DEP DIR 2 GS13 SPS05C PUB SAFETY DEP DIR 2 SPC06
T025C CLEST SUPV 4 GS10 SPS04P LAW ENFORCE TRNG SUPV 4 LES06
T029C CLEST SEN AGENT 11 GS09 SPS07P SR LAW ENFRCMNT TRNG 11 LES05
T029C CLEST SEN AGENT 4 GS09 SPS03P LAW ENFRCMNT TRNG OFF 4 LES04
G301C DPS LESO PRGM COORD 1 GS09 SIA22P PUB SAFETY COORD 1 SGS06
201 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X026C CRIM DET FACLTS COORD 1 GS08 SIA09P CRIM DET FACLTS COORD 1 SGS09
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 2 GS08 CTR02P TRAINER 2 SGS07
T100C ASP TROOPER 1 GS07 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 1 GS07 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 1 SGS06
S033C MAINT SUPV 1 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 6 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 6 SGS04
S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECH 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S044C FOOD PREP MGR 1 GS04 TFS04C FOOD SVCS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 6 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 6 SGS02
S056C FOOD PREP SUPV 2 GS03 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 2 SGS03
T084C PUB SAFE SEC OFF 5 GS03 SSE01P SEC GUARD 5 SGS03
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSFORMATION & SHARED SERVICES
9914 DEPT OF TRANSFORM & SHARED SVC
SC014 SEC OF TSS 1 SE05 ESE14A SEC OF TSS 1 EXE04
U061U TSS COS 1 SE03 EEX10A CHIEF OF STAFF II 1 EXE02
N036N TSS EBD DIR 1 SE02 EEX45A STATE EMP BENE DIR 1 EXE02
N032N TSS OPM DIR 1 SE02 EEX48A STATE PRSNNL DIR 1 EXE02
N031N TSS OSP DIR 1 SE02 EEX49A STATE PROC DIR 1 EXE02
G293C TSS CHIEF GEN COUNSEL 1 SE01 LAT08C CLC I 1 SPC10
D012N TSS DEP ADMIN 1 SE01 HSP02C STATE PRSNNL ASST ADM 1 SPC09
L038C RN 1 MP01 PSS06P TSS PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IIA05C IT DIV MNGR 1 IST12
D136C TSS IT PROJ MGR DIR 1 IT10 PSS06P TSS PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
D141C TSS ERP SYS MGR 1 IT09 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 IT07 IAS06C APP SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D033C DFA ERP ANLST 5 IT06 IAS03P APP COORD 5 IST09
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D027C SFTWR ENG 2 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D142C TSS ERP ANLST 1 IT06 IAS03P APP COORD 1 IST09
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 IT06 IAS02P APP ANLST II 1 IST08
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
R003C TSS ASST EBD ADMIN 1 GS15 PSS02C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
R001C TSS ASST PERSONNEL AD 2 GS15 HSP02C STATE PRSNNL ASST ADM 2 SPC09
V001C TSS ASST PROC ADMIN 1 GS15 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
V001C TSS ASST PROC ADMIN 1 GS15 PSS02C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
202 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A132C TSS BUS SVCS ADMIN 1 GS15 PSS02C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
G306C TSS CHIEF ADMINST OFF 1 GS15 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
N207N TSS CHIEF PRIVACY OFF 1 GS15 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G307C TSS LEGAL COUNSEL 1 GS15 FAC09C CHIEF FISCAL OFC II 1 SPC10
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
R051C TSS STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 PSS02C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
R051C TSS STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 PSS05C TSS PRGM MNGR 1 SPC07
R051C TSS STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 FAC06C ASST CONTROLLER 1 SPC05
R051C TSS STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 HDH02C HR ADMIN I 1 SPC05
R051C TSS STWD PRGM MGR 1 GS13 HSP03P STATE PRSNNL COORD 1 SPC05
V038C TSS IT PROC ADMIN 1 GS12 PPR03C PROC MNGR 1 SGS10
V003C TSS PROC DIV MGR 1 GS12 TIW05C MRKTNG & REDISTR MNGR 1 SGS09
V003C TSS PROC DIV MGR 1 GS12 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A031C ASST CONT 1 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 3 GS11 HSP05P STATE PRSNNL SUPV/EXP 3 SPC06
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 9 GS11 HSP03P STATE PRSNNL COORD 9 SPC05
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 PSP02C STATE PROC MNGR 1 SPC04
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 HSB04P STATE BENE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 PSS06P TSS PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
R052C TSS STWD PRGM COORD 1 GS11 IDN02P DATA ANLST SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
G036C TSS DIV MGR 1 GS10 PSS04P TSS PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 HSP03P STATE PRSNNL COORD 1 SPC05
X038C QA MGR 1 GS09 PQA02C QA MNGR 1 SGS09
V034C TSS STWD PROC COORD 6 GS09 PSP01P STATE PROC COORD 6 SPC03
V034C TSS STWD PROC COORD 1 GS09 PSP03P STATE PROC SPEC 1 SPC01
R053C TSS STWD PRGM SPEC 1 GS09 PSS02C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
R053C TSS STWD PRGM SPEC 1 GS09 HSP05P STATE PRSNNL SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
R053C TSS STWD PRGM SPEC 5 GS09 HSP03P STATE PRSNNL COORD 5 SPC05
R053C TSS STWD PRGM SPEC 1 GS09 HSP04P STATE PRSNNL SPEC 1 SPC01
R053C TSS STWD PRGM SPEC 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
203 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R028C TSS STWD PYRLL SYS SP 2 GS08 HSP03P STATE PRSNNL COORD 2 SPC05
R028C TSS STWD PYRLL SYS SP 1 GS08 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
V035C TSS STWD PROC SPEC 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
V035C TSS STWD PROC SPEC 14 GS08 PSP03P STATE PROC SPEC 14 SPC01
V035C TSS STWD PROC SPEC 1 GS08 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
V042C TSS SURP PROP SUPV 1 GS08 TIW07P SURPLUS PROP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
P013C PUB INFO COORD 2 GS07 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 2 SGS07
R018C TSS EBD PRGM SUPV 3 GS07 HSB01P STATE BENE ANLST 3 SGS06
V035C TSS STWD PROC SPEC 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
R022C BENE COORD 1 GS06 HSB01P STATE BENE ANLST 1 SGS06
A074C FISCAL SUPP SUPV 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 HSB01P STATE BENE ANLST 1 SGS06
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 5 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 5 SGS04
D070C TSS ACCOUNTS SPEC 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
V040C TSS BUYER 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
V040C TSS BUYER 1 GS06 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
R034C TSS EBD BENE SPEC 8 GS06 HSB01P STATE BENE ANLST 8 SGS06
R034C TSS EBD BENE SPEC 1 GS06 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
V035C TSS STWD PROC SPEC 1 GS06 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
V041C TSS SURP PROP AGENT 8 GS06 TIW06P SURPLUS PROP AGENT 8 SGS05
R033C BENE ANLST 14 GS05 HSB01P STATE BENE ANLST 14 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C057C ADMIN SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 4 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 4 SGS04
V021C SURP PROP AGENT 2 GS04 TIW06P SURPLUS PROP AGENT 2 SGS05
V021C SURP PROP AGENT 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0615 TSS - DIV BUILDING AUTHORITY
U052U TSS ABA DIR 1 SE02 EEX41A STATE BLDG AUTH DIR 1 EXE02
B003N TSS STATE ARCHITECT 1 GS14 SAS02C MANAGING ARCHITECT 1 SPC09
B002N TSS STATE ENG 1 GS14 SEN02P ENGINEER SUPV/EXP 1 SPC06
204 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
U080U TSS ABA DEP DIR 1 GS13 PSS05C TSS PRGM MNGR 1 SPC07
B023C ENG, P.E. 1 GS11 SEN05P PROF ENGINEER 1 SPC05
G036C TSS DIV MGR 2 GS10 PSS04P TSS PRGM COORD 2 SGS07
R019C BUDGET MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
B042C ENG 2 GS09 SEN01P ENGINEER 2 SPC03
B021C LIC ARCHITECT 2 GS09 SAS01I ARCHITECT 2 SPC03
S107C TSS BUILDING OP ASST 1 GS09 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 1 SGS07
S094C ADC CNSTRCT/MAINT COO 1 GS08 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
S004C MAINT MGR 4 GS08 TFM02C FACILITY MNGR 4 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
S106C LIC TRADESMAN 1 GS07 TST02P LIC TRADES 1 SGS07
S106C LIC TRADESMAN 1 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS06
S106C LIC TRADESMAN 1 GS07 TST04P SKILL TRADES 1 SGS06
S017C MAINT COORD 7 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 7 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST05P SKILL TRADES SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 TST04P SKILL TRADES 1 SGS06
S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPV 1 GS06 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
S013C TSS BLDNG/PRGM SUPV 1 GS06 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
S013C TSS BLDNG/PRGM SUPV 1 GS06 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
A088C ASSETS COORD 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
X129C CNSTRCT INSPCT 3 GS05 IIN01P INSP I 3 SGS04
B090C ENG TECH 1 GS05 SEN01P ENGINEER 1 SPC03
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 3 GS05 TST02P LIC TRADES 3 SGS07
S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 1 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 1 SGS04
S037C TSS BUILDING MAINT SP 9 GS05 TMA03P MAINT SPEC 9 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
X153C REAL ESTATE ANLST 2 GS04 ILP04I REAL ESTATE ANLST 2 SGS06
X153C REAL ESTATE ANLST 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S065C MAINT ASST 1 GS01 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
0472 AR GEOGRAPHIC INFO SYST OFC
D149C STATE GEO INFO SYM OF 1 IT12 EEX52A TSS GEO INFO OFF 1 EXE02
D007N TSS STATE GEO INFO OF 1 IT10 PSS02C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
205 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D008C TSS GIS LEAD 1 IT08 IGI03P STATE GIS ANLST 1 IST07
D029C SEN GIS ANLST 4 IT07 IGI03P STATE GIS ANLST 4 IST07
D040C GIS ANLST 1 IT06 IGI03P STATE GIS ANLST 1 IST07
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IGI03P STATE GIS ANLST 1 IST07
B016N TSS LAND SURVEY STATE 1 GS12 SAS03C STATE SURVEYOR 1 SPC05
B074C SURVYR 1 GS09 SAS04I SURVEYOR 1 SPC03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
0470 DEPT OF INFORMATION SYSTEMS
U060U TSS DIS DIR 1 SE04 EEX42A STATE CIO 1 EXE03
U073U TSS DIS DEP DIR 1 SE03 EEX44A STATE DEP CIO 1 EXE01
N013N TSS COO 1 SE02 PSS05C TSS PRGM MNGR 1 SPC07
D003N TSS STATE CHIEF SEC O 1 SE02 ISI02C STATE IT SEC OFF 1 IST15
N206N TSS CHIEF DATA OFF 1 IT12 ISI01C STATE CHIEF DATA OFF 1 IST15
D002N STATE DB ADMIN LEAD 1 IT11 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D127C TSS CHIEF OF TECH 1 IT11 IIE05C IT SEC MNGR 1 IST09
D135C TSS DATA SCIENTIST 1 IT11 IDN03P DATA SCI 1 IST08
D128C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 IT11 PSS02C TSS DIV ADMIN 1 SPC08
D128C TSS DIV ADMIN 4 IT11 IIA04C IT ADMIN 4 IST12
D134C TSS ENTR ARCHITECT 1 IT11 IIP03P IT SR PROJ MNGR 1 IST10
D132C TSS ENTR CLOUD ARCHIT 1 IT11 IIS05C IT INFRA ARCHITECT 1 IST11
D133C TSS ENTR CLOUD ENG 1 IT11 IIS05C IT INFRA ARCHITECT 1 IST11
D131C TSS ENTR CLOUD STRATE 1 IT11 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IDA01C DATA ARCHITECT 1 IST13
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 2 IT10 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 2 IST10
D138C TSS DATA CENTER MGR 1 IT10 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D010C TSS DATA WRHS LEAD 1 IT10 IIE06P IT SEC SUPV 1 IST08
D137C TSS NET ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IIS05C IT INFRA ARCHITECT 1 IST11
D009C TSS OP CENTER MGR 1 IT10 IIE06P IT SEC SUPV 1 IST08
D001C STATE DB ADMIN 1 IT09 PSS06P TSS PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
D001C STATE DB ADMIN 1 IT09 IIA04C IT ADMIN 1 IST12
D001C STATE DB ADMIN 1 IT09 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D003C STATE SYST ADMIN LEAD 1 IT09 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D003C STATE SYST ADMIN LEAD 1 IT09 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D139C TSS DATA ENG 1 IT09 IDN03P DATA SCI 1 IST08
D130C TSS DIS RECOVERY MGR 1 IT09 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
206 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D125C TSS SR. STATE SERVER 1 IT09 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D005C TSS STATE IT SEC ANLS 1 IT09 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D005C TSS STATE IT SEC ANLS 1 IT09 IIE04C IT SEC EXP 1 IST10
D005C TSS STATE IT SEC ANLS 1 IT09 IIE03P IT SEC ANLST II 1 IST07
D123C DB ADMIN 1 IT08 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D123C DB ADMIN 1 IT08 IDM01P DB ADMIN 1 IST09
D123C DB ADMIN 2 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 2 IST09
D123C DB ADMIN 1 IT08 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
D123C DB ADMIN 1 IT08 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IDN02P DATA ANLST SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
D006C SFTWR ENG LEAD 1 IT08 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D006C SFTWR ENG LEAD 1 IT08 IIE04C IT SEC EXP 1 IST10
D006C SFTWR ENG LEAD 1 IT08 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D014C STATE SYST ADMIN 1 IT08 IIE04C IT SEC EXP 1 IST10
D014C STATE SYST ADMIN 1 IT08 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D014C STATE SYST ADMIN 1 IT08 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
V039C TSS IT SOURCING PROJ 1 IT08 PSS06P TSS PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
V039C TSS IT SOURCING PROJ 1 IT08 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D004C TSS STATE NET SUPP LE 1 IT08 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D004C TSS STATE NET SUPP LE 1 IT08 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D004C TSS STATE NET SUPP LE 1 IT08 IIE03P IT SEC ANLST II 1 IST07
D122C IT PROJ MGR 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D029C SEN GIS ANLST 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D028C SEN SFTWR SUPP SPEC 1 IT07 IIE04C IT SEC EXP 1 IST10
D015C STATE NET ENG 1 IT07 IAS03P APP COORD 1 IST09
D015C STATE NET ENG 1 IT07 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D015C STATE NET ENG 1 IT07 IIP02P IT PROJ MNGR 1 IST08
D015C STATE NET ENG 1 IT07 IIP01P IT PROJ COORD 1 IST06
D042C DATA WRHS SPEC 1 IT06 IDN03P DATA SCI 1 IST08
D042C DATA WRHS SPEC 3 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 3 IST06
D042C DATA WRHS SPEC 1 IT06 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IAS02P APP ANLST II 1 IST08
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D027C SFTWR ENG 1 IT06 IAS02P APP ANLST II 1 IST08
D027C SFTWR ENG 3 IT06 IAS04P APP DEVELOPER I 3 IST06
207 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D027C SFTWR ENG 2 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D025C STATE IT SEC SPEC 2 IT06 IIE03P IT SEC ANLST II 2 IST07
D025C STATE IT SEC SPEC 2 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D025C STATE IT SEC SPEC 4 IT06 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 4 IST06
D022C SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IDN03P DATA SCI 1 IST08
D049C TSS PROJ MGR 1 IT06 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
D049C TSS PROJ MGR 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D049C TSS PROJ MGR 1 IT06 IIP01P IT PROJ COORD 1 IST06
D026C TSS STATE HELP DESK L 1 IT06 IIS07C IT INFRA ENGINEER 1 IST10
D024C TSS STATE NET SPEC 2 IT06 CTR01P CHANGE MNGMNT ANLST 2 SGS08
D024C TSS STATE NET SPEC 15 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 15 IST06
D024C TSS STATE NET SPEC 1 IT06 IIS03P IT DIS RECV SPEC 1 IST05
D024C TSS STATE NET SPEC 1 IT06 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IAS02P APP ANLST II 2 IST08
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IDN03P DATA SCI 2 IST08
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IDN01P DATA ANLST 2 IST07
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 1 IT06 IIP01P IT PROJ COORD 1 IST06
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IIS03P IT DIS RECV SPEC 2 IST05
D023C TSS STATE SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 2 IST04
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 PAS05I CALL CENTER SPEC 1 SGS02
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IIE03P IT SEC ANLST II 1 IST07
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 10 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 10 IST06
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IDM03P DB SPEC 1 IST05
D063C COMP SUPP SPEC 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D045C TSS STATE SYST ANLST 1 IT05 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D045C TSS STATE SYST ANLST 2 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D045C TSS STATE SYST ANLST 1 IT05 IUS05P USER SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 IST06
D045C TSS STATE SYST ANLST 7 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 7 IST04
D058C COMP OP COORD 1 IT04 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D032C TSS IT ASSET MGR 1 IT04 TIW02P INVENTORY MNGR 1 SGS06
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 1 IT03 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D071C COMP SUPP ANLST 4 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 4 IST02
D069C TSS SCHEDULER 1 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D046C TSS STATE PROD CONT S 1 IT03 IUS02P USER SPPRT COORD 1 IST05
D046C TSS STATE PROD CONT S 1 IT03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
208 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D084C COMP OP 6 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 6 IST02
A132C TSS BUS SVCS ADMIN 1 GS15 PSS06P TSS PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
A010C AGENCY CONT II 1 GS13 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
D096C TSS EEF SR SYS ADMIN 1 GS12 IIP01P IT PROJ COORD 1 IST06
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
D031C TSS DIS RECOVERY ANLS 1 GS10 IIS02P IT DIS RECV ANLST 1 IST08
G069C TSS QA LEAD 1 GS10 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
A029C TSS FISCAL MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
G098C TSS QA COORD 1 GS09 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
A068C TSS BILLING SVCS MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
D041C TSS TECH ACCOUNTS SPE 1 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
D053C TSS ACCOUNT ANLST 1 GS07 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
D070C TSS ACCOUNTS SPEC 1 GS06 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
A048C TSS RATE ANLST 1 GS06 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 6 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 6 SGS04
D077C HELP DESK SPEC 4 GS05 PAS05I CALL CENTER SPEC 4 SGS02
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
V025C WRHS SPEC 1 GS04 TIW03P INVENTORY SPEC 1 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
9915 DEPT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
SC015 SEC OF VETS AFFRS 1 SE05 ESE15A SEC OF VETS AFFRS 1 EXE04
U008U ADVA DIR 1 SE02 EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I 1 EXE01
L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MP04 MNU04P NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 MED08
L002C NRSNG DIR 2 MP04 MNU05C NRSNG ADMIN 2 MED08
L009C NURSE MGR 1 MP03 MNU07C RN MNGR 1 MED07
L019C RN COORD 1 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
L027C RN SUPV 1 MP02 MNU08P RN SUPV/EXP 1 MED06
209 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L032C RN - HOSP 18 MP01 MNU06P RN 18 MED05
D022N IT SEN PROJ MGR 1 IT09 IIA01C CIO I 1 IST10
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 1 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
N197N NRSNG HOME DIV DIR 1 GS15 MHA03C NRSNG HOME DIR 1 SPC09
G039N ADVA ASST DIR 1 GS14 MHA01C NRSNG HOME ADMIN 1 SPC08
L026N ADVA STATE VETS HOME 1 GS14 MHA01C NRSNG HOME ADMIN 1 SPC08
L026N ADVA STATE VETS HOME 1 GS14 HDH02C HR ADMIN I 1 SPC05
A133C ADVA CFO 1 GS13 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
G318C ADVA DIV DIR 1 GS13 PVC02C CEMETERY SRVC ADMIN 1 SGS12
G318C ADVA DIV DIR 1 GS13 PVS01C VETS SRVC ADMIN 1 SGS12
L111C ADVA NRSNG HOME ASST 2 GS12 MHA02C NRSNG HOME ASST ADMIN 2 SPC06
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
X223C ADVA QA ADMIN 1 GS11 CPR03C GOV AFFRS SPEC 1 SPC05
V036C AGENCY PROC ADMIN 1 GS10 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 SCM04P LIC MASTER SOC WORKER 1 SPC02
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 SCM06P LIC SOC WORKER 1 SPC01
M009C LIC CERT SOCIAL WRKR 1 GS09 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 CPR06C PUB INFO MNGR 1 SGS09
X038C QA MGR 1 GS09 PQA01P QA COORD 1 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
S003C FOOD & BEVERAGE DIR 2 GS08 RRE01C FOOD & BEVERAGE MNGR 2 SGS06
S004C MAINT MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
V004C PROC MGR 1 GS08 PPR05P PROC SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A041C PRGM FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 PVS03P VETS SRVC OFF SUPV/EX 1 SGS08
G237C ADVA CEMETERY MGR 2 GS07 PVC01C CEMETERY MNGR 2 SGS07
G253C ADVA SERV OFF 11 GS07 PVS02P VETS SRVC OFF 11 SGS07
U009U ADVA VETS CHILD WELFA 1 GS07 PVS02P VETS SRVC OFF 1 SGS07
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
G159C DEPT BUS COORD 1 GS07 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G159C DEPT BUS COORD 1 GS07 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS04
P065C DEV SPEC 1 GS07 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
S017C MAINT COORD 2 GS07 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
210 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
L069C LPN 1 GS06 MNU02P LPN SUPV/EXP 1 MED03
L069C LPN 39 GS06 MNU01P LPN 39 MED02
S033C MAINT SUPV 2 GS06 TMA04P MAINT SUPV/EXP 2 SGS06
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
R032C HR PRGM REP 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
R032C HR PRGM REP 3 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 3 SGS04
M065C REC ACTIVITY SUPV 2 GS05 PRC05P RES CRE SUPV/EXP 2 SGS04
V018C WRHS MGR 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S044C FOOD PREP MGR 1 GS04 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 1 SGS03
R036C HR SPEC 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 9 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 9 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 1 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 3 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 3 SGS02
L082C CERT NRSNG ASST 146 GS03 THT01I CNA 146 SGS03
S056C FOOD PREP SUPV 3 GS03 TFS05P KITCHEN SUPV/EXP 3 SGS03
S050C MAINT SPEC 2 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 2 SGS03
C087C ADMINST SPEC I 1 GS02 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 1 SGS02
S085C FOOD PREP SPEC 7 GS02 TFS01P COOK 7 SGS01
S084C INST SVCS SUPV 1 GS02 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
S089C FOOD PREP TECH 2 GS01 TFS01P COOK 2 SGS01
NON-CABINET AGENCIES
0516 EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION DIV
U032U AR PBS DIR 1 SE02 EEX03A AR PBS DIR 1 EXE02
U087U AR PBS ASSOC DIR 1 SE01 PPB01C AR PBS DEP DIR 1 SPC09
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIA06C IT MNGR 1 IST10
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IIS09P IT INFRA SPEC 1 IST04
D061C INFO SYST COORD SPEC 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 2 IT05 IIS09P IT INFRA SPEC 2 IST04
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
D036C AR PBS WEBSITE COORD 1 IT04 IAS08I WEBSITE SPEC 1 IST05
D068C INFO SYST ANLST 1 IT04 CME05P MEDIA TECH 1 SGS04
D066C DIG BROADCAST SPEC 8 IT03 CME05P MEDIA TECH 8 SGS04
D083C DIG BROADCAST TECH 2 IT02 CME05P MEDIA TECH 2 SGS04
211 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A013N AR PBS ADMIN. & FINAN 1 GS13 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
B007N AR PBS ENG DIR 1 GS13 PPB02C AR PBS DIV DIR 1 SPC05
E070C AR PBS HEAD OF AUDIEN 1 GS13 PPB02C AR PBS DIV DIR 1 SPC05
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 FAC10C CONTROLLER 1 SPC06
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
E003C AR PBS ED DIR 1 GS11 EEP02C ED PRGM ADMIN 1 SPC07
E002C AR PBS MKT & ENGAGE D 1 GS11 CMA02C MRKTNG DIR 1 SPC05
S002C AR PBS OP DIR 1 GS11 PPB02C AR PBS DIV DIR 1 SPC05
P001C AR PBS PROD DIR 1 GS11 PPB02C AR PBS DIV DIR 1 SPC05
E001C AR PBS PROG DIR 1 GS11 PPB02C AR PBS DIV DIR 1 SPC05
G076C ADMINST SVCS MGR 1 GS10 HDH06C HR MNGR 1 SPC04
E063C AR PBS EXTERNAL REL D 1 GS10 PPB02C AR PBS DIV DIR 1 SPC05
E013C ED PRGM MGR 1 GS10 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
B018C SEN BROADCAST ENG 2 GS10 PPB02C AR PBS DIV DIR 2 SPC05
B018C SEN BROADCAST ENG 1 GS10 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
P007C AR PBS CHIEF POST PRO 1 GS09 CME01P BROADCAST EDITOR 1 SGS07
E022C ED & INSTRCTN MGR 1 GS09 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
E022C ED & INSTRCTN MGR 1 GS09 CME06P PRODUCER 1 SGS07
P004C PUB INFO MGR 1 GS09 EEP06P ED PRGM SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
E026C ED & INSTRCTN COORD 4 GS08 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 4 SGS06
E031C ED PRGM COORD 1 GS08 EEP03P ED PRGM COORD 1 SGS07
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
P009C TELEVISION PROD MGR 1 GS08 CME01P BROADCAST EDITOR 1 SGS07
P009C TELEVISION PROD MGR 3 GS08 CME06P PRODUCER 3 SGS07
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 1 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 1 SPC01
E048C ED & INSTRCTN SPEC 2 GS07 EEP05P ED PRGM SPEC 2 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
P013C PUB INFO COORD 1 GS07 CMA03P MRKTNG SPEC 1 SGS04
P012C TELEVISION PRODUCER 12 GS07 CME06P PRODUCER 12 SGS07
P012C TELEVISION PRODUCER 1 GS07 CMA03P MRKTNG SPEC 1 SGS04
P008C TELEVISION PRGM MGR 1 GS07 CME06P PRODUCER 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
P023C BROADCAST PROM SPEC 1 GS06 CME03P GRAPHIC ARTIST 1 SGS07
P023C BROADCAST PROM SPEC 1 GS06 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 1 SGS05
212 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
R025C HR ANLST 1 GS06 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 2 GS06 CMA03P MRKTNG SPEC 2 SGS04
P017C TELEVISION PROD COORD 2 GS06 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 2 SGS05
S039C TELEVISION PRGM SPEC 2 GS06 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 2 SGS05
P042C BROADCAST PROD SPEC 6 GS05 CME04P MEDIA SPEC 6 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
S046C MAINT TECH 1 GS04 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
0450 AR PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
U005U PSC CHAIRMAN 1 SE03 EEX31A PSC CHAIR 1 EXE02
U004U PSC COMM 2 SE01 EEX32A PSC COMMER 2 EXE02
U050U PSC DIR 1 SE01 EEX33A PSC DIR 1 EXE01
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS11P IT SUPV/EXP 1 IST09
D030C INFO SYST COORD 2 IT07 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 2 IST06
D054C COMP SUPP COORD 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
G003N PSC CHIEF ALJ 1 GS15 LAT07C CHIEF ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 SPC09
B145C DIR OF ENG 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
G011N PSC ALJ 1 GS14 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
G011N PSC ALJ 3 GS14 LAT01C ADMIN LAW JUDGE 3 SPC08
G006N PSC CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GS14 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
G343C PSC COS 1 GS14 EEX09A CHIEF OF STAFF I 1 EXE01
X001C PSC DIR OF ELECTRIC U 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
N043N PSC DIR OF FINAN ANAL 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
N248N PSC DIR OF PIPELINE S 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
P080C PSC DIR OF TELECOMM & 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
A129C PSC QUALITY SVCS DIR 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
A130C PSC RATES & DEMAND RE 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
G278C PSC RSRCH & PLCY DIR 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
N071N PSC TAX DIV DIR 1 GS14 PPU04C PUB SERV DIV DIR 1 SPC08
G004C MANAGING ATRNY 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G025C ATRNY SUPV 1 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 HDH06C HR MNGR 1 SPC04
G341C PIPE SAFE PROG MNGR 1 GS12 PPU02P PIPELINE SAFE SUPV/EX 1 SGS10
A013C PSC DIR OF REV REQ 1 GS12 PPU03I PUB SERV COMM SUPV/EX 1 SPC04
G299C PSC ELECTRIC COOPERAT 1 GS12 PPU03I PUB SERV COMM SUPV/EX 1 SPC04
213 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
G047C ATRNY SPEC 5 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 5 SPC05
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 PPU03I PUB SERV COMM SUPV/EX 1 SPC04
B023C ENG, P.E. 2 GS11 SEN05P PROF ENGINEER 2 SPC05
X033C PSC SEN PUB UTILITY A 4 GS11 FAU04P AUDITOR II 4 SPC02
A028C PSC SEN RATE CASE ANL 8 GS11 FRC02P PS RATE CASE ANLST II 8 SPC04
A019C PSC TAX DIV ASST DIR 1 GS11 PPU03I PUB SERV COMM SUPV/EX 1 SPC04
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 LAT03P ATTY I 1 SPC03
G268C PSC MOTOR CARRIER ASS 1 GS10 PPU03I PUB SERV COMM SUPV/EX 1 SPC04
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FRC01P PS RATE CASE ANLST I 1 SPC03
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
X216C PSC PIPELINE SAFE COO 7 GS09 PPU01P PIPELINE SAFE COORD 7 SGS08
A046C PSC RATE CASE ANLST 13 GS09 FRC01P PS RATE CASE ANLST I 13 SPC03
A047C FINAN ANLST II 1 GS08 FIN01P FINAN ANLST 1 SPC01
X064C PSC PUB UTILITY AUD 5 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 5 SPC02
G164C EXEC ASST TO COMM 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
A076C FINAN PRGM ANLST 1 GS07 FAU03P AUDITOR I 1 SPC01
A065C PYRLL SVCS COORD 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
X218C PSC COMPLAINTS INVSTI 1 GS07 IIN05P INSP SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A064C PSC TAX VAL SUPV 1 GS07 PPU05I PUB SERV VAL SPEC 1 SGS04
C037C ADMINST ANLST 7 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 7 SGS05
G123C PSC CLERK 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 1 GS06 FIN01P FINAN ANLST 1 SPC01
B076C RSRCH PROJ ANLST 2 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 2 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 2 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
X167C COMPLAINTS INVSTIGTR 7 GS04 IIV02P INVEST I 7 SGS04
A095C PSC TAX DIV VALUATION 6 GS03 PPU05I PUB SERV VAL SPEC 6 SGS04
0375 AR TEACHER RETIREMENT SYSTEM
U010U ATRS DIR 1 SE04 EEX36A RETIRE SYS DIR 1 EXE03
U079U ATRS DEP DIR 1 SE01 PRE06C RETIRE SYS INVEST DIR 1 SPC10
U079U ATRS DEP DIR 1 SE01 PRE05C RETIRE SYS DEP DIR 1 SPC08
D013N ATRS ASSOC DIR OF INF 1 IT11 IIA01C CIO I 1 IST10
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS01P IT COORD 1 IST08
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 1 IST06
214 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D038C SEN SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT06 IAS01P APP ANLST I 1 IST07
D022C SYST SPEC 2 IT06 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 2 IST04
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
N093N ATRS ASSOC DIR FISCAL 1 GS14 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
N092N ATRS ASSOC DIR OF OP 2 GS14 PRE03C RETIRE SYS ADMIN 2 SPC08
A006N ATRS INT AUD 1 GS14 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
G019C GEN COUNSEL 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
A021C AGENCY CONT I 1 GS12 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
A110C SEN INVEST MGR 1 GS11 FIN05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 1 SPC03
G041C ATRS MEM SVCS ADMIN 1 GS10 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
A038C FISCAL SUPP MGR 1 GS09 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
A037C INVEST MGR 2 GS09 FIN06P RETIRE SYS INVEST COO 2 SGS09
A037C INVEST MGR 1 GS09 PRE07P REITRE SYS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A034C RETIRE SECT MGR 5 GS09 PRE07P REITRE SYS SUPV/EXP 5 SGS08
A034C RETIRE SECT MGR 1 GS09 PRE04P RETIRE SYS COORD 1 SGS07
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 3 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 3 SPC02
A062C RETIRE COORD 2 GS08 FIN04P INVEST ANLST 2 SPC01
A062C RETIRE COORD 3 GS08 PRE04P RETIRE SYS COORD 3 SGS07
A061C RETIRE INVEST SPEC 1 GS08 FIN04P INVEST ANLST 1 SPC01
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 4 GS07 FAC01P ACCOUNTANT I 4 SPC01
A089C ACCOUNTANT I 2 GS07 PRE01P RETIRE COUNS I 2 SGS05
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PRE02P RETIRE COUNS II 1 SGS06
A078C RETIRE CNSLR 3 GS07 PRE04P RETIRE SYS COORD 3 SGS07
A078C RETIRE CNSLR 18 GS07 PRE02P RETIRE COUNS II 18 SGS06
C037C ADMINST ANLST 4 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 4 SGS05
R027C BUDGET SPEC 1 GS06 FBU03P BUDGET SPEC 1 SGS05
A083C RETIRE ANLST 2 GS06 PRE01P RETIRE COUNS I 2 SGS05
R033C BENE ANLST 2 GS05 HBE01P BENE ANLST 2 SGS04
V014C BUYER 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 3 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 3 SGS04
R037C BENE TECH 2 GS04 HBE01P BENE ANLST 2 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
215 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
S050C MAINT SPEC 1 GS03 TMA05P MAINT TECH 1 SGS03
0370 AR PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT
U014U APERS DIR 1 SE04 EEX36A RETIRE SYS DIR 1 EXE03
A147C APERS DEP DIR OF INVE 1 SE01 PRE06C RETIRE SYS INVEST DIR 1 SPC10
N254N APERS DEP DIR OF OP 1 SE01 PRE05C RETIRE SYS DEP DIR 1 SPC08
U078U APERS DEP DIR 1 SE01 PRE05C RETIRE SYS DEP DIR 1 SPC08
D148C APERS ASSOC DIR OF IN 1 IT11 IIA01C CIO I 1 IST10
D015N APERS DIR OF INFO TEC 1 IT10 IIS05C IT INFRA ARCHITECT 1 IST11
D006N STATE SYST ARCHITECT 1 IT10 IDA01C DATA ARCHITECT 1 IST13
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS06P IT INFRA COORD 1 IST08
D044C SYST ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
G042N APERS CLC 1 GS14 LAT06C ATTY IV 1 SPC09
A003N SEN INVEST ANLST 1 GS14 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
R003N APERS DIR OF BENE ADM 1 GS13 PRE03C RETIRE SYS ADMIN 1 SPC08
R003N APERS DIR OF BENE ADM 1 GS13 CTR03C TRNG MNGR 1 SGS10
G037N APERS DIR OF OP 1 GS13 PRE03C RETIRE SYS ADMIN 1 SPC08
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC03P ACCT COORD 1 SPC03
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH08P HR SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
R054C APERS BENE OP MGR 1 GS11 HBE03P BENE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
A052C ACCNTNG COORD 1 GS09 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 1 SPC02
A034C RETIRE SECT MGR 1 GS09 CMA02C MRKTNG DIR 1 SPC05
A034C RETIRE SECT MGR 1 GS09 HBE03P BENE SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A034C RETIRE SECT MGR 1 GS09 PRE07P REITRE SYS SUPV/EXP 1 SGS08
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 FAC07P CERT PUB ACCOUNTANT 1 SPC05
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 8 GS08 FAC02P ACCOUNTANT II 8 SPC02
A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GS08 PRE04P RETIRE SYS COORD 1 SGS07
A066C INT AUD 1 GS08 FAU04P AUDITOR II 1 SPC02
A062C RETIRE COORD 5 GS08 PRE04P RETIRE SYS COORD 5 SGS07
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
A079C INVEST ANLST 1 GS07 FIN04P INVEST ANLST 1 SPC01
A079C INVEST ANLST 2 GS07 PRE02P RETIRE COUNS II 2 SGS06
A078C RETIRE CNSLR 15 GS07 PRE02P RETIRE COUNS II 15 SGS06
P031C MEDIA SPEC 1 GS06 CPR07P PUB INFO SPEC 1 SGS06
P027C PUB INFO SPEC 1 GS06 PRE01P RETIRE COUNS I 1 SGS05
216 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
A083C RETIRE ANLST 9 GS06 PRE01P RETIRE COUNS I 9 SGS05
X115C SOCIAL SEC ANLST 1 GS06 HBE01P BENE ANLST 1 SGS04
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 2 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 3 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 3 SGS04
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
0360 AR STATE CLAIMS COMMISSION
N154N CLAIMS COMM DIR 1 GS13 PBC01C CLAIMS COMM DIR 1 SPC08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
C073C ADMINST SPEC II 2 GS03 PAS03P ADMIN SPEC 2 SGS02
U051U CLAIMS COMM 5 GS02 PBC02A CLAIMS COMMISH 5 SGS09
0324 AR PUBLIC DEFENDER COMMISSION
U082U PUB DEF COMM EXEC DIR 1 SE03 EEX34A PUB DEF DIR 1 EXE02
G317C APDC MNGMT ASSOC 1 SE01 LPD01C CHIEF PUB DEF I 1 SPC09
G061N SEN PUB DEFENDER 2 SE01 LPD02C CHIEF PUB DEF II 2 SPC10
G061N SEN PUB DEFENDER 6 SE01 LPD01C CHIEF PUB DEF I 6 SPC09
D007C INFO SYST MGR 1 IT08 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D039C NET SUPP SPEC 1 IT06 IIE02P IT SEC ANLST I 1 IST06
D079C COMP SUPP TECH 1 IT02 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D089C INFO TECH ASST 1 IT01 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
G334C CHIEF PUB DEFENDER II 5 GS15 LPD02C CHIEF PUB DEF II 5 SPC10
G334C CHIEF PUB DEFENDER II 21 GS15 LPD01C CHIEF PUB DEF I 21 SPC09
G334C CHIEF PUB DEFENDER II 5 GS15 LPD05P PUB DEF III 5 SPC08
G334C CHIEF PUB DEFENDER II 7 GS15 LPD04P PUB DEF II 7 SPC05
G334C CHIEF PUB DEFENDER II 6 GS15 LPD03P PUB DEF I 6 SPC03
G296C EXEC DIR PARENT COUNS 1 GS15 LPD01C CHIEF PUB DEF I 1 SPC09
G008N CHIEF PUB DEFENDER 1 GS14 LPD01C CHIEF PUB DEF I 1 SPC09
G012N PUB DEFENDER III 50 GS13 LPD05P PUB DEF III 50 SPC08
G012N PUB DEFENDER III 53 GS13 LPD04P PUB DEF II 53 SPC05
G012N PUB DEFENDER III 28 GS13 LPD03P PUB DEF I 28 SPC03
G025C ATRNY SUPV 2 GS12 LAT05P ATTY III 2 SPC08
A014C FISCAL DIV MGR 1 GS12 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH06C HR MNGR 1 SPC04
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
X222C APDC CHIEF CAPITAL IN 1 GS10 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
217 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
G338C DRUG COURT CASE COORD 1 GS08 IIV06P MITIGATION INVEST 1 SGS07
G336C MITIGATION SPEC II 11 GS08 IIV06P MITIGATION INVEST 11 SGS07
G336C MITIGATION SPEC II 1 GS08 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G335C PD INVSTIGTR SPEC 4 GS08 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 4 SGS07
G335C PD INVSTIGTR SPEC 1 GS08 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G337C PD LEGAL SVCS SPEC 1 GS08 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
G337C PD LEGAL SVCS SPEC 2 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 2 SGS06
G337C PD LEGAL SVCS SPEC 4 GS08 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 4 SGS06
G108C PUB DEF OMBUDSMAN COO 1 GS08 SSP06I OMBUDSMAN 1 SGS08
G194C PUB DEF INTERP II 1 GS08 CPR04I INTERPRETER 1 SGS07
G194C PUB DEF INTERP II 1 GS08 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G092C PUB DEFENDER PRGM MGR 1 GS08 PAS04C ADMIN SUPV 1 SGS06
R024C ASST PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS07 HDH05P HR COORD 1 SGS07
X056C CAP CONF INVEST 2 GS07 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 2 SGS07
X056C CAP CONF INVEST 1 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
G297C EXEC ASST PARNT COUNS 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
G179C LEGAL SVCS SPEC 6 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 6 SGS06
X063C PUB DEF INVEST 3 GS06 IIV05P INVEST SUPV/EXP 3 SGS07
G122C PUB DEF PRGM COORD 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
G122C PUB DEF PRGM COORD 2 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 2 SGS04
C012C PUB DEF SUPP SVCS SPE 3 GS05 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C046C LEGAL SUPP SPEC 48 GS04 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 48 SGS06
0311 DISABILITY DETERMINATION
U034U DDSSA DIR 1 SE03 EEX16A DDSSA DIR 1 EXE01
L003N CHIEF PHYS SPEC 1 MP09 MDM01C DIS CHIEF PHYSC SPEC 1 MED14
L025N SEN PHYS SPEC 2 MP08 MDM05P DIS SR PHYSC SPEC 2 MED12
L024N DDSSA MED SPEC 19 MP07 MDM03P DIS PHYSC SPEC 19 MED11
L024N DDSSA MED SPEC 4 MP07 MDM02P DIS PHYSC CONS 4 MED10
L024N DDSSA MED SPEC 3 MP07 MDM04P DIS PSYCHOLOGIST 3 MED09
L012N DDSSA MED CONS 10 MP06 MDM02P DIS PHYSC CONS 10 MED10
L012N DDSSA MED CONS 1 MP06 MDM04P DIS PSYCHOLOGIST 1 MED09
L027N DDSSA PSYCHOLOGY SPEC 7 MP05 MDM04P DIS PSYCHOLOGIST 7 MED09
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIA06C IT MNGR 1 IST10
D121C BUS INTEL SPEC 1 IT06 IDN01P DATA ANLST 1 IST07
D042C DATA WRHS SPEC 1 IT06 IDM02P DB ANLST 1 IST07
218 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 5 IT05 IIS04P IT INFRA ANLST 5 IST06
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
D056C SYST COORD ANLST 1 IT05 IUS01P USER SPPRT ANLST 1 IST04
A145C DDSSA CFO 1 GS14 FAC08C CHIEF FISCAL OFC I 1 SPC09
G234C DDSSA PRGM DIR 3 GS13 PDI09C DIS DIV DIR 3 SPC08
G234C DDSSA PRGM DIR 1 GS13 PDI13C DIS UNIT MNGR 1 SGS11
G059C DDSSA ASST DIR 2 GS12 PDI08C DIS DIV DEP DIR 2 SPC07
G059C DDSSA ASST DIR 3 GS12 PDI13C DIS UNIT MNGR 3 SGS11
G292C DDSSA PROF REL MGR 1 GS12 PDI11C DIS PROF REL MNGR 1 SGS11
A027C ACCNTNG OP MGR 1 GS11 FAC05P ACCT SUPV/EXP 1 SPC04
R013C AGENCY HR MGR 1 GS11 HDH06C HR MNGR 1 SPC04
E067C DDSSA PRGM ED COORD 1 GS11 PDI14C DIS UNIT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
G233C DDSSA SECT MGR 9 GS11 PDI13C DIS UNIT MNGR 9 SGS11
X207C DDSSA ADJ V 71 GS10 PDI05C DIS ADJUDICATOR V 71 SGS10
X207C DDSSA ADJ V 4 GS10 PDI12C DIS QA COORD 4 SGS10
X207C DDSSA ADJ V 3 GS10 PDI14C DIS UNIT SUPV/EXP 3 SGS10
X207C DDSSA ADJ V 17 GS10 PDI04P DIS ADJUDICATOR IV 17 SGS08
X207C DDSSA ADJ V 49 GS10 PDI03P DIS ADJUDICATOR III 49 SGS07
X207C DDSSA ADJ V 35 GS10 PDI02P DIS ADJUDICATOR II 35 SGS06
X207C DDSSA ADJ V 6 GS10 PDI01P DIS ADJUDICATOR I 6 SGS05
G258C DDSSA HEARING OFF 1 GS10 PDI05C DIS ADJUDICATOR V 1 SGS10
G258C DDSSA HEARING OFF 3 GS10 PDI10C DIS HEARING OFF 3 SGS10
G258C DDSSA HEARING OFF 1 GS10 PDI14C DIS UNIT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS10
X203C DDSSA QA SPEC 6 GS10 PDI12C DIS QA COORD 6 SGS10
G112C DDSSA UNIT SUPV 2 GS10 PDI10C DIS HEARING OFF 2 SGS10
G112C DDSSA UNIT SUPV 26 GS10 PDI14C DIS UNIT SUPV/EXP 26 SGS10
X190C DDSSA ADJ IV 39 GS09 PDI04P DIS ADJUDICATOR IV 39 SGS08
X190C DDSSA ADJ IV 10 GS09 PDI03P DIS ADJUDICATOR III 10 SGS07
X190C DDSSA ADJ IV 9 GS09 PDI02P DIS ADJUDICATOR II 9 SGS06
X190C DDSSA ADJ IV 21 GS09 PDI01P DIS ADJUDICATOR I 21 SGS05
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
X071C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ III 55 GS08 PDI03P DIS ADJUDICATOR III 55 SGS07
X071C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ III 8 GS08 PDI02P DIS ADJUDICATOR II 8 SGS06
X071C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ III 40 GS08 PDI01P DIS ADJUDICATOR I 40 SGS05
X071C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ III 13 GS08 PDI07P DIS CLAIMS SPEC 13 SGS04
X071C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ III 2 GS08 PDI06P DIS CLAIMS ASST 2 SGS03
219 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
X070C DDSSA FRAUD INVSTIGTR 1 GS08 PDI02P DIS ADJUDICATOR II 1 SGS06
R014C PERSONNEL MGR 1 GS08 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
V007C PROC COORD 1 GS08 PPR02P PROC COORD 1 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 PDI03P DIS ADJUDICATOR III 1 SGS07
X062C QA COORD 1 GS08 PDI07P DIS CLAIMS SPEC 1 SGS04
X104C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ II 1 GS07 PDI10C DIS HEARING OFF 1 SGS10
X104C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ II 1 GS07 PDI03P DIS ADJUDICATOR III 1 SGS07
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PDI06P DIS CLAIMS ASST 1 SGS03
C037C ADMINST ANLST 3 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 3 SGS05
X143C DDSSA CLAIMS ADJ I 3 GS06 PDI07P DIS CLAIMS SPEC 3 SGS04
G199C DDSSA PROF REL OFF 1 GS06 CPR05P PUB INFO COORD 1 SGS07
X201C DDSSA ADJ SPEC 1 GS05 PPR04P PROC SPEC 1 SGS05
X201C DDSSA ADJ SPEC 5 GS05 PDI07P DIS CLAIMS SPEC 5 SGS04
X201C DDSSA ADJ SPEC 2 GS05 PDI06P DIS CLAIMS ASST 2 SGS03
A091C FISCAL SUPP ANLST 3 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 3 SGS04
R032C HR PRGM REP 1 GS05 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PDI06P DIS CLAIMS ASST 1 SGS03
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS11P MAILROOM SPEC 1 SGS01
C049C DDSSA ADJ ASST 1 GS04 PDI02P DIS ADJUDICATOR II 1 SGS06
C049C DDSSA ADJ ASST 1 GS04 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
C049C DDSSA ADJ ASST 1 GS04 PDI01P DIS ADJUDICATOR I 1 SGS05
C049C DDSSA ADJ ASST 1 GS04 PDI07P DIS CLAIMS SPEC 1 SGS04
C049C DDSSA ADJ ASST 2 GS04 TAT08P PRINTER 2 SGS04
C049C DDSSA ADJ ASST 52 GS04 PDI06P DIS CLAIMS ASST 52 SGS03
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 1 GS04 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A098C FISCAL SUPP SPEC 2 GS04 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 2 SGS04
R038C HR ASST 1 GS04 HDH07P HR SPEC 1 SGS04
0241 JUD DISC & DISABILITY COMM
U101U EXEC DIR 1 SE01 PBC06C JDDC DIR 1 SPC08
G028N JDDC DEP EXEC DIR 1 GS12 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
A105C JDDC FISCAL MGR 1 GS08 FFS05P FISC SPPRT SUPV/EXP 1 SGS07
X187C INVSTIGTR 1 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 1 SGS05
G230C JDDC PARALEGAL 1 GS06 ILS03I LEGAL SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS06
C092C JDDC LEGAL/ADMIN SEC 1 GS05 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0238 ARKANSAS ETHICS COMMISSION
U092U ETHICS COMM DIR 1 SE01 PBC05C ETHICS COMM DIR 1 SPC08
220 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
D057C INFO TECH MGR 1 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 1 IST02
G047C ATRNY SPEC 4 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 4 SPC05
X068C ETHICS COMM COMP SPEC 3 GS07 IIV03P INVEST II 3 SGS05
C022C BUS OP SPEC 1 GS05 FFS04P FISC SPPRT SPEC 1 SGS04
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
0232 ST BD ELECTION COMMISSIONERS
N131N SBEC DIR 1 GS12 PBC03C ELEC COMM DIR 1 SPC08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 1 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
G314C ELECTION ADMIN SUPV 1 GS11 PBC04A ELEC COORD 1 SGS08
G073C ATRNY 1 GS10 LAT04P ATTY II 1 SPC05
A116C BUS OP MGR 1 GS08 FFS02P FISC SPPRT COORD 1 SGS06
G119C SBEC EDAL SVCS MGR 1 GS08 PBC04A ELEC COORD 1 SGS08
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04
G162C SBEC ELECTION COORD 2 GS06 PBC04A ELEC COORD 2 SGS08
0028 OFC OF PROSECUTOR COORDINATOR
U091U PROSECUTOR COORD 1 SE02 EEX30A PROSECUTOR COORD 1 EXE02
D030C INFO SYST COORD 1 IT07 IIS10C IT INFRA SUPV/EXP 1 IST10
D052C SFTWR SUPP ANLST 2 IT05 IUS04P USER SPPRT SPEC 2 IST02
G023C DEP PROSECUTOR COORD 1 GS13 LAT05P ATTY III 1 SPC08
G047C ATRNY SPEC 3 GS11 LAT04P ATTY II 3 SPC05
T118C CERT FCLTY DOG HANDLE 1 GS11 SIA03P CERT DOG HANDLER COOR 1 SGS07
T120C CERT FCLTY DOG HANDLE 2 GS08 SIA02P CERT DOG HANDLER 2 SGS06
C010C EXEC ASST TO THE DIR 1 GS07 PAS08I EXEC ASST 1 SGS07
C037C ADMINST ANLST 1 GS06 PAS01P ADMIN ANLST 1 SGS05
T119C CERT FCLTY DOG HANDLE 3 GS06 SIA02P CERT DOG HANDLER 3 SGS06
G161C VIC/WIT COORD 1 GS06 CTR02P TRAINER 1 SGS07
C056C ADMINST SPEC III 1 GS04 PAS02P ADMIN COORD 1 SGS04

(d) For fiscal year 2026, the Office of Personnel Management may make
changes to authorized positions and classifications under subsection (c) of
this section as needed to reflect amendments, additions, and deletions to
regular salary sections enacted by the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly in the
2025 regular session.
(e) The Office of Personnel Management shall provide guidance to state
agencies to implement this section.
(f) This section shall supersede any law in conflict with its
221 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB392
provisions, including without limitation § 21-5-205(b).

SECTION 18. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that state employees play a
critical role in providing important services to citizens of this state that
preserve the public peace, health, and safety; that the provisions of this
act are necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the
state and to ensure that necessary services and operations are provided to
the citizens of this state; that the next fiscal year of the State of
Arkansas will begin on July 1, 2025, and operative appropriations will become
effective on that date; and that it is necessary for the continued operation
of essential state services and operations that this act become effective at
the beginning of the forthcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.

/s/B. Davis



















222 03-31-2025 17:38:56 MBM145